There is a story on the AP wire quoting Gen. Ray Odierno instructing his commanders in Iraq to contact insurgent groups in search of possible cease-fires in the sectarian war. This is profoundly important and represents the single best hope for a positive outcome in Iraq.
This is currently on the [front page](http://reddit.com/info/1uwf0/comments)
Let's see it detect that my secondary monitor is left of my primary monitor... then I'll be impressed :-&gt;
"Right, and yet you have failed to explain how stamping your name on the product invades your privacy." By encoding personal information onto your products, which is a previously unheard of practice for items that cost 99 cents a piece.  Its not my fault you're unable to grasp my argument.
If homosexuals and lesbians want a site which allows pairing of homosexuals and lesbians, there is nothing preventing the creation of such a site. Nor is there any reason such a site should be compelled to serve heterosexuals. cHarmony sells a particular product. Why should they be compelled to serve other products?   
God I hate Bush and everyone who supports him.
You're right. That argument alone should have really put Steve Jobs in his place. How dare he not account for the fact that people loose things eh? Does he know he needs to be the sacred guardian of every consumer device? Imagine what happens when you lose your iPhone and it's full of names, phone numbers, emails, and addresses? Jesus Christ! STOP THE PRODUCTION LINES! This sure is a show stopper.
Gee, I guess there is someone else on reddit who actually agrees with me that having them encrypt your personal data onto music is a nasty practice.  I thought this whole board was merely Apple techies in their spare time.
Downmodded? Dude had like 2 functional fingers on his fretting hand.
[The Department of Homeland Security wants U.S. employers to be required to verify the immigration status of their employees.](http://www.homelandstupidity.us/2006/02/07/national-id-employers-to-check-immigration-status/) Is this the bill?
WASZ UP COOL
Hooray! It's 9-11 controversy day!!
&gt; something gets repeated so often that it takes on the sheen of signficance when it reality it's no more meaningful than a fart in a hurricane. Are you saying my grandkids aren't going to totally dig my *09 F9 11 02 9D 74 E3 5B D8 41 56 C5 63 56 88 C0* tattoo?
The first paragraph of the article *actually* says "The essence of the story, as usually told, goes something like this. [...] Thus arose one of the long-standing mysteries of science.".  As the article discusses, there is no evidence that the experiment was ever performed, much less that it gave a "mysterious result" that cannot be explained by science. However, there *is* evidence that a theoretical prediction made by someone with an .. um .. alternative .. theory of reality was later passed off as a confirmed experimental result by a fellow practitioner of "alternative science".
Ooh ooh I love what if games. What if someone leads your pitbull out of your backyard with pieces of meat and then rubs honey all over a little girl and makes the pitbull eat the girl but the pitbull is too full of meat so he bites you. Can you sue?
Says a lot of people who for some reason haven't figured out that sometimes papers need to stir some shit, and that of course if a paper is stirring shit it's a liberal whackjob paper. I enjoy it myself.
Hardly surprising, and not only because we live in a shallow society. Faith is intrinsically intellectually shallow, by definition it can't survive any through testing. And no, theology has no depth, it is going around in circles.
On [Bob Goodlatte](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Bob_Goodlatte):  Goodlatte has made a name for himself in Congress as a leader in high tech issues. He served as a member of the cyber-security task force and is currently on the Courts, Internet and Intellectual Property Subcommittee. Goodlatte has supported legislation to crack down on spamming and online gambling. Check out the [Courts, Internet and Intellectual Property Subcommittee](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_House_Judiciary_Subcommittee_on_Courts%2C_the_Internet%2C_and_Intellectual_Property). It has many members from this list, including the chairman and the ranking member.
I went a couple of hours before I bothered to look. Had it said monkey in the title I would have been all over it. Monkeys!
*...Originally" used by Nazis? ...* Ummmm, an incredibly naive statement.
&gt; The statistics do not come out in favor of maxwellhill. Anti-gun attitudes are based on emtions, not on hard facts. The fact is, guns in the hands of the law-abiding prevent crime and make for a more peaceful and civilized society. Bullshit. Civilized countries that aren't obsessed with guns have far lower death rates and serious crime rates than the U.S. Show me one study thats not paid for by the NRA and/or weapons manufacturers that shows anything even approximating what you're saying here. You won't be able to, because its simply not true. Peace and Civilization are not brought about by spreading lethal weapons around like candy. America is the *only* developed country that still believes this shit, and its *only* because the gun-nuts have latched onto the 2nd amendment, and continue to spout completely bogus arguments about defending themselves against their government, or the rising tide of violence thats engulfing the country.
I'd define "need" as "you can't do without them". I haven't run into a situation where I can't do without anaphoric macros. For returning from the current function without using RETURN-FROM, I'd use an explicit (block nil ...).   
&gt;You are wrong on all counts. We have not failed in Iraq. Just the opposite. We removed Saddam's regime in record time and have been waging an EXPECTED war against the insurgency that everyone knew would take many years. Heh. You don't understand asymmetric warfare.  Here's a primer: http://reddit.com/info/1oank/comments/c1oefq when you're finished reading that, go here: http://www.exile.ru/archive/by_author/gary_brecher.html and start giving yourself an education on the realities of warfare.  Once you've read some of that, look at some of your statements again. And you will realize... &gt;EXPECTED war against the insurgency that everyone knew would take many years. Time is not on the occupier's side in CI warfare. The longer it goes, the worse it gets. If you've done the reading I assigned you, you'll know why. &gt;So the world and the public have no stomach for our current situation. In CI warfare, stomach is part of the equation. So is pocketbook, and the latter is vastly more important. If you've done the reading I assigned you, you'll know why. &gt;Who cares what people think about this when our objectives for the long term are being achieved Not a chance of that happening. If you've done the reading I assigned you, you'll know why.   
Shut up you left wing conspiracy theory nutjob!
Aye, there's the rub. You won't know you're doing anything wrong until you end up with a bag over your head thrown into van, Mr., um... Buttle.
Inaccurate title - if you can check out any time you like, there probably wouldn't be a Marines right now.   Well, except for the handful who used to put firecrackers in frogs' mouths as children...
Yes, greywater is cool, but if you modify your house plumbing to make it easy, you are violating the building code and you can be forced to change it back. Also, it will be against you when you try to sell your house.  It would be best to do it in a way such that there's a valve and detachable hose, so greywater diversion becomes optional. Bucketing is a lot of work, and a bit messy.  Small washers can be easy to divert to the lawn via hoses.  After you wash veggies in the kitchen, the water can easily be used in a watering can. However, the building codes should be changed for sure to take advantage of sun orientation and probably for greywater, too.
Deleting in protest of Reddit's new anti-user admin policies.
I'd be greatly impressed with something a bit more practical that can be cheaply harnessed by the masses, like a *wind-powered* toilet.
That is exactly what came to my mind when reading the headline . Zappa is God.
:)
Yes, maybe you should have. I would have modded it down instead of modding it up because historical documents are not what I would classify "important reading" for what is generally a news site. Do not worry, I mod cute kitty pics down as well because they are not news. Sometimes I like kitty pics, but I look elsewhere for my cat fixes.
At least the US doesn't murder journalists.
People are clouding two issues into one just for the sake of complaining and being annoying cunts. Newsflash genius: previous iTunes tracks all have owner information in them. Yeah, that's how you can unlock it genius. Now they keep track of who bought it and when much like how a swipe of your supermarket discount card notates when you bought that gallon of milk and pack of condoms.
He was is not in the service, and had an honorable discharge. They should not be allowed to pull it now that he speaks out against them....
Good choices. Much more cost effective.
How is one person's experience with a girlfriend the truth about female psychology?
thus the vicious spiral of snarkiness continues...
It's not a product, it's a service.  Learn the difference.
PResenting only the truth is a reality-based bias.
Cory Doctorow is an agenda-pushing, publicity-seeking shitty-sci-fi writer? NO WAI!
Another strange purchase for eBay. How does this service tie into their business model? It's like the Skype purchase all over again.
If you dig into the Gnostic gospels, you can find some interesting stuff.
It's both funny and sad to see how prestige does not necessarily equal income.
You miss the point sorry. I heard that Linux was coming in 5-15 years in 1994. In 2022 will it be you or another fanatic who claims that Linux is coming in 5-15 years?
Just curious how narrow the text can be.
is this a joke?
This guy is heavily confused. Computer science is science. Hooking up mysql is not. Math is a science. Using perl to do some retarded crap on your webserver _again_ is NOT science. The biggest problem with this guy, is he keeps hiring computer scientists to do information technology jobs. He probably cries about paying them what they are worth too.  But can we all agree that this guy would get +2137129 on digg? They like to cry about intellectual types.
The world's carbon dioxide emissions are about 24 billion metric tons or 24,000,000,000,000 kilograms per year. So you'd need a *billion* schools (as many schools as there are people on the planet, no this is not a mistake) in order to make more than an insignificant dent. Meanwhile, replacing a single 1000 MW coal plant with a single nuclear power plant displaces more than 6 million tonnes per year. That's 6,000,000,000 kilograms. String a thousand of those suckers up and you've done some real good in the world. Next thing you know, people will be measuring carbon dioxide emissions in grams.
Are you a vegetarian and fearing you wont be able to get the proteins you need? fret not, these food combos are just what you need...
Do not create functions. There maybe developers in your team who might not understand what that strange name, he never seen in a book, means. Use only standard well known operators and functions.
You're right - the number is 36 and they are:    1.  Supplication (in which the Supplicant must beg something from Power in authority)  2. Deliverance  3. Crime Pursued by Vengeance  4. Vengeance taken for kindred upon kindred  5. Pursuit  6. Disaster  7. Falling Prey to Cruelty of Misfortune  8. Revolt  9. Daring Enterprise  10. Abduction 11. The Enigma (temptation or a riddle) 12. Obtaining 13. Enmity of Kinsmen 14. Rivalry of Kinsmen 15. Murderous Adultery 16. Madness 17. Fatal Imprudence 18. Involuntary Crimes of Love (example: discovery that one has married one’s mother, sister, etc.) 19. Slaying of a Kinsman Unrecognized 20. Self-Sacrificing for an Ideal 21. Self-Sacrifice for Kindred 22. All Sacrificed for Passion 23. Necessity of Sacrificing Loved Ones 24. Rivalry of Superior and Inferior 25. Adultery 26. Crimes of Love 27. Discovery of the Dishonor of a Loved One 28. Obstacles to Love 29. An Enemy Loved 30. Ambition 31. Conflict with a God 32. Mistaken Jealousy 33. Erroneous Judgement 34. Remorse 35. Recovery of a Lost One 36. Loss of Loved Ones. Source:  Polti, Georges. The Thirty-Six Dramatic Situations. trans. Lucille Ray. Thanks for the snark though, it really becomes you.
[Apollo Diamond](http://apollodiamond.com) is well on their way, plus theirs are colorless. All of the Gemesis stones I've seen so far are yellow, but they're farther along in the size race. Apollo is still limited to 1/2 carat or so. When I buy an engagement ring later this year, it will be from Apollo.
He means Linux Apache Mysql and PHP, And yes. he is a douche. I bet he can't even read C
&gt;Don’t we all wish we can do what these people have done without having to stretch our budget in the process? You don't need to stretch your budget to lose weight. It takes commitment and dedication.  That's all.  It's not hard or expensive to eat right and exercise.  Burn more calories than you eat.  It's simple math.  3500 calories = 1 pound of fat.  Burn 3500 calories more than you eat in a week and you lose a pound.  Eat 3500 more than you burn, and you gain a pound.
gOOOOOOOGLE  again
While it probably doesn't make sense for China to attack Russia, wouldn't your info be the exact reason they SHOULD attack? Attacking to take natural resources seems logically sound.
Oh democrats can be stupid, and corrupt and greedy.  But they haven't gone in for saddling us with 'leadership' that would do the old soviets proud for sheer hypocrisy, kleptocracy and cryptocracy. George W. Bush is the responsibility of the Republican party, and the reason it should be hunted down and stamped out, like we would with any other criminal conspiracy.
I only have fond memories of Mr. Rogers. I am 32 and grew up with him. I felt a huge loss when he died. Such a wonderful man....
You are functionally retarded, aren't you? You are like that person who shut down the A/C in a computer server room. Absolutely no fucking clue what you're talking about. For your information, dumbass, solar panels are several times more expensive than a wind turbine. It's why wind power is everywhere considered very expensive and solar power is not seriously considered at all.
Hahahahaha, upvoted because there was a bitter aftertaste when I read the article again. I agree with you on points #1, #2, #5 and #6.
Um, yes he did lose.  Who's the president?  Gore or Bush?   Recount after recount was done and all of them showed that Bush did win.  Get over it.
Personally I don't need to even click the link, I sadly know where I am on the chain....lol
If anyone is interested, [here is a lengthy analysis on the deal](http://seekingalpha.com/article/36971/)... already.
Fedora has very well-organized and comprehensive QA. There were four test-releases before this final release. It is not a beta or test version of RedHat, they are two different projects that work from the same base. RedHat is responsible for a lot of the innovation and development ([including](http://fedoraproject.org/wiki/RedHatContributions): dbus, hal, cario, NetworkManager, evince, and AIGLX) in Linux and free software so even if you are using Ubuntu you are benefiting from RedHat's success.
I kinda doubt admonishing teenagers is part of the job description of a computer technician.
If you are lost in the wilderness, here is how to make and use a signal mirror that works.
シャドウイング練習したいんだけど、電車通勤だと変な人扱いになっちゃうのがつらいところですねー。
I'm sure at some point we'll be able to create any substance we want that is chemically identical to the one that occurs in nature. After all, it's doesn't just appear out of thin air in nature, it is created by, say, cells transforming one substance into another, combining substances, breaking them down etc., essentially doing what human chemist do. I accept we're not at that point yet and some artificial substances might take short cuts which make them unhealthier or taste different, I just don't like the way people always write about artificial being automatically bad, seeing as the word is so ill-defined anyway.
poor sod, nobody cheered for you.
I'm sorry but there is money to be made in slandering business, just like there is money to be made in slandering government. If you think Blood Diamonds are worse than car deaths, or even people getting kicked in the head by mules you need some serious re-education on the actual facts.
THIS THREAD IS USELESS WITHOUT PICS
hmm,  ok,  where is the snag then?  you want a brand new SUV every year,  and a cell phone plan with more than 45k mn per month?
&gt; to focus men's attention on their virtue, personality, etc. I think you've mis-interpreted the *purpose*. Modest clothing for both men and women is, as far as I'm aware for Abrahamic religions, designed to protect people from (their own) lust. I won't extend that to say that in patriarchal societies it's driven by a fundamental male fear of female power, but you can see that that's where the arrow is pointing.
It's also greenish yellow and a perfectly cut diamond has more sparkle than a perfectly cut mois. (all things being equal iows)
Best guy to have ever lived so far.
Paris Pigs Out
Real men implement HTTP servers in finite state machines ... in COBOL.
_This_ time, it will be different!
These lists are great.  Plus this site really helps you stay organized.  And you'll never lose a document again, because it's all in the internet!
I love that movie 12 Monkeys.
Ha!  There are MILLIONS of ways to buy diamonds without getting close to DeBeers. The Israelis, the Canadians, Hell ARKANSAS might be the place for you if you drive a Chevy, drink Coors, and vote for Bush. Then there are the Russians, the Australians and every other major country that sells outside the DeBeers cartel, but HEY! Don't let my FACTS get in the way of your Righteous Christian Anger.
It's not just women who are brainwashed. I once had a long conversation with an ex-boyfriend about the horrors of the diamond industry and my disgust at how they have become such a status symbol in our society. He then proceeded to tell me that I would never succeed in my career if I didn't have a big rock on my hand. That's when I knew he wasn't the guy for me.
There was probably a better way to say that...
If she likes diamonds just because they are pretty then tell her she should be perfectly satisfied with cubic zirconia.
Hey, it's cool.  I hate Aluminum.
i has a monkeyz!
I can't find anything about PolicyKit anywhere except mailing list archives. I was wondering if someone who was using Fedora knew if it was implemented yet.
He said "I like Michelangelo" and then draws Leonardo. It must be fake!
There have been a bunch of good articles lately.
Actually I would argue that it was the fact that those white men in power relied on slave labor to keep the economy afloat.  Therefore, it was the 'minority' which kept the world in working order.
A service is also a product.
It does have that [Weathermen retro style](http://www.radicaleducation.org/images/sds_days_of_rage.jpg) to it. Kudos to the designer! Sigh...
Yes, let's listen to the website OWNED by the company that MAKES Moissanite.  How is a picture of the Dispersion of a Moissanite show that a Moissanite is worth more than a diamond?
Diamonds are a bad buy thinking on the scale of months and even days.  They have crappy resale value and look worse than tons of other gems out there today.  The only redeeming value diamonds have is that you're pretty much guaranteed sex if you buy one.
I see you're a shill for DeBeers. Moissanite is colourless, the more expensive diamonds are coloured, and moissanite has superior sparkle to diamond.
&gt; Labels: thinking Baby Semantic Web cries.
My wife has told me that I need not bother buying her another diamond because she knows how much of a scam they are.
That's ridiculous.  Even their looks are overhyped, if you ask me.  I prefer pearls, emeralds, rubies, sapphires, and opals over diamonds any ol' day of the week, and none of them have insanely inflated values and extremely well-documented histories of violent exploitation.  I mention this to my longterm boyfriend when it comes up in hopes he *won't* buy me a diamond when and if we do get engaged. They're overdone and cliché to the extreme, and the fact that anyone can insist on wanting one after the issues behind them are mainstream and widespread enough to be the subject matter of a major motion picture is completely beyond the scope of comprehension.
Neither of them has any value beyond looking pretty. Since moissanite looks prettier, it has more value than diamond. Also, diamonds have the function of enriching deBeers and shafting ordinary people. These are everywhere considered to have *negative* value, excepting shills of course. So these functions subtract from whatever little value diamond has.
Certainly you can admit that you're in the minority, right?
Except that CZs chip, crush, scratch and actually are closer to glass when it comes to light dispersion than just about anything on the planet. I can spot a CZ when someone is wearing one, and moissanites almost to the stone have a green or yellow tint to them, and are man-made, like CZs. Diamonds really are the hardest substance and there is truth in what you try to say with a diamond.
Looks like a clone of Photoshop with darker colors and some transparency.
Aberdeen gets about 3 hours of daylight in winter.
&gt; (which is known as a Cookies. They will not harm your computer but they can invate your privacy) Oh no! I wouldn't want my privacy invated!
Hehehe, no SUV, no cellphone with 45k mn. The catch is that it'll be about four more years until I seek a marriage, since I have an education to finish. But I've always hated diamonds.
&gt; another Yeah, but she got the one she *needs*.
I have two years left in the IRR. If I ever got an activation notice I would put it in the same place I put my jury duty summons: In the garbage.
Yes, she Definitely KNOWS.  Does she use gasoline?  Does she drive a car?  How many Middle Easterners have died over money hungry Oil Barons?  You know, the Most Profitable Companies in The WORLD. ;-)
When you owe the bank a hundred thousand dollars, you have a problem. When you owe the bank a hundred million dollars, the bank has a problem.
Don't forget brittle too.
And it seems the evangelicals are more into it than most Jews I know. For example a lot of religeous Jews I know don't condone homosexuality but don't have near as big a problem with it as the evangelicals I know (Though this is just personal experience.)
And I thought I was the high bidder!
the story of my life
**NO**
I'm guessing China. I could be wrong.
True, but she was perfectly satisfied with a $500 diamond ring.
Only the purest of tinfoil from the hatter, then? ;)
I'm sure we would consider not buying gasoline if we didn't need it to use it every single day.
Marry mulroony then...   
I think the point of the poster was more along the lines that it is far from the truth. It isn't "small isolated occurance" when people are wearing the burqa for themselves, as opposed to part of some woman-hating regime. Instead, those that use it to hurt or "imprison" a woman are the exception.
Render farms are not considered normal computers. Render farms can be run across many OS's. Sometimes across all current OS's... Ever heard of Screamernet? Probably not, I'm guessing you have never been in the graphics industry. Before you ask, yes, I have worked in the graphics industry under some of the biggest labels. I have turned down work from some of the most famous studios that run the large Linux render farms. Your list has excluded the following. 2D Graphics, , 3D Graphics (mostly), and Gaming. You missed the following... Accounting, Book Keeping, Medical Databases, Music Creation, Fully Compatible Video Playback, 2D Animation, 2D Vector for Print, 2D Layout (though one professional package was open sourced that may one day work), 3D Game Graphics Creation, Glass Master Authoring, Well I could go on, but Linux does not even have compatibility with external equipment. My own mother who emails and surfs with her machine would not use Linux. She uses one other program. PE Design. This is necessary for her top of the range Sewing Machine. It is her hobby. She wanted to get a Powerbook two years ago. PE Design is one of two programs that will never work on OSX even under emulation. She purchased another windows machine. It is a deal breaker for her. Her Sewing machine costs six times the value of her laptop. Linux fanatics just do not get it. It's the TOOLS stupid! There is a TON of work to be done. 3D experimental desktops and a billion and one distros are diverting work that needs to be done making tools for Linux or making tools work on Linux through WINE. Mod me down, but the truth will remain. Linux that does not include everyone else through tools, will remain the playground of geeks who want to be different (superior). You have to admit malcontent, your opening line directed at my post shows you as someone who believes themselves as superior to most others.
Yeah, her friends will really be impressed when they're comparing rings.
Cubic zirconia is so optically close to diamond that typically only a trained eye can easily tell the difference. My MIL has had a CZ ring for years and has never had any problem with it.
It's just brain-dead filesystem handling on \*nix's part. That is, instead of having a path, all your applications should be mounted *together* under /bin, with each user seeing a different mounting. &lt;sarcasm&gt;How long until Plan 9 comes out, again?
Hahahahahahaha.  How much money do you have?  Apollo diamonds are rare and expensive and I don't think there are many people carrying them.  I'll know better after this weekend.
They aren't ignoring such efforts, that would be great, instead they are actively trying to block construction of such farms and parrot the negatives of wind power, such as the slight impact to migratory birds and bats.  Of coarse oil/coal has no negative impact to the earth or its inhabitants.   It's hard to find negatives in solar power and such efforts are transparently propagandist, so instead they buy up companies that produce breakthroughs in this technology and sit on it. Tell them they can sit on it and spin.  Push patent reform.   
Like in the movie *Brazil* -- just bill them for the cost of their own torture.
I should start going to church.
saw right thru me, you did. i guess i'm just touchy because i've had to attend 3 different ceremonies this spring. plenty of time to mull it over.   
That is actually refreshing. My girlfriend is trying to convince me that instead of $4,000, $3,500 will probably be sufficient. It's pissing me off.
&gt; I wouldn’t want to give her an engagement or wedding ring that’ll leave a green stain and fall apart in the rain. Go stainless steel.
&gt; If it is SO good why do people NEED to SHOUT it everywhere? Because, unlike Windows or OS X, it doesn't get any other form of advertising *than* people shouting about it.
All military contracts are for a 8 year duration. There are various service options to split up that 8 year. You're out of the Corps 8 years after going to boot camp and not a day before.
They have a stake in every diamond mining operation in the entire world that they can.  Some companies and countries have tried to keep them out.... Here are some facts about the diamond industry: http://www.diamondfacts.org/
Are you JAG? Do you know the in's and out's of military law?
Oh yes, you're DEFINITELY a Chemistry Major.
My older sister was a Beatles fanatic. She has told me that I was sitting on her lap when they first performed on the Ed Sullivan Show. She had all the memorabilia; Beatles wigs, dolls, posters and even wallpaper she ordered from London in her room.  Later on, she gave me a black-light poster of the Lonely Hearts Club Band. I was about 8 years old. I still remember that I'd wake up in the mornings and stare at that poster and saw them move (smile, wink and wave). I guess this was a precursor to the psychedelics I dabbled in my teenage years. ;)
We only kill babies. Fucking with small animals is just wrong.
Only insofar as it gives you an excuse to air your bigoted, provincial opinions about Americans.
Yes, Diamonds are TERRIBLY Brittle, because you know that 9 on the Hardness scale (out of 10) means BREAKS when you Look at It! Opals and Emeralds and Quartz and Topaz are SO much more Strong with their low numbers.  Idiot.
Truth. Around here, I can quite clearly hear a gaggle of black women conversing from two blocks away. It's just irritating.
No person is actually perfect. Not Ghandi, not Mister Rogers.   
It's a great idea, but something you generally want to talk to your future (hopefully) fiance about first, just like you talk to her about what sort of ring you want to get her before you even THINK about giving her one.
You beat me to it.  I wonder if this can get to a width of 1 character?!
Nope, you've got it all wrong. Jor-El and Zod were two expressions of something that Krypton as a whole sorely lacked: the ability to challenge the established order. Jor-El did this from within the system (and seemed to largely fail) Zod did it from without (and eventually was banished). Either way, yes, if you were to try and judge all of Krypton by either Jor-El or Zod, or even both, you would be way off. If you thought this was really deep for one of the Superman movies you should listen to my bit on the struggle with Oedipal desires in Rambo or the biting critique of socialism inherent to Finding Nemo.
Yes, because you shop where?  In the Mall, where you buy your shoes and underwear.
Nice. I'll be there in about three weeks.
Historically speaking, this observation is at best irrelevant, and at worst plain wrong. The Nazis (not just the Gestapo - also the SA and SS) started torturing and murdering people as early as 1933, following the *Empowerment Act*,  and on a larger scale in 1934, during and after the *Night of the Long Knives*.   There are many more ways of hurting people than hypothermia and waterboarding. To the victims it would make little difference just what particular method with they are being tormented.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/World_Trade_Center
I have to go w/ Ladarzak on this one: a bird isn't going to fold up its wings completely during any sort of attack, which consists of an awful lot of maneuvering. Now, if it's a later model of RWBB with the vectoring thrush, I could see it.
I won't go so far as to say you're a DeBeers shill, but I'm going to have to second moissanite. http://diamondssuck.com/ If you could buy a more brilliant stone of the same weight, get a much nicer setting and *still* pay less, *why* would you buy a diamond?
Everyone wants power, not just Christian white males.
I guess common sense doesn't come naturally to the rest of the world.
in defense of scalia's alcohol-abusing right-wing, non-arrogant compassionate conservative daughter, maybe she was just too drunk to fasten her chilldren properly. you liberals are all to quick to think the worst.
The stronger something is, the more brittle it tends to be. Especially diamond which cleaves very easily along multiple angles. It's how it's cut fool.
The point is that if you threaten withholding the diploma the cheerers will in turn realize the consequence of their actions. That's what we in the industry call "terrorism."
[goo goo g'joob](http://drecosby.ytmnd.com/)
Yes, it's a horrid dirty dirty business, no one can sleep at night knowing they're selling the blood of babies to rich white bitches. Are you NUTS!?  Even BEFORE the Kimberley Process The Instance of Blood Diamonds in the US was BELOW 1 percent!!!!  And the vast majority where sold (in the US) at shady deals with dealers who sold to shady little jewelers, not well established businesses or multi-generational family owned businesses that care about their communities and what people think of them.  Good Lord.
&gt; As I heard someone on the street there say, _"Why worry about it if you're not doing anything wrong in the first place?"_ Because you don't have to be doing anything wrong, or even illegal, for information about you to be [abused](http://notphilsnotions.blogspot.com/2006/09/databases-and-privacy.html) by someone who doesn't respect your privacy. Searches of you, your property, or information about you are invasive practices, and it would be foolish to assume that the people who engage in them will always behave benignly.
They conveniently forget to mention that mines in Botswana are single-sex only. This leads to homosexuality and prostitution which leads to AIDS. Which is probably why Botswana is the AIDS capital of the world and in the words of the AIDS coordinator there "faced with extinction". But nevermind that.
Heh, the whole two to three months salary "tradition" is yet another scam invented by people wanting to sell diamonds.  The De Beers commercials say something like 'how else can 2 months salary last a lifetime'....but whether it is 2 months salary or three months salary.....it is just a made up figure.  They try to scare you into spending that much so you don't feel cheap.  In reality, spending that much (especially if you can't afford it) makes you look like a fool.
I remember back in my day, graduation was held with a sense of pomp. A certain regard for tradition and honor where you would walk across a stage to accept a piece of paper that signifies your achievements and dedication. How quick we turn boorish and uncouth.
Also, your [cola comes from Sudan](http://reddit.com/info/1uyy5/comments), your [chocolate is picked by slaves](http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/world/africa/2042474.stm), your clothes are stitched in a sweatshop and your computers are programmed by Dilbert.
But it's NOT any more life-threatening than any other surgery -- the anesthetic is the life-threatening part, and no one thinks of that as a major risk. This is literally the ONLY reason to do this procedure.  By this, I mean, not the only moral reason.  I mean, the only reason IT IS EVER DONE.  Why else would they collapse the skull?  There is no reason, except in this circumstance.  The right has created a boogeyman. In the cases this severe, there are no miracle cases.  The brain is literally lacking, with the occasional exception of a brain stem.
Lets see. You advertise widely. You tell everyone "My employer sucks." Your employer fires you. You are surprised. How many brain cells are you using?
I'd have to say 69-71'ish is when I watched him too. He may have just been starting out though.
"Cache" =&gt; pronounced kash =&gt; a stockpile  "Cachet" =&gt; pronounced kashay =&gt; an indication of approval or superior status. Some other interesting definitions too...
You do know that "crises" is plural - right?  Crisis is singular.  Lame.
I heard this interview on NPR this morning - this guy is a professional white house policy shill. I think he must have majored in doublespeak and "not answering a question" taught by tony snow.
He could have voted for it to be a state-by-state matter -- WHICH IT ALREADY WAS.  He didn't.
Interesting enough, but there can be many arguments to that. TV is cheap entertainment. For a one-time investment plus maybe a cable bill, you get an unlimited stream of entertainment, depending on your tastes. If you have trouble finding the money, time, or mental energy (economic uncertainty causes stress, which wears significantly on the mind) to pursue endeavors that others might consider more worthwhile, then it makes some amount of sense to make TV viewing as comfortable as possible. And I assume that lower-income homes don't have the multitude of rooms that would allow the TV to be anywhere practical except in the main gathering room. I'll assume that the term "X classes" refers to "those living well outside the system". Positing that only if one rejects ownership of a television will one be "free to read books" is a combination of blind elitism and an unspoken admission that whoever suggests such is somehow incapable of extricating himself from the grasp of the television enough to turn it off. I'd like to hear your response to what I've said if you have one. I've not really been in extended conversation with someone who holds these beliefs, and I'd assume that you'd have more to say than just these blanket arguments. I know you're paraphrasing an argument from Fussell's book, but it seems that you took it to heart enough to present it as a valid or accurate point of view. Edit: overzealous semicolon use
Stumble Upon sucks. Either that or I do, because I've never been able to get any use out of it.
People getting kicked in the head by mules? Shit, I just bought a mule for use around the house.
Cable news is pure entertainment. He says this stuff for ratings and publicity.
Bush is an adult?
Have you ever really seen a moissanite?  Seriously, no joke have you seen one?  It doesn't really matter what you say, but as someone who spends countless hours looking at multiple stones of various types I can say without a hint of sarcasm that moissanites are a cheap substitute for a diamond.  Put a moissanite in a mostly dark room and you get a pasty white blob, put a diamond in there (all cuts and clarity being equal, which never happens because most Mois are off color) and it sparkles like a star.  Your picture is a pretty fantasy, and fails to note that the light coming out from the TOP of the stone (not falling through the bottom as it is in your picture) is the important light.  Any gemologist worth his salt will tell you diamonds are better than moissanites bar none.
Well, there was the Boot Incident.
Do you know what the 14th amendment is?  It was written specifically to decrease the rule of states and make sure that a state could not take away a right granted to you by the constitution.  Until that point, this was fully possible and often done.
I realize that the template can be improved, but, unfortunately, I have little time to dive into it to really make a difference. Thanks for the input, I'll try make the site more smoothly designed.
The first Rails release included ActiveRecord.  ActiveRecord is incredibly complicated and wasn't as simple as composing queries from SQL fragments.
As for the enriching DeBeers and shafting ordinary people, you can buy non DeBeers diamonds, and unlike moissanites diamonds are not created artificially in a lab.   
Smarter concern trolls, please. "Poisonous" is a talking point from administration flacks, so I'm surprised -- not -- to see it here.
It's a process in which you become a product.
Well, I got lucky.  My wife was every bit as disgusted with the diamond industry as me.  The ONLY reason she has a diamond on her hand is that it's an heirloom, passed down from her grandmother. But we have agreed that we have no interest in ever buying a diamond for any reason, ever.  (well, except saw blades and other industrial items; that doesn't count)
That. Must. Hurt.
So you are saying he started with a bunch of raw SQL queries, which he refactored into ActiveRecord? No, he was sick of PHP, had read about the ActiveRecord pattern and decided to implement it.  He created a language for dealing with the problem of ORM.
I think the answer you are looking for is "natural to chocolate".  The essential ingredients of a chocolate bar are cocoa solids, cocoa butter (the fat), and sugar.  There are a couple minor ingredients, too.  However, both cocoa solids and butter come from the cocoa bean.  So that is "natural" in this context.  Those are the traditional ingredients of chocolate.  All expensive chocolates, and most inexpensive ones too, follow this recipe.  Right now, you can't sell "chocolate" in the USA without this basic composition. What is "unnatural" is substituting fats that do not come from cocoa beans, usually vegetable oil, for cocoa butter.  Some candy makers want to market this "unnatural" candy as "chocolate".
I pressed the up arrow seven times but your score only went up one point :(
Yep. Like the $750 million embassy they're building with the surface to air missiles on the roof and the Krispy Kreme franchise.  Sure seems permanent to me.
Foolish.  It doesn't matter who's on top. Power corrupts.
Here are the four essential rules of gun safety: 1. All guns are always loaded.  2. Never let the muzzle cover anything you are not willing to destroy.  3. Keep your finger off the trigger until your sights are on the target.  4. Always be sure of your target. I'd say he blew #4.
Uh...  foreach (item: array)    item *= 2; In both loops you're iterating through an array and multiplying the current item's value by 2. You aren't doing anything to the order of the iteration so the `foreach` can be used.
Short but very positive video
Unless they are in other countries, right now countries in the Middle East.  In the past, Latin America.
Actually, in 2000 Gore was not only a "viable candidate," he won a majority of the popular vote, and had the election stolen through a combination of election fraud at the state level in Florida, where many legitimate Democratic voters were purged, and Bush v. Gore.  Where have you been, the last 7 years?
The right to control your own body is pretty big.  U.S. common law only forbade abortion after "quickening" -- e.g. the first trimester abortions which make the vast majority of U.S. abortions would still have been legal (though unsafe without aseptic preparations). Abortions weren't made illegal until physicians made them require "medical necessity."  The initial anti-abortion bills were lobbied for by the AMA.  Why?  Because until then, midwives were the abortionists.  By requiring medical necessity even for first trimester abortions, it gave doctors more business at a time when there was a huge glut of doctors (the 19th century had tremendous numbers of physicians to the point where it was a slightly disrespectable profession). So, yeah, I'm talking about the right to privacy.  Which means not only abortion rights, but the right to birth control as well.  Until Griswold v. Connecticut, it was considered absolutely ok for a state to ban a married couple from using contraception or even to distribute a pamphlet about it!  The right to privacy means a lot of different things about controlling your own body.  He apparently believes you should be allowed to use currently illegal drugs (which I'm good with, in spite of not using them personally), so he believes the government shouldn't invade our privacy that way.  What makes it okay to invade uteruses?
That's funny since I ran into multiple articles about how moissanite got frequently confused for diamond by jewelers, some even offering to buy it on the spot on the assumption that it is diamond.
New rule: You don't get your terrorists under control, we're invading your country to get to them.  
I went nuts on Wonkette in another thread and I was ripped by it. Well, I'll give her a lot of credit now for getting this out to the general public. I just don't like her snarky, gossipy, crap talk. Here's [Marine Sgt. Adam Kokesh's web site](http://kokesh.blogspot.com/). It's linked in the article, but I thought I'd link it here anyway if someone missed it.
It looks like a model.
This is a joke right? You are scaring me.
Well yes, just like spending four thousand dollars on a photographer for your wedding is generally a bad idea if you don't have the money either. If you got to a responsible ethical Jeweler you'll only spend as much as you want, not what they make you spend, but seriously if you're as weak willed as all that, is it the responsibility of a jeweler to determine what you can and cannot spend on jewelry?  No, but if you're having problems like that make sure they have a good return policy.
Obama and Clinton.  What a surprise.
Entirely relevant, because it seems like "The Decider," in taking time out from beating his chest, has decided to put us in Iraq for 50 years (the time we have been in Korea, their new model for success). I don't recall voting for that, do you?
How about the part where you have the right not to have your Constitutionally guaranteed rights interfered with by state/local government?  Leaving so much up to the states is a direct refutation of the word and spirit of the 14th amendment.
O'Reilly is one of many hate-mongers in the world. Nobody should listen to anything he says. He is a big fat idiot and he is proud of it.
Der Head of Search &amp; Head of Social Media von Yahoo! Deutschland plaudert zur Zukunft von Flickr bzw. del.icio.us und gibt SEO-Tipps.
Well, I'm a woman and a midwife in training. So yes. It is.
Northern Iraq has been under [US protection since '91](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Iraqi_no-fly_zones).
So in other words, diamonds are inferior in quality. Furthermore, diamonds don't retain their value past the jeweler's doorstep. Again, inferior.
&gt;I've met people who declare they're huge fans of a particular band yet don't know any songs in their entirety. Why do they call themselves fans then?  Do they just like the band's image?
I knew it! and this proves it.
&gt;Good ol' days? Like what? 6 months ago? Yeah, those were the days. 2005 is more than 6 months ago. But I liked your comment anyway. I remember when submissions cost a penny to view. Now it's a dollar :(
No, I'm one of those people who knows that 'education' was a word invented by a teacher for such contexts as that useless bit of paper known as one's undergrad degree, helpful when your aspirations include law school and other excellent means of self support. The actual learning process started some time inside the womb, when my brain grew the capacity to take input, and I expect it to end around the time the machines around my bed make unholy beeping noises in wailing chorus and somebody in a white coat and medical pyjamas says ‘Oh shit, wrong outlet’. 
Hey there's this great little company that makes Electric Cars call Tesla. ;) Also if you're not that cash rich you can buy a hybrid or carpool or do any number of other things like ride the subway, etc.. But don't tell me that diamonds are bloodier than those gorram mules who kick and kill more people every year in the US than die on Airplanes or from some current imaginary war over diamonds.  The Diamond Industry is an Important part of the African Economy and does more good than harm.  Even Bono and Desmond Tutu think so.
If the trolls on this thread think our blog is s****y, I'm glad, because that means I'm doing something really right.  I mean, who knows from autocoprophagia better than someone who's still defending Bush?
Don't like it?  Maybe you shouldn't shop there, dickwad.  If you want all remnants of history erased for the benefit of your brain hygiene, move to Germany. 
Other long-lived societies don't seem to have a problem staying married for a lifetime.
I think McCain should have taken the "bait", frankly. He had an opportunity to either stand up and walk out of the studio in disgust, or dress O'Reilly down for making such a bigoted remark. He'd maintain whatever moral high-ground he had left, and would be doing the public a great service in attempting to dethrone a royal asshole. Predictably, though, he just cruised right on by. Based on public appearances like these, you'd think the man lacks a central nervous system.
Yes, but it would be difficult to convince a jury that the plaintiff got XDR-TB from some other source. In the western world, it's still fairly uncommon.
WHo to the what now?  I should've remembered the old adage about arguing on the internet. Dude, Diamonds are in every sense Superior to Moissanite.  They do retain their value, and keep going up, especially with this rush towards gold, silver, platinum, and other commodities (diamonds), and away from stocks and bonds.
It's basically impossible these days to make any purchase without supporting some injustice somewhere in the world or harming the environment somehow. At some point, you just have to accept that you need to support things that you disagree with for the sake of convenience.
Those mineralogists sure are fags, eh?
Can you tell by some of the pixels or just by having seen a quite a few CZ in your time?
Well, he could have said it more elegantly, but he's basically right.
&gt;While I'm romantic enough to want to get married, I hate diamonds. That's hot.
CAPS LOCK IS THE HIGHWAY TO COOL!
Well, if you are the sort of parent that relies on television to teach your child, then I guess you get what you deserve. It's much better to teach by example, and let t.v. do what it's intended for, entertain.
No, the white Christian male power structure has retarded progress for hundreds of years. The only time shit gets better is when people challenge it, or they bring destruction to themselves.
Well just like there are bad doctors, bad dentists, bad lawyers, and bad accountants there are bad jewelers. Let the buyer beware (the jeweler).  He should've looked at the damn thing before getting greedy and trying to buy a diamond for less than it was worth. Every store that will still be open in five years has an electronic diamond tester and a gemologist on staff.  One or both should be able to tell, if not get a new tester or gemologist. Hell, properly trained sales staff should be able to tell.
Mr. Rogers was great, but the trolley ride was like a ride into hell for me. As a little kid those puppets scarred the crap out of me. I loved the trips around the neighborhood to meet Mr Fireman, or Mr. Postman, but the trolley ride was always the stuff of nightmares.
Raon is introducing its new-and-improved Everun UMPC, packing both WiFi and Bluetooth 2.0 on the inside, along with integrated HSDPA or WiBro to round out your connectivity options. The device will also apparently come in a couple of different models, each boasting a 4.8-inch 800 x 480 touchscreen, a full QWERTY keypad, AMD LX900 or LX800 Geode processors, 30GB or 60GB hard drives (with a 6GB SSD drive an option on some models), and a promised 7 hours of battery life (or 11-12 hours with the optional expanded battery).
What????  I am as liberal as it gets, gay and atheist. I was asking for clarification of how this is libel. I did not use the word "poisonous"  I am asking for an explanation of why this is libel and getting some weird ass answers. Do you even read what you are responding to? Is it asking too much for an intelligent conversation with out knee-jerk insults? You are so rabidly anti-bush that you are insulting the people on your own side for daring to discuss the subject and you call ME a troll. If you are going to insult me, at least copy from something I actually said. Where the hell did you pull "poisonous" from? Not from anything I said. Do you even understand what a troll is or is it just an easy insult? Nothing I have ever said in any comments would make me a troll. If you are going to insult me, at least come up with something accurate. If you read this thread, you would see that sakebomb69 is anti - bush as well.  we are ON  YOUR SIDE!
:|
&gt;I mean, the only reason IT IS EVER DONE Cite, please. I can find all sorts of information claiming Vast Majority, which I'm inclined to believe, but I cannot find any evidence supporting this particular assertion.  &gt;The right has created a boogeyman. I totally agree that a D&amp;X is 100% justified in this circumstance, but I also think that you, in turn, have made a boogeyman of the right.
I don't shun diamonds because I think they're "bloody". I don't buy them because I think they're a scam. &gt;Also if you're not that cash rich you can buy a hybrid or carpool or do any number of other things like ride the subway, etc.. Hybrids don't make sense economically. I live in Atlanta so carpooling and taking the subway are out.
OMG!  Here's a simple test any MOOK can do.  Flip over a diamond or a CZ and look from the BOTTOM through to the top of the stone.  Put something with a pattern under it.  If you can SEE the pattern it's a CZ.  Diamonds have what Geologists and Gemologists call a Higher Refractive Index.
&gt; The little boy was laying there, severed in half. Ugh. Talk about a lose-lose situation. This seems like a completely freak accident. It's terrible that it happened, and a shame the mob reacted that way. What we don't get to hear is the reaction of the officers responsible. Did they break down crying, or did they try to flex their authority?
Diamonds aren't a commodity you dumbass, they're a LUXURY ITEM! And the idea that they are any kind of "investment" is ludicrous. It's unbelievable how you think you can get away with blatant lies like that. Hey here's an idea. If you're a jeweler or gemologist then how many diamonds have you bought at retail prices?
I work in my fifth generation family jewelry business.
Oh, dear god. I just read that SomethingAwful article... I don't think I can ever sleep again.
Actually, I think the Wisconsin-Madison doctoring predates the Onion parody.
Do you know if there is a way of finding out if they have a stake in any particular operation?
Part of Kokesh's "work" is dealing with this issue. &gt; The implications of this hearing may be far reaching, as the prosecution of a member of the inactive reserves under these circumstances is unprecedented. At stake is the right of freedom of speech for the hundreds of thousands of members of the Inactive Ready Reserve, as well as the nation’s right to get the unbiased truth out of Iraq. Last week, the prosecuting attorney, Captain Sibert, offered Kokesh a general discharge. To accept this would be to allow the Marines to say that members of the IRR do not have freedom of speech, so naturally, he declined.
I agree with you overall, Borg, but as I understand it the anger of the Russian population against the enormous expenditures on weapons coupled with radioactive contamination around weapons facilities, waste dumps, and of course the Chernoble power nuke meltdown, also contributed to a strong movement for change.
Not sure what you mean by pixels, but I've seen plenty of CZs next to diamonds. Here is the BEST advice I can give anyone who wants to buy a diamond.   FIRST, educate yourself from REPUTABLE sites online.  SECOND, go into a jeweler and ask THEM to educate you.  THIRD, if any of your knowledge doesn't mesh, ask them why and have them explain it to you.  FOURTH, make sure they're Kimberley Process Compliant, ask to see the Certificates, if not, don't buy from them. If you and they can pass all those tests, you should be working with a reputable jeweler who should be able to completely explain where the price of a diamond is coming from and can show you how a diamond is superior in every way to a moissanite, a CZ, and even white sapphire (thought I'd bring it up even though no one's mentioned that one yet).
That's because they aren't deluded by this fantasy Americans seem to have latched on to about love. You're not always going to feel horny for your spouse, they're not always going to do shit you like, etc; the truly happy, long-lived couples learn something extra that we just can't seem to get, for the most part. Don't ask me what it is, I don't know, but it's not the love we've been taught to expect.
I'm not really worried about people asking my wife if they can  look at her ring through a pattern.
Actually, it leads to the men having sex with hookers.  Man you are WAY out in left field.
Well, we've seen what hegemonic countries think of the treaties they sign.
I remember seeing this photo before on a news site.. something about a stray cat and a monkey. Could be Malaysian?
Fuck that, me and my mandigo brothas are after your daughters.  You can keep your power structure, suckas... Scuse me while I go get a white girl pregnant.
Sigh. So you do work for DeBeers.
Seriously? I hadn't heard that - just that they were supposedly less expensive than a similar "natural" stone. If Gemesis would make colorless stones available, then I'd also give them a shot. I haven't gotten a quote yet, so I am prepared to be surprised. What's this weekend? update:  I spoke with one of their reps who said they were currently up to .6 carat round brilliant at I/SI2. Not exactly what I had in mind at this point. He doesn't foresee much larger in the next few months.
I guess that 2 trillion dollars just isn't enough to buy some of these. Of course, with such a pathetic military budget, that's hardly a surprise now, is it?
 You should be able to search for information online, but DeBeers has a stake in almost everything, but that doesn't mean those independents follow DeBeer's lead. Ask about Canadian diamonds, they're the hottest thing and great quality right now. 
It's not my fault that you've failed to present an argument... So your reason is: It's an unheard of practice. Because it's unheard of it's an invasion of privacy? Do you realize that in the past 10 years the freedom of information has completely changed how people live their lives? Adjustments are necessary. One of those adjustments happens to be the protection of copyrighted information. This is hardly an adjustment that invades your privacy.
I predict this -- like the high-school girl who used "matrices" to produce "strong" encryption in an "efficient" manner a few years ago -- will never be heard from again.  Tapping the line would only change the noise level at the moment of tapping -- the authorized users wouldn't know if the noise level had just naturally changed. Maybe the tapper could use random impedance values. Also, I'm surprised that a very high impedance op amp wouldn't be virtually unnoticeable. Finally, still not any more practical than QKD since an expensive physical link is required. But at least people are trying.
&gt; at times the internet also tends to be like the old neighborhood gossip-net, where something gets repeated so often that it takes on the sheen of signficance when it reality it's no more meaningful than a fart in a hurricane. Every communications medium is susceptible to this, including the mainstream press and TV news networks, but I think the Internet does a better job of debunking its own falsehoods. Think of the number of Americans who get their news from the TV and still think WMD were found in Iraq. People who get their news from websites are far more likely to have discovered the truth by now.
Because we all know law *defines* justice. This is why there can be no such thing as bad law, by definition!  
So what they're saying is that apes are more evolved than humans. It.. it doesn't make sense. A planet where apes evolved from men? There's got to be an answer. 
NO! I must be protected from things I don't like!
Actually, I'm rabidly anti-DRM, and I don't really mind this new information.  So long as I get to use the music I purchase as I see fit for my own (and my family's) use, I'm happy.
It was meant as a joke. I guess I wasn't being very funny though. :/
Apollo doesn't like to talk about it, but do some research, I believe the Wired article mentions it, but their main thrust isn't gem grade diamonds for jewelry. It's for Military applications and to replace silicon as the material of choice in the computing industry.  Intel HATES Apollo more than DeBeers does I'd wager.
Ethical and responsible people tend to avoid the jewelry business.
Okay, I'm sure we can all agree that should be the nail in the coffin for that theory.
Appropriate.
Does someone have the torrents to all his shows? I want to save them for my kids - I also saw his shows when I was 5 back in 85 and he stood out as the most amazing person.  In fact his show actually made me 'think' about things besides my toys and exponentially increased my curiosity in everyday life. I used to love his 'virtual' trips to the dairy, auto factory, and so on. I even loved the post-man and I remember that I used to try to talk like him to everyone I met so that I'd be polite. So long Mr. Rogers! There are at least a few generations that will always love you! I wished your re-runs were made part of elementary classroom. :'-S
Corporate conspiracy
Yea, well, you're not worried now, but I'm sure the Big Diamond industry will conspire against you and make looking at patterns through rings the new hip thing to do.
Hardness does not equate to brittleness.  You're referring to the Mohs Hardness Scale, which is a relative scale for what things can scratch each other (diamond actually being a 10, and talc being a 1).   My ceramic kitchen knife is hard as hell.  So hard that it will probably never need to be sharpened in my lifetime.  But if I drop it on the tile floor, it will shatter.  Idiot.
Umm, actually they aren't. That's one of the reasons why it's the calmest part of the country.
About [racism and Gandhi](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j-QK35hYIWo) from this episode of [Penn &amp; Teller's Bullshit](http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-4935138732025185923&amp;q=bull+shit+gandhi)
&gt;Two officers — one a rookie, the other an eight-year veteran — had been responding to the same report of a man with a gun when their cruisers collided at a downtown intersection. What was this supposed man with a gun doing?  Was he actually directly threating bodily harm on anyone?  If not what's the huge rush.  Overzealous police also killed two people in MD this week when they were chasing a speeding motorcycle and collided with a civilian's car pushing it into oncoming traffic.  On the bright side the remaining family members probably never have to work again.
OH PLEASE!  My family have owned independent jewelry stores going back to my great-great grandfather.  Oh, and guess what, we have pictures of him selling DIAMOND ENGAGEMENT RINGS before the DeBeers campaign that SUPPOSEDLY drove the nation into madness. @.@ Anywho, the ONLY diamonds we have that are DeBeers sourced are ones that come in jewelry we purchase from designers, and it's all Kimberley Certified.  You can check out our website.  www.cranstouncourt.com  It's a little out of date, but should be fine.  All of our loose diamonds we buy from independent Israelis (who buy from the Canadians too), they give us the best deals. ^.^ You can also check out www.diamondfacts.org for more general information.
Ah, I love the smell of ghettoization in the morning! 
Two months' salary is way more than I've ever had the luxury of seeing at one time. Frankly she's lucky that I don't laugh in her face for already demanding *six months' rent*.
[This comes from the sneak peek at the creationism museum.](http://studentweb.eku.edu/zachary_lynn/museum/index.html)
Hang on...London IS a terrorist attack site!  First the IRA, then the subway bombings in 2005. Note to original poster: there's nothing LIKELY about it!
&gt;Mindful of the collapse in pearl prices that followed the introduction of cultured pearls, Apollo has set the prices for  most of its stones at 15% below that of mined diamonds, a figure it says it set after interviewing customers in focus  groups. But its pricing structure could change as competitors perfect their own colorless diamond-making techniques.  -WSJ 1/13/2007
Iraq end game
A documentary that doesn't show the act is likely legal everywhere.  I think there was one at Cannes this year?
Really? You can be in the IRR and be discharged?  Aren't you required to sign an oath of enlistment in the IRR.....? I'm in the Navy's IRR, and I've never heard of this.  Is it a Marine corps thing?  How perplexing.
They are, just like gold is.  How much GOLD have you bought at retail prices?  I'd suggest that all the gold you have purchased has been at retail, and not wholesale. Diamonds and other gemstones have been going up in value like gold and platinum, I watch the markets every day, I have to.
&gt;Maybe Scalia will someday get to pass judgment on a law legalizing the act of drinking and driving with your unfastened children in the car. I'm pretty sure that will never happen.  Now, why is a father responsible for what his grown, married daughter does?
It doesn't seem to be going the deflation route. Hyper-inflation is more likely. The US government is just dumb enough to try to print its way out of the problem.
3d support in this version...can't wait to try WOW on it ;-)
I'd like them to apologize for Lynyrd Skynyrd
He *did* pressure the government, didn't you read the article?
There is an episode of Bullsh!t that covers Ghandi and Mother Theresea which discusses Ghandi's racist tendencies including quotes that are not equivocations.  Assuming the quotes are accurate, he was a racist with some pretty abhorent opionions of black africans in particular.
But the choice a Muslim woman has is different from the choice a Western woman has. Ultimately, yes, the Muslim can choose not to wear a burqa and/or show public affection, but if she does she may have to give up her family; in fact, her family may even try to *kill* her. The Western woman faces no such dilemma. In fact when you compare the two the Muslim woman faces so much stigma and indeed perhaps even physical danger, that you can hardly call it a choice at all. If I put a gun to your head and tell you to give me your money, you still have a choice; but it is not the same choice you would have if I demanded it without the gun. And, this is not a question of condemning the woman; it is a question of condemning a practice of a culture which *effectively* prohibits basic rights of self-expression.
Is that the setup for a joke? ;)
How do I download these in a nice .avi format? Is that possible?
Never mind the relentless downmodding, you're not alone in your battle!
Do you just enjoy making yourself sound stupid?  At least google it before you try to imply something is wrong. In the first 5 responses(query = "burning diamonds"), without even clicking the links, I can find that, yes, diamonds do burn (combust, really), that in normal air they burn at about 1560 degrees Fahrenheit, and that since they are almost pure carbon, that when they react with oxygen, they turn completely into carbon dioxide and leave no ash. http://www.chem.wisc.edu/~newtrad/CurrRef/BDGTopic/BDGtext/BDGDmnd.html http://www.newton.dep.anl.gov/askasci/chem00/chem00202.htm http://www.bwsimon.com/articles/LastingForever.htm   
Interesting....
Having the capability of sinking an aircraft carrier anytime you like, and it being unable to escape without your detecting and destroying it, that counts as holding it hostage. You do not need to board it to take it hostage.
Because most jewelers don't want to deal with the legal hassle of selling used goods that comes along with the CRAZY Pawn Shop laws that exist in most states.  Honestly.  It's been a PAIN in the ASS to convince my Father to buy diamonds from the public. The whole thing is changing now though and many more jewelers are pushing for more logical laws regarding jewelry re-purchasing and selling, as well as actually doing so. My company is actually holding an event in October where we will be purchasing for a week, once that goes well I'm trying to set up a permanent purchasing center in our store.  No Joke.
Bit of a stretch to tack McCain's "I agree" onto O'Reilly's "White Christian Male Power structure" line. Just saying...
stumbleupon is the greatest thing to happen to the web since google IMHO. You should give it another go before ebay ruins it.
I know for sure about India and Pakistan, but apparently "Polygamy remains on the books in most Islamic countries, but some countries limit it through legislation. It is banned in Tunisia and Turkey, though reportedly it is still practiced in some areas of Turkey." (from http://www.cfr.org/publication/8034/) Actually a google search on "islam polygamy", for example, produces lots of results.
Hehe.. Smartypants is implying whether the only diamonds you have seen are online screenshots.  He was skeptical since you sounded like such an "expert" - but your explanation below about your family business I think clears up all doubts.  A lot of readers here just "talk out of their ass"...
Like [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fbGkxcY7YFU)?
It is 'an' only if it is a vowel *sound* - spoken English having taken precedence over written English. I'm sure someone will disagree with me. :)
Well, yeah, except all that shit and vomit eating *can't* be good for you.
Just *try* to buy a Tesla.  And unless I'm mistaken, those hybrids (and whatever you'd carpool in) need some gas to run.
- Son, why are you watching horse porn? - Because I prefer to jerk off to sick stuff instead of becoming the parent of a failed deuche.
OK, after skimming your post history you definitely have a thing for diamonds (own a jewelery store maybe?), but you aren't just a diamond shill. So, shine on you crazy diamond merchant! Shine on.
Being on IRR myself (tomorrow will me my first anniversary of freedom from the Marines), I'm very interested in what's going on here. But, there are some things getting shot around in the Wonkette article and again here. First off, he wasn't "drafted." Kokesh signed a contract that involved time in the IRR and should have been aware of what that entails. I sure do--and I still have about two and a half years left. The extent of your rights to free speech and other such things during this time are questionable.  Anyway, continuing on. He wasn't re-discharged "dishonorably." The discharge they have so far tried to accomplish is "other than honorable." Yes, I know they sound like they're the same thing, but they're actually not. Wonkette implies that there's something fishy about the hearing being held in Kansas City. Not quite. That's simply where the Marine Corps Mobilization Command is located and they handle issues with IRR Marines. Okay, last thing. Based on what I've read on his site, he's not in trouble for free speech issues. He's in trouble for wearing portions of the Marine Corps utility uniform at the 'ceremony' (IE: the camouflage uniform). For those that don't understand the regulations on such things, there's two that pertain. First off, he's not allowed to wear the stuff off-base unless specifically authorized. Secondly, you're very limited in the types of things you can say and do when wearing any uniform, lest people think you're representing the armed forces. If he did everything in jeans and a t-shirt, he'd be fine. Hopefully nobody thinks I'm trying to say that what is going on here is "okay." I'm simply trying to apply some brakes to a story that is becoming a little sensationalized. Also, it is very likely that this has little or nothing to do with politics and more to do with the Marine Corps enforcing regulations. And the Corps takes regulations very seriously.
I like the aiming suggestions. In movies they usually just hold the mirror out and flash it aimlessly.
Yes, 1560 Fahrenheit, why just yesterday in Phoenix it got to 1600 degrees. And what temperature does CZ and Moissanite burn up at? What temperature does the HUMAN BODY BURN AT? Have you ever heard of HTHP?  IT's what Gemisis uses to create their diamonds.
"Shrill" connotes an annoying, bitchy woman, which is precisely the image the rightwing bought priesthood wants to impress on the Democrats. Democrats are "shrill", "girly men", the "Breck Girl", "French", "faggots", "sissies", "weaklings", "hysterical", "whiners", "bitches", "nannies", [not man enough for the job](http://www.raisethehammer.org/blog/523). It's pure propaganda, part of a carefully planned and executed program for framing the debate in such a way that the Republicans are strong protectors and the Democrats are weak appeasers.
Ah, but think of the improvement in general health.
Try it, yes. Buy it, no.
Convenience?  I'd say survival.  Try to go without any sort of store (or restaurant) bought foodstuff. Shelter yourself without store bought materials...
I never said he wasn't an idiot, but that doesn't mean it didn't happen. In your "real" world, people never make mistakes or have accidents? But again: why do you care so much about my personal choices?
I knew about this because I read it in a Sidney Sheldon book. Hehe.
I'm not a shill, I'm trying to be honest about them.  I think that the more REAL information people actually know about diamonds, the more TRUTH that is out there, the better off we all will be. Hell, I've been anti-DeBeers since I was in grade-school, and I bet most of you didn't even know what the Four Cs where then.  ;-) I'm a fifth Generation Jeweler.
**Lisp/Scheme/Ruby hackers** - Please enlighten this fool Python programmer (me) about "*closures*". What is the definition of closures to a Lisp/Scheme Hacker?  =========================================================== Specifically, I have seen the term "closure" used to describe mechanisms that are expressed/implemented as separate mechanisms in Python. Even more specifically in Python: "lambda", "statically nested scoping (lexical scoping)", "Resource-Release Support", "Enhanced Generators/Coroutines" My understanding is that the term "closure" describes a more general concept, that can be used to implement "lambda", "statically nested scoping (lexical scoping)", "Resource-Release Support", "Coroutines", and more.  I wish to get a better grasp of general "closures", as Lisp/Scheme hackers understand them. I hope to use Python code and pseudo code as much as possible.  I have some confidence in my ability to grok arbitrary S-expressions from Lisp or Scheme, but I will always attempt to translate them right away into Python-like pseudo code.  If I mis-translate, please alert me. I am hoping the concepts transcend being described only in S-expressions. What prompted this was the talk of adding "closures" to Java.  They seem to be using the term "closure" in the same way Lisp/Scheme programmers do. http://www.javac.info/closures-v05.html Most descriptions of "closures"   ( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Closure_(computer_science) for example ), are vague, heavy on the buzzwords, light on code/pseudo code, and don't even specifically cover all the (quite conventional) uses that I will talk about here.  So they don't satisfactorily explain the general concept of "closures" to me. Please indulge this fool Python programmer, while I try to describe the four Python concepts, that are often described as instances of using "closures". (In Python, we use namespaces instead of scopes, we consider statements different than expressions, we have to add syntax/keywords where you could just use hygienic macros, etc.  I hope the concepts are still clear, regardless.) Four Python concepts, related to closures  ========================================= 1) **lambda**  &gt;&gt;&gt; f = lambda x: x * 2   &gt;&gt;&gt; f(3)   6 Basically, in Python, functions are first level objects, and you create them in an expression using the "lambda" syntax. 2) **statically nested scoping (lexical scoping)**  &gt;&gt;&gt; def f1(a):   ...  def f2(b):   ...   return a * b   ...  return f2   &gt;&gt;&gt; f = f1(2)   &gt;&gt;&gt; f(3)   6   &gt;&gt;&gt; f = f1(3)   &gt;&gt;&gt; f(3)   9  Basically, Python stores the binding between a name and a value/object in a namespace.  Python implements "lexical scoping" by chaining the namespaces referenced.  If a name is not defined in a function's scope, it references the namespace corresponding to the "outer" scope (the scope where the function was defined). In this example, "a" is defined in the scope where the function "f2" is created, so inside of "f2", you can reference "a". 3) **Resource-Release Support** (implemented with Enhanced Generators, the "with" and "as" keywords, and the "contextlib" module) Here is an example of a database transaction where we want to be careful to "rollback" if an unhandled exception is raised, or otherwise "commit":  from contextlib import contextmanager  @contextmanager   def db_transaction (connection):    cursor = connection.cursor()    try:     yield cursor    except:     connection.rollback()     raise    else:     connection.commit()   db = DatabaseConnection()   with db_transaction(db) as cursor:    ... "contextmanager" is some boiler-plate code that "decorates" a generator.  The boiler-plate code is mainly to implement `__enter__` and `__exit__`, giving the `__exit__` method the chance to run code in an "try... except/else/finally" code block in the original generator.  In this case, `__exit__` makes sure the "except:" or "else:" code blocks get run, depending on if an unhandled exception was raised. 4) **Enhanced Generators/Coroutines** Python's generators are factories for objects with a "next" method, where execution can be resumed with continued calls to "next", and where "state" is preserved during suspension.  &gt;&gt;&gt; def fib():   ...  a, b = 0, 1   ...  while True:   ...   yield b   ...   a, b = b, a + b   &gt;&gt;&gt; f = fib()   &gt;&gt;&gt; [f.next(), f.next(), f.next(), f.next(), f.next()]   [1, 1, 2, 3, 5]   &gt;&gt;&gt; f.next()   8  The "state" in variables "a","b" is preserved during suspension.  The state is deleted when "f" falls out of scope, etc.  "fib" is a factory function, I can call it whenever I want a new Fibonacci sequence beginning with [1, 1]. Python has enhanced generators in 2.5, now they can accept values along with outputting values.  You can "send" a value to a generator, for it to use as it wishes. Here we implement a counter with a generator, and use "send" to change the counter when we wish:  def counter(maximum):    i = 0    while i &lt; maximum:     val = (yield i)     # If value provided, change counter     if val is not None:      i = val     else:      i += 1   &gt;&gt;&gt; it = counter(10)   &gt;&gt;&gt; print it.next()   0   &gt;&gt;&gt; print it.next()   1   &gt;&gt;&gt; print it.send(8)   8   &gt;&gt;&gt; print it.next()   9   &gt;&gt;&gt; print it.next()   Traceback (most recent call last):  File ``t.py'', line 15, in ?    print it.next()   StopIteration  (The other enhancement to generators is to allow a "yield" inside of a "try... except/else/finally" block.  This is exactly how "resource-release support" is implemented with enhanced generators.) With the ability to "send" data into a generator, we can implement coroutines. Here are 2 generators, both with internal state that we wish to abstract away.  One "inputs" images and "outputs" images made up of thumbnails.  The other "inputs" images and writes them as sequential filenames to a directory.  We wish to "pipeline" the two together, and we don't want to have to worry about the internal state they need to maintain.  @consumer   def thumbnail_pager(pagesize, thumbsize, destination):    while True:     page = new_image(pagesize)     rows, columns = pagesize / thumbsize     pending = False     try:      for row in xrange(rows):       for column in xrange(columns):        thumb = create_thumbnail((yield), thumbsize)        page.write(         thumb, col*thumbsize.x, row*thumbsize.y        )        pending = True     except GeneratorExit:      # close() was called, so flush any pending output      if pending:       destination.send(page)     # then close the downstream consumer, and exit      destination.close()      return     else:      # we finished a page full of thumbnails, so send it      # downstream and keep on looping      destination.send(page)  @consumer   def jpeg_writer(dirname):    fileno = 1    while True:     filename = os.path.join(dirname,"page%04d.jpg" % fileno)     write_jpeg((yield), filename)     fileno += 1    # Put them together to make a function that makes thumbnail   # pages from a list of images and other parameters.   #   def write_thumbnails(pagesize, thumbsize, images, output_dir):    pipeline = thumbnail_pager(     pagesize, thumbsize, jpeg_writer(output_dir)    )   for image in images:     pipeline.send(image)   pipeline.close() (This example is taken directly from Python PEP 342 http://www.python.org/dev/peps/pep-0342/ , which gives more details) What really falls under the word "closure"?  =========================================== 1) What other common usages for "closures" are there? 2) Is there a benefit to keeping the term "closure" as broad as it currently is?  (People use the word "closure" to describe very limited functionality, or a very broad range of functionality.  I find it doesn't aid communication about code.) 3) Python question: What form of "closure" is Python lacking, currently that cannot be cleanly implemented in other ways? 4) Ruby question: How do Ruby "blocks" relate to closures?  Matz describes them as different: http://www.artima.com/intv/closures.html 5) Ruby question: How do you implement "Resource-Release Support", "Coroutines" in Ruby?
Yes he is on IRR, and therefore can be reactivated at any time.  One can get multiple discharges from Active or Reserve duty during one period of enlistment.  Basically, you get DD214 discharge papers anytime you transistion from Active duty to reserve or from reserve to IRR status.  My info is old, so maybe something has changed, but I doubt it.  As is typical in politics, there seems to be some attempt at muddying the waters here.  He clearly is still a member of the US military, but the headlines/blogs seem to be trying to mislead folk in that respect by mentioning the discharge. There are several different kinds of discharges that can be given.  IIRC, anyone who gets an other than honorable (OTH) can petition for an honorable discharge after 6 months.  In my experience, the hearers of that petition will generally grant the request for an honorable discharge. Since I've never been asked for my discharge papers, I'm not sure what employer would care about a dishonorable discharge, except the Federal government.  As the individual, I would certainly care if I was being shafted.
If by uncompressing two files with different bitrates you got identical files, why would they bother to do the higher bitrate one?
Only luxury items get markups far in excess of 100%. 100% is the minimum markup for diamond rings. My guess is that diamonds haven't been going up but simply the US dollar has been going down. There is a huge world of difference. The metals have genuinely been going up.
I wonder if this is just a seektable or something similar.   I know MP3 isn't natively capable of sample-exact seeking, but it's simple to build a table to accomplish it.  This might be a similar fix for some AAC issue.
Like I stated before, private armies are incredibly fucking scary and standing armies are just as fucking scary and privatizing any form of direct/indirect combat operations needs to be outlawed immediately. Not tommorrow. Like now.  While money is flowing through our government like it was nothing it would be highly likely and very easy to go nuts with war profiteering on a whole nother level.  The founders never ever saw this coming and there are people taking advantage of this on profit alone.  Also IF THIS WAS A REEEEEAAL WAR WE WOULDN'T NEED A PRIVATE ARMY.  Real patriots who question the government would be out there with our lives on the line defending our home and our country and our way of life cause we believed in it.  WHY DO I NEED SOMEONE ELSE TO PROTECT MY HOME?!?!??!  ITS MY HOME, I'LL DEFEND IT WHEN I NEED TO.
The current Whitehouse reminds me of Grot from the second season of The Rise and Fall of Reginald Perrin. Except that Grot was successful in spite of Reggie's hiring the wrong person for every job. 
Oh yes, I can see that. ;) I am a professional expert. You can find my horrible and outdated photo at: http://www.arizonajewelers.org/board.html I'm the second picture down on the left.
Yes, those poor cops. FTA: "Lehigh County District Attorney Jim Martin asked residents for "patience and an open mind" as he determines whether to file charges against the officers. They were placed on paid leave pending the results of state police and internal investigations." They're on paid vacation now I don't mean to be so flippant but really, isn't hearing the reaction of the mother enough? She never gets to hold her little boy again, ever.
I wish I could "help" them.
A really interesting look at what Web 2.0 is, and how you can use it to benefit your business.
Messing with a MOOSE is a bad idea, but here is what you do when you piss one off
Damn it, there goes my favorite Urban Legend.  26 confirmed Sniper Kills in Vietnam.
I demand you offer a service for me!
I guess this is kind of useful. I'm on that cusp, where youth has kept me fairly healthy, but I don't have good habits, so I'm flailing about trying to figure out how to set them.
  Yes, here's [the story in the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel on Sept. 20, 2000.](http://www2.jsonline.com/news/metro/sep00/uw20091900a.asp), three months before the dateline on the Onion article.
AGAIN! YOU ARE WRONG!  I might just stop replying to you. MOST Jewelers get 100% (or keystone as it's called in the industry) on diamonds if they're REALLY LUCKY.  Costco, Blue Nile, and the other mass diamond sellers have seen to that.  Diamonds are the loss leaders these days in any reputable diamond store. We only get about 50% mark-up on average and then net about 20% profit after that after costs. Color Gemstones, watches, and the whatnot are more profitable for us, even if they each cost less than a single diamond.
Zantarni is a wonderful role play and community experience. It's a great place to have fun and met new exciting people. --  Eidorian
How is any of that relevant to whether or not a diamond will burn?   You implied they do not burn.  House fires can burn at temperatures past 2000 degrees, plenty hot to burn up diamonds left inside.
Considering his "joke" and that he's working for Walmart, maybe he should commit suicide to help increase the average IQ.
Done and done, dcowboy.  (edit: oh crap, I meant to reply.)
Why do you hate America so much?
Yes, that's true, but then again they're not going to sell their diamonds to just the military, re-read my post.  I said MAIN thrust. Their BIGGEST problem is getting Gem Quality stones consistently AND this is the BIG one, Actually getting Diamond Jewelers to sell their product. We've looked at Gemisis, but our market isn't in that area (we're situated in a retirement community and do anniversary  gifts mostly).
You are a fifth-generation perpetrator of the lie that if he *really* loved you, he would delay marriage or go into debt to waste 16% of a year's salary on a functionless, valueless, lump of rock. You are obviously proud of being a fifth-generation jeweller. But when I read that, I see it as "fifth-generation serial fraudster", and if it was me, I'd probably not want people to know.
This is a fine idea, but the "WHALES ARE DYING AT ALARMING RATES" ad I was served just cracked me up.
... said Tim Allen as he brandished a lambda-shaped chainsaw.
Someone should sue this guy.
Hard to imagine that somebody could believe that either of the two parties who have exclusive control of the totality of American government on every level have a cause that includes "resisting concentrations of power."   No wonder the news is so full of garbage when there's so many people willing to believe anything they are told without even a modicum of rational thought.
Well, if you're not a BDSMer, it's probably a bit hard for you to "get".  But you seem to be operating under the assumption that these people are weak, or that there is something wrong with them.  Not so. There are many people in this world who would rather be followers than leaders, who like pleasing others, who find giving up responsibility comfortable.  And some of those people get a specifically sexual charge out of doing just that.  It's no stranger than some of *your* fetishes. Yes, you, you sicko.
And the .00001% that were telling the truth when they claim to have never masturbated.
Many of us at the office that morning were surprised at the precipitating fall. I know I was. It looked like the stuff of movies. I never once believed a single plane, small in comparison to the massive buildings, could bring each of those towers down. Despite the chaos on the ground, these two events seemed timed and orderly. It was a frightening day. Should this have been an orchestrated maneuver by government insiders, I just hope to live long enough to witness that the truly culpable are brought to justice.
Exactly. Abolish sodas and sugary drinks and I'd bet cash money that you'd see this act reflected in a lowering of the rate of new cases of diabetes.
|...and a shame the mob reacted that way. ...I guess... Frankly, I don't blame them at all.  There is no excuse for two police who are both trained for extreme driving conditions to wreck. And when you see a kid cut in half by some bonehead, throwing a rock or a bottle IS showing restraint. I'm sure the officers are devastated. But being sorry isn't worth a hell of a lot at a time like this.
I did not imply that they didn't burn. EVERYTHING BURNS FOR CHRISTS SAKE!  LOOK AT THE SUN! I was laughing at his statement that Diamonds burn JUST LIKE CHARCOAL.  They burn in a similar manner, but you can't heat your Victorian Mansion with Diamonds. ;) House fires?  Really, that's cool, but I've actually seen diamonds after house fires, and I've never recalled seeing melted or ashed diamonds before, much less heard of that.
Brilliant. Simple. Very cool
I consider Mosul and Kirkuk to be a good enough representation http://www.fcnl.org/images/iraq/iraq_multiple_bases.jpg (Note US FOB's seem to be considered true "bases" more by insurgents than by US forces themselves....meh)
What "serious flaws?" I have not experienced any. Mine has been great. I have 2 coworkers with them. No problems.
I was trying to be polite. :)
The darcs branch has [floating](http://www.cse.unsw.edu.au/~dons/tmp/float.png)(.png)
afaict the problem you see with duck typing is simply that there is no static type check.
You need not lecture me on Kryptonian society.  Jor-El is very dear to my heart... you might even say, he is like a father to me. Crap!  I didn't say that. Sincerely yours, Cal-E... err, Cal-ark Kent.  Yes.  Calark Kent.
I think anyone that has lost a loved one in the war probably does.
That added a lot of context.  Thank you.  I disagree only with the idea that "this has little or nothing to do with politics and more to do with . . . regulations."  I wish that were true, but I have trouble imagining that this man would be facing the same zealous enforcement of regulations had he worn the utility uniform at a pro-war, pro-administration protest.
But what if you're already resigned to your moosey fate?
Check out [GoboLinux](http://www.gobolinux.org/). It puts every application together and gives it its own directory tree, kind of like OS X's apps (but not really).
And to add to that,  Moissanite (silicon carbide) burns at 1600-2500 degrees.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Silicon_carbide And cubic zirconia melts at 2700 degrees.  I'm not sure at what point it will "burn".  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Zirconia I couldn't quickly find the minimum ignition point for humans, but seeing as how a fresh corpse is still mostly water, I would imagine it would have to be pretty high. Human bodies are cremated at 1600-1800 degrees though. And yeah, HTHP is what they use.  But if you start mucking around with both temperature *and* pressure, you get wildly varying melting, boiling, and burning points.  Also irrelevant to diamonds burning.
So how many years were people saying "Yuo R Teh Lamest For All Caps!!111!!"? Thank God for Remington!
&gt; How do you get to be this kinked up at only 21? You're born that way.  Most of us kinked up people can look at stuff we were thinking, saying and doing at age 4-6, and identify the signs of how we would be kinked up later.  Now, if you will excuse me, I have to go slap someone around. :) 
Is Your fate Moosey? or Mooseless?
Because they don't ash, they turn completely into carbon dioxide when they burn.  Anything hot enough to burn a diamond would have melted away any gold, silver or possibly even platinum that was holding onto it.  A titanium band would be about the only common jewelry metal that has a higher melting point than the ignition temperature of diamond.  Not saying what you saw didn't survive a house fire, because not all houses will burn at the same temperature.
You realize that Wonkette's not written by a woman any more, right?  It's no longer Anna Marie Cox's snarky comedy gossip page.  It's now a fairly alarmist DailyKos-ish propaganda rag by two men.  I hate to say that (as a liberal).  But I really liked Anna Marie.  Come back, Anna Marie!  Save your website!
i can't believe that even on his blog people are trying to argue that "if (s == String.Empty)" is perferable.
I downloaded and tried the Fedora 7 Live i686 CD from the torrent site. I must say, wow. I've tried it on my Thinkpad T41p and my desktop. Firstly, it's great that Fedora finally have an official LiveCD, and I think it's great. It's simple to use, it allows you to install to hard disk, load in to RAM, yet it doesn't scare the new to Linux away with tons of non-graphical stuff. I love the new artwork and the general aesthetics. Something I think that Fedora has always been strong on. And, I must say that not only did it suspend to RAM properly on my laptop, well almost properly, being a LiveCD install it wanted to access somewhere on the file system that it couldn't so there were a few tiny graphical glitches. But it actually reported the SELinux error in the new trouble shooter. The LiveCD is fast and allowed me to get a good feel of the new release. Fedora 6 had some issues on release, that really shouldn't have been there, but I think they deserve congratulations on not only merging Core and Extras but providing a really high quality, more user friendly release, a completely free tool chain and LiveCD release.
Don't forget Kennedy forged a deal with Ted Stevens (the internet is a pipe) to help kill this project. The irony of this is delicious.  This is the true character of the Kennedy's.  There is the governed and governing.   There was show on community television on the cape absolutely skewering the "elite" who oppose this project, it was a riot.
So who should I vote for, then?
It is on the front page now and will have 9 comments after I make this one.
I'd rather know how to stop adults from whining, actually.
The real kicker here was the offer to let the students have the diplomas if they performed 8 hours of community service.  Outrageous.  I am sorry that I didn't get the school's side of the story but it sounds pretty cut and dried-- monitors patrolling the audience decided which students got too much applause and then singled them out for punishment.  How could the principal possibly defend his actions?  Even if the students and audience were warned ahead of time, it sounds like the monitors made arbitrary and personal decisions.
stupid Opera
So because people use "logic" rather than a stupid belief that "America is the greatest, yaa~!," they're a bigot? Most Americans (and yes I'm one of them) do not want to believe that our government is as corrupt as they come--and when corrupt politicians assume authority over the strongest military in the history of man-kind, bad things happen. Hundreds of thousands (~650 in Iraq over the last 4 years) of citizens die as a result. Countries get destroyed. Our own soldiers get dishonored from the top down. And Russia turns from a quasi-friend (the Clinton years) to a nuclear-armed-enemy once again.. But right, these are just 'bigoted' views..............
Great article! I told my husband all about the BS diamond scam, how diamonds are NOT precious, they're really semi-precious. I don't even think they're that pretty, I like emeralds, rubies etc. much better. I told to spend the cash on a down payment on a house instead!!!
Yes, well your knowledge of the industry is a lot less complete than mine. Did you check out the link I gave earlier? http://www.arizonajewelers.org/board.html See the motto of our group.  I'll hasten to add that one of my majors in college was philosophy in which Ethics and Business Ethics were some of my favorite courses.   I am FOUR-SQUARE AGAINST delaying marriage and Debt for a Diamond Ring. My parents bought an inexpensive Opal when they got engaged.  I DIDN'T go into debt when I JUST bought my Fiance her Diamond Engagement Ring last October, and I am certainly not going to force that sort of issue on ANYONE. I know for a FACT that My Father, my grandfather (the only two left alive) and I have NEVER EVER forced someone to buy a piece of jewelry of any sort that we KNEW they couldn't afford.  IN FACT, one of the most IMPORTANT questions we ask is what the person's budget is, and we work DOWN from their maximum amount not UP, like some slimy car dealer would. We have also happily accepted and fully refunded people who have returned and said they couldn't afford a piece of jewelry.  We also provide a lay-away service, something no mall jeweler I know of does, and also do extensive researching in the diamond markets to find the perfect diamond our customers. We LIVE and DIE by our Reputation, and EVERY one of our Customers LOVES us for being the honest and reputable jeweler that we are.
Yeah, you have to aim it properly. Also, do not blind the pilot of an aircraft with the flash or you are going to have to rescue him!
Sometimes, I find building codes and permits to be needlessly complicated and petty in the United States.  Then, this happens and reminds me that over-regulation in this area isn't nearly as bad as under-regulation.   
Both. Thank you. If you think that democrats are dirt poor farm boys just trying to get a fair shake for the working man then you are wrong. Both parties are swimming in money like Scrooge McDuck.
If you were on the Cape and read the local coverage, I think you would see it differently.  The people most vocally against just happen to be Democrats, wealthy blue blood democrats.  Including Walter Cronkite.
Start with the history of the term (start with the top thread and read the interesting comments): http://groups.google.com/group/comp.lang.scheme/browse_thread/thread/f3ddc368411c6060/a0504aa07f07f49a?lnk=st&amp;q=closure+history+comp.lang.functional&amp;rnum=1#a0504aa07f07f49a   
Several huge stones shaped like flying saucers have been discovered recently at a construction site in Shangrao County, east China's Jiangxi Province. The Information Daily reported each of those stones measures some three or four hundred kilograms
Fine, I just think that 2000 degree house fires where the diamonds are in the middle of that 2000 degrees are rare. But I never implied anything that wasn't Completely true.  SO suck it.  argue about something relevant.
Staid article typical of Putin - BREATHLESS ATTACHED HEADLINE CLAIM!
I'm sure the $2K makes a big difference...
In his glowing review of gay blogger Mike Rogers, Yahoo´s Kevin Sites seems to have suffered from a bit of amnesia. Sites neglected to report that Rogers failed to follow through with his alleged outing of Republican Sen. Larry Craig of Idaho.
Ever wonder if they don't have an agenda?
If you think so go to an independent reputable jeweler (Member of the JA, etc.) and ask them to educate you about the Blood Diamond Scare and Moissanite and CZ and everything and make your decision then. Don't go off half-cocked into some purchase because someone scared you with images of mushroom clouds and yellow cake uranium, oh sorry, I meant bad intelligence. ;)
It's an old photoshop joke (n00bs would claim anything was 'shopped and talk like an expert): [Google: "I can tell by some of the pixels"](http://www.google.com/search?source=ig&amp;hl=en&amp;q=%22I+can+tell+by+some+of+the+pixels%22&amp;btnG=Google+Search) Interesting posts, though!
Misogynistic much? Honestly, some of us don't want *stuff*. Or, even have a good job and buy our own stuff. When I got married, I had already bought a house and a car on my own.  I actually married the man because (gasp) I love him as a person, not a wallet.
Yeah.  Some people would say that it would distract from the main page, but it'd just take out a lot of the crap...and go ahead and submit serious videos to the main one, of course.
Looks to me like advertising spam.
True, but Diamonds aren't terribly brittle. Platinum is less brittle than a diamond, but it's also not as hard. Brittleness is almost a non-factor in regards to gemstone diamonds.
Snoring and demands are the point! :(
I just watched those videos as well and had the exact same experience.  He was a truly great man and I am very glad that I got to watch him almost every day of my childhood.
No shit?...whatever.
I thought we were better than this. What happened to the days when the hot page was littered with actually *interesting* articles about important news? Have we really lowered ourselves to being entertained by pets? Where is the intelligence in this? Where is the controversy? Let's not forget plutocrat's amazing [comment](http://reddit.com/info/1q0d9/comments/c1q2py) about this topic. Do we really need to sit and watch these kind of links get more and more popular? Mind you, this isn't the first link of this type to end up on the front page this week. Let's get back in focus, everyone.
It does look really fake, but I can't put my finger on why. Unless it's just that my brain doesn't think that what the photo depicts is possible.
Ah.  Cool thanks.  Everything I've learned about Photoshop I've learned from my Publishing friend.
Yeah...we can do better. A lot better.
I think the idea is "He should have known better".  And suing him, should someone else become infected by him, is totally the right thing to do.  That is why negligence laws are on the books!
JCK Vegas, the single largest Jewelry show in the World.  I'm leaving Friday night, most people are already there for the conferences, but I'm staying later in the week for some after the show conference and so I didn't want to be gone too long.
Info on the link to scientology is on wiki http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Scientology_and_Werner_Erhard
&gt;more evolved Those two words put together are meaningless. Evolution doesn't have an endpoint, or a goal, or a direction. There's nothing to be further toward.
Yeah... my favorite of Mr. Robinson's was when Mr. T appeared, which made me wonder: How would Mr. T and Mr. Rogers get along in a show? Things that make you go Hmmmm.....
More like post pictures that....matter....  Like, for example, a chart of poverty/carbon emissions/nuclear weapons, etc.  Or even a bunch of really cool pictures. Not two pictures of a cat and a monkey.
Hi!  I'm ethical and Responsible, so is my father and grandfather, so were our two previous generations. K'Thanks. http://www.arizonajewelers.org/board.html That's me second from the top on the left, and here's my family's website. www.cranstouncourt.com
Example: The comments on Korea are simplistic and one-sided. Doesn't mention that North Korea invaded South Korea, or how many Americas died protecting South Korea. Do you claim South Korea is a vassel of the United States now, that it is not an independent nation? Do you claim both Koreas would have been been better off today if North Korea had won that war? If any of that is worth even mentioning, then the omission proves the presentation is a hack job with an agenda.
you can download the .flv file with a firefox plugin, play it in vlc player, flv player, or media player classic and expand it to your whole screen. But that's not the point.  The point is to see it, to get exposure for how radical and insane and abusive the religious right is.
Indian engineering
&gt; We only get about 50% mark-up on average and then net about 20% profit after that after costs. Well, that sounds believable. 20% profit is an enormously profitable business. By the way, there is something extremely off about your claims that diamonds are a commodity given you distinguish synthetic from natural diamonds. A good is a commodity when people are completely dispassionate towards it. Luxuries are automatically disqualified. So are brand-name items or anything else with a social or exclusionary cachet. By distinguishing between two physically, or nearly, identical stones on the basis of their origin you are applying emotional categories to diamonds. Which means, they are not a commodity.
No, the point is that in an situation where you can see them side by side to compare, like say a blind taste test, you can easily see that they're not the same. Two women, one with CZ earrings, and one with Diamond Earrings standing next to each other and you will see the difference.  CZs are pasty and white and diamonds are sparkly and brilliant.
I see no cat pics!
&gt;A reporter asked Ukec how he would describe the situation in Darfur. The ambassador compared it to the American West: "The farmers are being squeezed by the herders, just like you had here in the 18-something, when the cowboys were fighting . . . with the farmers over land for grazing." I want to see a debate between John Ukec Lueth Ukec and George Bush.
I sure do miss him, when I read on the newspaper that he died, I was having breakfast with my Dad (during a trip to LA), I clearly remember that I cried out loud, which is one of the very few times that I cried over someone's death.
nice idea
Indisputably. But Christian white males are the only ones who are taught to be ashamed of it.
With the way things are in the UK and indeed the US can you blame them? I'm surprised the percentage isn't higher.
For saving space and soil, this method also has several other benefits, including no soil-borne diseases, no weeds to pull and no soil to till, run-of-the-mill side benefits of soil-less gardening.
Check the current #3 [here](http://flickr.com/photos/kazzielah/50733910/in/set-518005/)
&gt; IF they are not obvious (which most of them are given the problem) This thread may have already disappeared into the bitrot, but my kneejerk response is: any sufficiently well-defined problem by definition has an obvious solution -- this is the basis of all the modern engineering disciplines. In the example of the "balanced and stabilized quicksort", if one of the problems is defined as: "sometimes when using quicksort, too many recursions are performed due to flip flopping nearly equivalent neighbors" -- the solution becomes obvious when you decide to figure out a way to reduce this recursion by detecting the situation. (Yet I would not say this particular patent is invalid due to obviousness, rather I would guess the best attack would be on prior art, as certainly at least some of these techniques would have been used prior to 1994...)
Traditionally it's been more appropriate for cats, which are famously condescending. Hence the expression when's it's all over: *to have let the cat out of the bag*.
&gt; guns in the hands of the law-abiding prevent crime But that's begging the question.  Our Hero in this story is guilty of reckless endangerment, though obviously his daughter won't press charges. 
Wow so much negativity! Here is the deal: If you cant afford to easily build up two months worth of salary, then you probably have other priorities (Debt, bad job etc), maybe rethink the whole getting married. But for those of you that can, go get what she wants. I know that sounds crazy, but seriously she has to wear the thing for the rest of her life (hopefully). Guys get off easily, a simple band, no one draws attention to it, your done! Most girls like pretty things, just like you like 60" TVs, SLI video cards, monkeys or football. And just like those things they like to show it off, directly or indirectly, just like you. Some girls like big rings and some like small rings (dangerous inuendo territory here, just try and ignore it), some like them shiny and some now. But she will know roughly what you can afford and what you cant, and if she is pushing for the things you cant afford, refer back to my first point. But at the end of the day, get her what she wants. If your worried about the ethics get a canadian, and explain it to her, guess what? she will like that! it gives her an additional little something to talk about. But trust me, there is nothing worse than being in a relationship where the bride didnt get what she wanted, ive seen it. There is a lot of crap that people want and there are some things that will hold a lot of meaning, the things that hold meaning, get it right, or you will regret it. Above all though, talk to her, get it right, get what she wants and ignore the advertising.
There are many people far more qualified than Cindy Sheehan to speculate and comment on the matter of collapsing steel structures.   Fortunately, some of them are doing so now.
I disagree, because one thing that anyone hasn't mentioned yet is that synthetics are still distinguishable from real natural diamonds.  Syns are TOO perfect, and a person can tell, unlike cultured pearls where the oyster is still making the pearl, just with a fake bead in the middle, syn diamonds are man-made completely. Hey, I'm not knocking syns, I'm just pointing out the differences.  I think they're a great thing for the diamond market, shake DeBeers up and get things moving again. Btw, 20% off the %50 profit is what?  10% which is no way to do business.  Most businesses like at least a 51% GMROI and diamonds are near 10% so how is that good? If I only sold diamonds I'd go out of business right quick. 
This is the best kitty post ever to be seen on reddit.
some people still don't get the whole Fahrenheit and Celsius thing...
Just remember this conversation in 08 :)
We're talking about Allentown. Very crime ridden. &gt;Residents tossed bottles and rocks at police and cursed at them following the accident, which took place in a poor, heavily minority neighborhood where tensions with police have run high. Several clergy members were called in to help restore order.  Odd, I had heard from the report this morning on the radio that the reason the crowd went nuts was because the police had blocked the roads and made it harder for the EMTs to get to the scene. I'm too tired to look it up now...too tired to find more bad news...goodnight.
10!
I don't even bother with the front page anymore.  Just try to catch the good stuff on the "new" page before it gets buried by cat pictures ;)
For electronics hacking, making cool stuff.
YA RLY!
So you think that the war has something to do with the 9/11 attacks?  Really?  Why would that be?  That's almost as weird as the "controlled demolition" idea.
I'm glad your posting some info anyway, thanks.  First time I've ever seen an informed opinion on reddit, I'm kind of in shock but slowly adjusting.
Diamonds aren't actually the hardest substance. Carbon nanotubes are actually harder. (edit: grammar)
Wow.  You don't seem to understand the system.  By default, information is considered to be unprotected. Now, in exchange for releasing certain kinds of work to the public (art, books, movies, music, software, inventions), the government grants you a *limited* protection for a *limited* period of time - reserving for you certain rights associated with that work to reward you for releasing the work to the public.  This is supposed to encourage you to continue with your work. So, the piece at the end of the article is merely modifying the terms of that protection, not eliminating it.  We are quibbling over where to draw the line, not if there is going to be a line.  To characterize it forcing people to open source their software - well, that is already the case.  Right now, it happens after 99 years, not 4.  Personally, I think 4 is closer to where it should be than 99 (this is copyright I speak of, by the way).
I'm sorry, the response I was looking for was: "Don't look for it, Mutatron. You may not like what you find."
Are there any videos of our soldiers doing nice things?
Top 60 million, no?
yes, scores of specialists swarmed the twin towers and installed explosives as well as weakened central supporting structures while the daily workers of the towers went about their daily duties.  After the 2 planes struck each of the buildings, the explosives (still perfectly aligned and wiring intact) were set off by Silverstein. Let me ask you a question...did you ever fucking step foot in the WTC before its destruction?  It would have been impossible to rig the building for demolition without people seeing the evidence.   so glad that Cindy Sheehan is on this band wagon now.  Her son was killled in Iraq so now she is an expert in 9/11?  why is that exactly?  
It is your comments that are, in fact, simplistic and one-sided. Read up on WHY the North Korean government invaded the South Korean side thus starting the Korean war. Read up on the preceding events -- in fact, its all in the wikipedia article for 'Korean War'. It clearly discusses how the U.S. meddled fiercely with Korean politics after WW2 (when the Japanese were kicked out). Democracy my ass. The Korean war wasn't simply an isolated act of aggression on the part of the North Korean forces. Yes, the new (at the time) North Korean forces were propped up by the Soviets; they weren't angels by any mean. They were pursuing their self-interst. But the U.S. pursued its objectives in Korea without prime concern for the welfare of the Korean people. If that had been the case, perhaps a unified Korea would be the political situation today. But, its prime concern had nothing to do with maintaining a united people. It's prime concern was halting Communism. Was that a worthy objective? Very often, yes, but very often too it blinded American foreign policy analysts to the problems they were causing or helping to foster or failing to help rectify. American foreign policy has always been aimed at bringing about the most for our self-interest. Nothing more.  For all the rhetoric, if the Marshall Plan to rebuild Europe after WW2 hadn't been in America's self-interest, it wouldn't have happened. The welfare of Western Europe was only taken into account based on what they could do for America (having a strong Western Europe would help bolster anti-Communist forces as well as acting as a buffer). That is only one example. The ironic thing, however, is that because foreign policy analysts almost always have a short-term outlook on their foreign policy pursuits, they don't have much concern for the long-term consequences of the aggregate of foreign policy actions. And what's the aggregate? A clear history of the U.S., by flexing its great muscle, pursuing a foreign policy of self-interest. The world looks at this and feels not very fond of us. Now, in the history of the world, this is far from unique. Virtually every power of any sort has had self-interest in foreign affairs as its sole concern! But the great tragedy isn't that America doesn't live up to its ideals of 'all men have equal worth in the eyes of God' - though that would be a policy of historic and unprecedented benevolence - it's that so many of our citizens believe we actually do hold up to those ideals. We simply don't. Lying to ourselves serves us very poorly.
Hey dudes, Chances are, you aren't going to have much luck convincing a girl to go without an engagement ring. The concept of a romantic wedding proposal (ring included!) has been set in our minds since preschool. Don't fight it, you will lose. Instead, try discussing ways both of you can be morally and emotionally satisfied. Since my boyfriend feels very strongly against buying diamonds (and I agree with him on many of his points) we have discussed alternate ring options. These include lab made diamonds, canadian diamonds, or using a different gem altogether for the setting. Agreeing to these or other options  makes it clear to your girlfriend that your decision is based on ethics rather than a reluctance to spend money on her.  And as a side bonus these options are usually cheaper that traditional rings. Most reasonable women don't want you to spend the rest of your life paying off a ring. Maybe you just disagree on forking over any significant amount of money for a piece of jewelry. That's fine. In most cases I would agree with you, but I do feel very strongly about having an engagement ring. Consider it small compensation for ruining my body to bear your progeny.  - A chick
"Boooooo." Are you the ghost of Mr. Rogers?
When you _really_ get into the nitty-gritty, as you have here, there are multiple valid definitions of "closure". It's similar to how there are multiple valid definitions of "object", though I think the range of validity for "object" is larger than for "closure". What I'd recommend is, just relax and don't sweat the terminology so much. Python does most of what it needs to do, and the next version of Python will do it all, per [PEP 3104](http://www.python.org/dev/peps/pep-3104/). Other languages do their things. It's not like you can pass a closure from one language to another anyhow.  Oh, and it's too late to change any of the definitions. Again, it'd be like trying to get people to agree what an object is in detail; that ship has sailed.
Agreed, and there are many worthier windmills for us to charge at than the diamond industry.  Human Rights, the Environment, UnCorrupt Democracy, Hell, plain ole Democracy. Yes, there are bad things in the Diamond Industry, but the Diamond Industry has been working to fix those bad things, things that I'd like to point out were started by GOVERNMENTS and Terrorists, not the Industry itself.  The INDUSTRY WROTE the Kimberley Process by itself without the Help of the UN or the US or ANYONE, even though we asked, and ONLY WHEN WE HAD FINISHED IT did all those Mutha Fuckas get on board. We've TRIED to be Reputable and upfront about this, and all we get is slapped in the face by the ignorant who think that they know that there was a war 10 years ago in Sierra Leone that EVERYONE in the Industry is either a Murderous Greedy Evil Mastermind or a Limbless Slave forced to work in some Hellhole for no money and the hope of getting AIDS.  Which is UTTER BULL SHITE.
That few, huh?
no shit.
HAHAHA so awesome. My favorite part: "Once the moose seems to have left the area, be very careful. Moose have been known to return in a short time in an attempt to get you again!"   
GDP growth should be around 3% to maintain parity with growing population and inflation. Consistent growth below that is as good as contraction. Still, you are correct in that one bad quarter does not indicate weakness. There will always be peaks and troughs in GDP growth, but there are many underlying factors that determine whether this is a blip (likely) or a harbinger of stagnation (not likely).
Reminds me of an episode of scrubs where turk is in the picture on the college brochure twice
Please don't forget that each of these PEPs required changing Python itself. Common Lisp didn't have to change in order for lispers to have generators. Perl, for instance, added an object system without having to do that. And so did Common Lisp before that, with CLOS.
I'm so glad to see this post. It gives me hope that reddit, once the most interesting and informative site on the web, will not continue its chintzy decline into a trivia bulletin board. I like animals, women and bikes (not necessarily in that order) but vote down every pet, hot chick and bike trick photo because reddit is not the place for that and they can be found in countless other, more appropriate places on the web.
&gt; Under a statement that wide, carriers are always held hostage. Not true. Saddam was incapable of sinking anything in the Persian gulf. &gt; when you only mean that you can attack it at any time. Strawman. Not "attack" it but SINK it. *Successfully* and *devastatingly* attack it *at any time*. &gt; Any country with cruise missiles has the ability to attack at any time. Yes. And in the past cruise missiles weren't good enough. And now they are. For those few countries that actually have them. As for your initial response, it was worded in such a way as to imply that acquiring anti-ship missiles was entirely pointless. I hope you understand this is stupid.
Well yes, but you can't actually walk around with a pretty carbon nano-tube on your figure that sparkles and gets noticed. ;) Although that would be PIMP! ;-) I want a space elevator building block on a pendant around my neck!  ^.^
Why is carpooling out in Atlanta? I'm curious. There's always an excuse that boils down to "I live in the US, so I *have* to drive a car, I have *no* choice whatsoever.". Now, I'm not saying this isn't true, but isn't it a sad state of affairs when it seems like Americans have NO CHOICE but to drive cars, and drive them a lot. I thought capitalism was supposed to give people exactly that - more choice, more freedom. Instead it has lead to an homogeneous society, with identi-kit malls, &amp; franchise chains that show as little character and variation as the worst communist nightmares projected in the 50s.  I honestly think something in the American psyche, something that was once positive, to do with the celebration of success, has blinded them to the dangers of monopolism. Monopolies poison markets, but in the last few decades have emerged again to stifle free enterprise in many areas, and more dangerously to stifle independent voices in the media. oops, went off on a bit of a rant there :)
Iraq != 9/11
I notice they don't mention the radio station was most likely a CIA operation(I'm still researching that) I'm still not too sure about Chavez, but he sure as hell is right about bush and US foreign policy!
I'm trying.  I've wasted two hours of my time to do so because I like reddit, and I am a philosoph.
thanks for input! democracy is the best form of governance available to us at this point-in-time. while the entire united states government has been corrupted at the top, this does not spell out dissolution of the system as a whole, without a Democracy, Liberty and the hope for real Freedom dies. Do you think a Democrat is the savior to all the ills of the current Government? Far from it friend. Zieg Heil Hillary! I say this honestly and truly, the only small glimmer of hope for America politics is Ron Paul. Mike Gravel shows the same insight but hes not nearly as coherent as Dr. Paul. American politics is an illusion, there is no LEFT RIGHT as the media leads you to believe, only beliefs, values , and interests, which are shared by modern Republicans and Democrats alike.
what a low-class comment
Something can not "border on libel." It is either libel, or it isn't. She doesn't need to indicate "some direction of where (she) got it from." Not indicating the source does not make it ant less true. It is only libel if it is not true.
Do you mean Turkey should keep silent when PKK(Kurdish Terrorists) is killing innocent people and USA is not doing anything against PKK? Turkey has right to clean PKK from Iraq, however I don't believe it will, because the people in Turkey does not want the army to get inside the Iraq hell.
libel: a false and malicious publication printed for the purpose of defaming a living person Now, if she can show evidence or cite a source of where she received this information of Bush jumping around, thumping his chest, I will retract my statement. Until then, it's a sourceless statement intended to make someone look foolish, i.e., defamation. 
Kyl Jon, behind closed doors.
I'll give you the proper definition. The term has picked up a lot of overtones from its applications, and some people use it colloquially to refer to functions which capture their lexically enclosing bindings (which is what closures are most commonly used to implement). The basic idea is this: a closure is simply a pair consisting of some code (represented with whatever structure you'd like, possibly an abstract syntax tree, but there are lower-level things you can do as well), and a map from the free variables of that code to values (like a hashtable, or any other kind of finite map), called the environment. The idea is that even though the code has free variables in it -- that is, variables which the code itself doesn't bind to values, the map will have bindings for those variables, and so the code can be executed, doing lookups as necessary. What sort of thing is this good for? Well, the most obvious thing to do is to use this sort of structure to implement lambdas and get first-class functions: whenever you need to evaluate a lambda, you create a closure whose code is basically the lambda itself, and for any variables inside the lambda which are not bound by the lambda itself, you simply record the local values into the map part of the closure, so you'll have access to them later when the function is applied. It's also possible, though unusual, to get partially-dynamic binding in this way -- any variable which is supposed to be dynamically bound, you simply don't store its value in the map, and when you go to execute the function, you look up the value dynamically whenever you can't find a binding in the map for one of the free variables of the code. This means that rather than the environment of the closure being a total function on the free variables, you have a partial function instead. Another thing you can do is implement objects: storing a piece of code which handles messages, and all the instance variables and methods of the object to into the environment. This case is interesting in that unlike with the case of functions which bind the variables in their lexical scope, it makes sense to modify the contents of the map directly later on. (Either by mutation, or by copying the value except to change the relevant bits of the map.) By contrast, with a function, it doesn't generally make much sense to mutate after the fact what was stored from the lexical scope it was defined in -- that might even be stranger than dynamic scope. It seems to be quite common though, to confuse the notion of a closure, with the notion of a function. Personally, I think that's slightly dangerous, particularly when there are people around who are going to have to ask what you mean, for instance, when you're talking about adding "closures" to a language which doesn't have them. That doesn't necessarily say a whole lot, though you might assume that they mean first-class functions which capture the variables in lexical scope. It's sort of a reasonable colloquialism when there's only one kind of closure being used under the covers, and everyone knows what it is that you're talking about, but harmful otherwise. This is why I advocate saying "first-class functions which bind variables in lexical scope", when that is what is meant in the context of language discussions. (Or just "first-class functions" with the rest implied as the sane default.) The term "closure" is shorter perhaps, but it's at the wrong level of abstraction for language design.
"The thing that is very scary is that females - especially young females - have now adopted and may be even improving on male drinking habits," said Gordian Fulde.  Womens Lib - Aussie style. 
&gt; I don't mean to be so flippant but really, isn't hearing the reaction of the mother enough?  No, unless you're ruled by your emotions. The police in this case should be treated differently than if they, say, killed someone no-knock raid of the wrong address. In each case a victim dies, and a mother loses a child.
I, for one, welcome our new LOLcat overlords.
Was this comment thread about keeping us in Iraq for 50 years?? I don't recall seeing or mentioning that, do you?
What about saving some for the IT team.  No temperature sensors that set off alarms?  You can buy a rack mounted environment monitor for less than the cost of *one* 1U server grade machine. There should have been SMS's flying when it went a few degrees hot. HVAC breaks, even when you don't have people turing it off.  Bottom line is if you've got enough machines to need AC, you need a env. monitor.
Thats one of the most silliest things I ever heard. Btw, I read this about a month ago on FARK. personally I think we should be more up2date then they are...
&gt;libel: a false and malicious publication printed for the purpose of defaming a living person Now, if she can show evidence or cite a source of where she received this information of Bush jumping around, thumping his chest, I will retract my statement. Until then, it's a sourceless statement intended to make someone look foolish, i.e., defamation. As copied from my previous comment written below a couple of minutes ago
How could it possibly be the morally correct thing? Do you want to ask the ~650,000 corpses? Or the 2 million (I think that's the most recent UN statistic) refugees who've fled their homes how moral it was to bomb them? Everyone knows Saddam Hussein was an asshole(and sure in a perfect world we'd arrest him and throw him in prison and install a picture perfect government in its wake), but lets get back to reality--and you want to know what? Saddam hasn't killed nearly as many people as our dear old President has. Now that's one for morality...and irony.. America isn't the *great* freedom loving country your childhood history books told you it was--it's an imperialistic power that cares about NOTHING but it's expanse of power--at whatever cost necessary.. A trillion dollars... a million dead civilians... 3000 dead US troops.... and all these numbers are still growing. Everyday Bush outdoes Saddam's multiple-decade-long reign of terror in the guise of "freedom and morality." War may be an inevitable part of humanity, but wars of aggression do a disservice to the planet. Iraq had no possible way of attacking the United States. There were no WMD's. There was absolutely ZERO threat. What we did was illegal, immoral and despicable. We waged a war of aggression against a sovereign nation to build the largest embassy ever seen in the heart of the energy producing sector of the planet. Everyone who voted for it or agrees with it should be ashamed. It's that simple.
tiny animals?...or MONSTROUS hands?
People act like idiots when it comes to gas prices. The fucking government takes 40% or more in taxes and we do nothing. The price of gas goes up by $0.50, we act like fucking animals. So short sighted...
1) the article does not say that the editor does not know who the source is. 2) bs, unidentified sources are paraphrased all the time.  3) also  BS, it is not uncommon to state that "an unidentified source  has said....."  
Truly there are no words adequate to the sense of bewilderment that arises in me as I ponder your superior grasp of the material.   Just kidding.  You didn't tell me anything that I couldn't have looked up.  And, if you had known that material up front, you should have contributed from the get-go instead of expressing your "art". Me thinks your phone is ringing again.  It must be those ever so happy and trusting customers of yours.  Mine don't call me.  I guess they're actually happy once I finish the job. You can take my silence after this point to mean that I won't be wasting any more time on this exchange.
So you're trying to prove that you're ethical and responsible by spamming our website?
Metaphors in general. I'm keeping track. This isn't quite the Worst Metaphor Ever but it definitely has its place in crappy computing comparisons...
Sure, but who cares about those videos?
What the hell does this have to do with women's rights? Submitter is playing the gender card because the employee happened to be a woman.
You lost me. I think you need to work on your vocabulary, because many of the words you chose make no sense in the way you put them. I find the statements about Clinton and Gravel to be completely uneducated (especially about Clinton). Ron Paul has no chance of winning, unfortunately; his reputation has been utterly demolished by the media. I think that Reddit and Digg are the only two places where he may find sanctuary. I hate to break this to you, but those "beliefs, values, and interests, which are shared by modern Republicans and Democrats alike" *are* Left and Right. Luckily, they aren't bipolar, hence the ability to have multiple candidates.
I know the USA is guilty of egregious international misconduct, and I never said my facts are the only truth. I asked if the facts I mentioned were worth mentioning in the foreign policy history, or if only those presented deserved mention. And you did not answer the question. Why don't you answer the question? Do you seriously contend that free, prosperous South Korea would be better off today ruled by Kim Jong-II, the dictator of impoverished North Korea?
Not just about - he WAS the most decent guy to ever exist on the planet. I am the most jaded unemotional person that jokes about everything and every time I read about something Mr. Rogers did I can't help but cry at how awesome he was.
There's an odd tendency for engineers to fantasize about being artists: musicians, poets, novelists, and then of course there's Paul Graham's painting analogies.  Romantic notions they may be, but they also don't hold up in the least.
And nothing gives me the jibblies more than someone saying "Pat Buchanan is right." Brrr.
&gt; With the way things are in the UK and indeed the US can you blame them? I don't blame them. Fear-mongering and male-bashing has been hurting everyone.
sakebomb69: Perhaps you don't follow the news very closely the operational definition of "setting Iraq up so his successor could not get out of “our country’s destiny" is a Korean-style solution for Iraq, where indeed we have kept troops for 50 years.
Of course it matters who's on top. Don't be foolishly cynical. Corruption affects people in different ways. Some people abuse their power for a blowjob from an intern -- others take over foreign countries, slaughter their people, and steal their resources.   
I look like a blubbering idiot right now (the blubbering is the unusual part).  It's a good thing I am staring a computer and others can only see the back of my head.
&gt;Leading the Arizona Jewelry Industry in Ethics and Education That's super, and I'm sure you're a great guy, but the whole diamond engagement ring business is built on getting people to spend a HUGE chunk of money on something they don't need when they should really be saving for things they do (paying their existing debts, saving for a house (don't get me started on realtors), paying for their educations, saving for retirement, saving for emergencies, etc.). I'm not saying people don't spend money they shouldn't spend on plenty of other things, but with most other things things they buy, there is much more of a payoff. A car is a necessity for mobility for most people, and you can eventually sell it if you take care of it. A house provides shelter, and will probably go up in value. A huge plasma TV  provides entertainment. A diamond just sits there. It won't go up in value because it's already extremely overpriced. It doesn't provide entertainment, and it probably doesn't provide much enjoyment after the initial high of getting a multiple-thousands-of-dollars gift wears off. It just sits there. It wouldn't be so bad if the price of a diamond ring was somehow related to the number of diamonds out there. But DeBeers didn't get rich selling diamonds for their actual worth. It got rich by keeping a stranglehold on the supply. So you're a fifth generation jeweler, and I love that a family business can survive so long, but clearly your family got started before things took an evil turn.
This whole debate is irrelevant and disturbing.  Since when did we start caring more about whether beliefs were "good" or not than whether they are true or not? Either god exists, or it doesn't. This is a matter of fact. There is only one answer, and whoever disagrees with it is wrong. What effect that belief has is irrelevant.
Minus well bet on him.  If he doesn't make it in - your currency is going to be toilet paper anyhow.  The US is bankrupt even by Enron standards.  Total debt in the govt and private sector total at least 700,000 per family.  They have no choice.  Inflate or die.
This article is just some idiot foaming at the mouth. Scalla is not responsible for his 45 year old daughter. The other link taking pot shots at him are utterly unfair.  "Supreme Court Justice Antonin Scalia insists that the constitution does not protect the right to an abortion, or 'homosexual sodomy,'" That doesn't mean he against those things, it means he doesn't believe that the constitution protects those things. There is a big difference.
Give him a chance. It's easy for us to bash the diamond industry, but I think we should be willing to let him speak for the other side, or at the very least for himself.
old. But good.
Anyone who doesn't think this is political is bullshitting themselves...  We have a white house administration that has been shoveling shit since day 1.
If anyone ever deserved to be sainted it is him.
Tell us more. Details please.
And then they would put you in the jail...
I wonder, how old are the trees?
Waiting in line for up to three hours to save what amounts to a couple of dollars for a full tank.  What the fuck?  What amazed me are the people that traveled quite a distance to get the cheaper fuel. Reminds me of the people that drive an extra 10 miles because there local supermarket charges about 3c more per item.
Even the article itself bashes the study for being imprecise. I think the post's title is more sensational than the article would like to have you think.
You are right. They rarely exist. But the thing is, if a diamond makes her happy, shouldn't that be a good enough motivation? Really, the diamond is about HER.    It's kind of like Valentine's Day: I am well aware that it is a crappy holiday from hallmark and that it is a crock of shit. I don't want chocolate or a dumb card. I don't expect anything, and actually discourage it. *HOWEVER*, so what if your girlfriend wants some flowers? You can't throw down few bucks to make her happy? Buying flowers won't kill you, and "making a statement" by not doing anything only hurts HER.    And by the way: the 2-month's salary is for a *starter* ring ;-)
Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001... Number 1001...
I'm glad I'm already into my 50's. I'd hate to be a young person and have a lifetime of this to look forward to.
Must've missed the Hanoi Hilton episode in the Neighborhood of Make Believe.
&gt; Syns are TOO perfect No shit. Therefore, by any RATIONAL criteria, they would be worth MORE. Especially to jewelers and gemologists since you don't get attached to any one particular stone. &gt; Btw, 20% off the %50 profit is what? 10% which is no way to do business. Most industrial companies run on far less than 10%, let alone the 20% net I thought you meant. Only in cartels or situations of extremely tight supply do you get higher than that. And of course, luxuries. Anyways, I take it you know about the yellow diamond synthetics? What's been happening to those? For that matter, what's been happening with synthetics in general? I'm interested in how they will play out in the semiconductor industry which is still many years away.
Such a sad truth. (And I think the percentage is higher than this survey cites.)
http://blade.nagaokaut.ac.jp/cgi-bin/scat.rb/ruby/ruby-talk/67618
I thought it was the opposite, that sex comes to a screeching halt when you buy one...
I came to reddit at the beginning of this year and was pleased to find a place with informative, thoughtful links that eschewed the usual explosions/boobies/AWESOME PIC!! fare.  However, since the digg fallout the links here have really gotten crappy.   I concur, the "new" page is the place to go for quality links. Vote down inane links!
Unless he's already in jail...  then what are they going to do HUH?  Build a jail around the jail?
True. But I want to see at least one(1) video of a soldier being heroic.
What kind of cat is that?  It looks a bit ... beefier than a house cat.
Switch to root beer. They only hurt if you let them.
I don't think so. Her ex-boyfriend was just as smart as a diamond. 
Please no more pics.
Except in a lot of countries governed by religious states conservatives would do a lot more than just be "freaked out". Arguments about social constructs and relativism are interesting, in so far that they don't ignore realities: e.g. sexism, violent repression, religious indoctrination, etc.
Arg. Why do they use YouTube. Google Video has a much better player.
Another recommendation for other wise lazy people: If you desire to be physically fit and have some muscle definition, but don't necessarily desire to look like a star athelete or power lifter, there are many simple exercises that don't require you to leave the house or go to the gym.  On a regular basis, I do pushups, pullups, v-ups, and hindu squats -- I aim three sets of one upper body exercise and three of the lower body exercise each day.  Although I miss days, at least *aiming* to do it everyday causes you to do it fairly regularly.  (If you aim to do it twice a week, you will probably end up doing it twice a month.)  I've been doing these for years, and am quite satisfied with the way I look as a result. It also doesn't hurt that I don't drive, live in a downtown area, and walk just about everywhere.
Which further illustrates my point: since you'd prefer a black pearl ring, or a specially designed ring, that's what you should get.  Even if your finace says that he thinks a diamond is more traditional, he has grandma's ring, blah blah blah, you should get what makes *you* happiest.
Thank goodness our economy runs on oil and not soda, otherwise evidence of nuclear weapons would be manufactured, implicating Sudan.
Wasn't trying to impress anyone. Still stand by my name though. Can't stand those fuckheads. I have interacted with way too many "red blooded" Americans to last me several lifetimes. I used to be nice, civil and tolerant towards them, but that's obviously a waste of time. And I agree that trying to "beat the hell" out of fundies over the Internet is also a waste of my time. Understood.
For Democrats, life begins at birth and ends when they can stop taxing you if your rich, or handing out those tax dollars if you were poor.
&gt;Perhaps you don't follow the news very closely 1st) You sir, are a condescending prick  &gt;Perhaps you should. Did you even read the source from this font of knowledge? The original writer, Georgie Anne Geyer, wrote in the Opinion section of the Dallas Morning News: Friends of his from Texas were shocked recently to find him nearly wild-eyed, thumping himself on the chest three times while he repeated "I am the president!" He also made it clear he was setting Iraq up so his successor could not get out of "our country's destiny." Ummm... missing some crucial data. Who are these "friends?" Names? When and where this occurred? Seems more like a wild allegation than actual fact. 2) My comment form 8 hours ago, which apparently you did not read. This was my initial problem with the article. As for the future of Iraq policies, that is a different kettle of fish than journalistic credibility. If you want to go ahead and believe everything you read, well... I heard from your friends that you like to run around the block in your underwear singing the "Star Spangled Banner" while a dog chases you with peanut butter on your ass. It must be true, because I just wrote it.   
Let them drink beer.
Please, it's cruise control.
&gt; Package system can be used to make anaphoric macros safe. Packages are also one of the reasons anaphoric macros can be a real pain to use.
This just may be the thing that gets Bush to intervene militarily. In Sudan that is.
It is evolutionarily advantageous to favor those of a similar genetic makeup to one's self. The order of preference is, roughly: Children &gt; Siblings &gt; Cousins &gt; Ethnic cohorts &gt; Everybody else. It's no mystery.
&gt; they are a private company that can be contracted by anybody to do anything. They're a private *US* company made up of US citizens. That makes them subject to US law and some level of oversight regardless of where they operate. At least in theory. 
5500 sailors and aviators dead. In one shot. Realistically, not all of them will die. You'll pick up some survivors. Which you can then proceed to use as hostages. Also, any country that's able to sink one carrier will likely be able to sink every other carrier sent to attack it. So how exactly does that help? Furthermore, short of launching nuclear missiles, submarines have negligeable attack capabilities. Bombed back to the stone age? I don't fucking think so. If the USA breaks the nuclear taboo against anyone, ANYONE, it will find itself bankrupt within 24 hours.
Great post about Gen X &amp; Y and our never ending pursuit of happiness.
No problem.  If you're licensing doesn't allow it, I'd report hemmy to Flickr. http:  //www.hemmy.net/2007/05/31/  tiny-animals-on-fingers/ ( spacing so no one accidentally visit them. ) -flamesplash
"True; that does not mean that first-trimester abortions are a Constitutional right, however. It simply means that an absolute right to access to abortion at any time was probably not in the intent of the Framers (whether what they actually wrote wound up covering this is another question)." Undoubtedly.  If only that was what Roe v. Wade granted, you might even have a point!
Livelook is a service dedicated to improving access to outdoor-view live cams on the internet.
I think the better question is *why* such trees are moved.
Yeah, he did pressured the government in some ways, but when I was writing that comment, I was thinking more in regards to censorship, rather than for gaining public broadcast funding. That is, he didn't try and get the shows he didn't like taken off the air. That really wasn't clear in my comment, and I apologize for the poor phrasing.
Those state laws still didn't have a health exemption.  The fact that Ron Paul would even CONSIDER allowing a bill to pass without a health exemption is shocking and appalling to me.
"Keep your mouth shut" ? Since when? You take an oath to defend the Constitution and, while on active duty, to obey lawful orders. Are you a vet? I am. I served in Viet Nam in 67-68 and after I got out I protested. That war was based on LBJ's lies and we stopped it. This war is based on GWB's lies and I respect this young Marine for protesting.
A guy at work cant even sell his engagement ring when wedding didnt happen, 5k for a ring, and no jeweler will buy it back..  Diamond rings have no appreciation, you loose money buying a new diamond.  What a scam.
Two civilized gents sharing their ideas. It's a visual treat.
The Messiah is going to have his work cut out for him.
 Free Anime And Tokusatsu Wallpapers And Free Manga Reading Online 
The idea of state's rights as discussed by many on the right specifically is about rolling back the main idea of the 14th amendment. Until the Civil War, state laws were allowed to trump federal laws and even the Constitution.  The 14th Amendment, written when the war came to an end, was specifically a rejection of the idea that a state law could nullify a portion of the Constitution.  The idea of state's rights, as practiced both then and now, was that states could take away rights at will.  I believe that your rights are not the government's to give you.
For the uninitiated: this is a play on [Revolution 9](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Revolution_9) from the White Album, wherein the enigmatic phrase "Number 9" is repeated ad nauseam. I suspect that the people who see this joke fall into 10 groups&amp;hellip;
I agree with you completely.  Practicality is of high importance :) One of the key challenges to overcome in the growth of Electric cars is energy storage.  LiON Batteries are still very expensive, and require a lot of them (aka lots of space) to hold enough charge to last the vehicle.   As these cars pick up sales, batteries should decrease in price.  And hopefully in the next few years new battery research will lead to batteries that can handle a much greater charge.  If these things occur, every vehicle manufacturer in the world will be on the warpath to Electric Cars.   If Tesla can truly start an Electric Revolution and PROVE the power of electric vehicles, we could be at the start of an era that phases out most petroleum-based vehicles.  If not all.
People are disgusted with the militarization of their town!  It's happening all over the country.
When the right acts like women are getting D&amp;X procedures done because they are "selfish" and that it violates the "culture of life" (which apparently doesn't include the quality of a woman's life, even when she is carrying a good-as-dead child), they're obfuscating the truth and acting in a morally reprehensible manner. It is not possible to prove a negative.  I cannot prove the procedure has never, ever been done on a woman who did not need it as an alternative to a worse procedure.  I can state that there would be literally no reason to do so.  Why would a woman choose the more expensive, more painful, more difficult, more traumatic process over the cheaper, less painful, less difficult, and less traumatic one, especially when she's already been carrying the fetus for almost her entire term?
"Here's a random picture of an attractive woman. Oh, by the way, Ron Paul's more popular now."
Too good not to share...
A single thread on a new forum does not a reddit-worthy link make.
There is something wrong with wanting power, actually, specifically with wanting it for its own sake. I cannot remember who was that put it this way: the man who desires power is exactly the kind of man who should not have it. Public service, should be, in an ideal world, exactly what its name implies: service, a duty.  People should ideally be elected for their competence to fulfill this duty, not their eagerness to lie to get it. I almost agree with your views on race and religion. But do not judge people too harshly. Race, religion and culture are just easy signs to recognize peers of your group. Reliance on them is fading away, slowly.
did you mean "are lost"? Not really. No, powerlines aren't super conductors, but they are also extremely high voltage. Current tends to be where losses are had. By keeping the voltage high they can keep the current low and make the lines quite efficient. High-Voltage AC powerlines are about 95% efficient, whereas properly constructed DC lines can be even higher, but require two conductors and are thus more expensive to deploy. In North Dakota, we ship most of our power out to Minnesota on high-efficiency DC powerlines where they are converted to AC and enter the main grid. You're still doing a hell of a lot better than the 30% in your tiny car engine. Remember, energy lost in the powerplant and transmission lines is lost income for the power plant, so unlike the car companies, they have an economic desire to make everything up to your home or business as efficient as possible.
Well, women's rights weren't really foremost in the minds of the Founders in any way.  But it's pretty clear these guys respected bodily autonomy and private decisions (including the private decision to fuck your slaves and have them bear you children).  They also certainly weren't prudes.  At that time, almost every woman had aborted at least once (usually with herbal concoctions).  The idea of taking away such a basic right would have probably seemed insane, especially since at the same time in England, babies being left outside to die of exposure by mothers unable or unwilling to care for them was a common occurrence.
_quite fond of betraying each other_ As a general rule, a brother will betray a stranger before his brother. If we can't agree on that, then there's nothing left to say. To a lesser extent, a cousin will betray a stranger before his cousin. To a lesser still extent, an ethnic member...etc, etc. This is a simple matter, evolutionarily. If you fight against your own gene pool, your gene pool will decline, and you will be wiped out. Ceteris paribus, of course. If you throw in a wrench, such as the _requirement_ that people act against their own family, ethnic group, whatever, then they will do so for a more local advantage. Such requirements will either be destroyed, or will mean the destruction of the general type.
Of course we wouldn't want to DEstabilize it; look at how stable you made it with all that war!
I voted this crap up because readers do need to see what the Democrat side is doing, but the contention that it is a liberals-only sin is ridiculous. When the congressional feeding frenzy starts, you can't tell left from right, liberal from conservative, Democrat from Republican.
The viceroy isn't expected to slum it now is he?
My wife has a topaz.  I didn't even have to argue, she picked it.
The words aren't meaningless.  Evolution does not have a goal or direction, but you can retrospectively see that one species has changed more from its ancestral version than another.  Therefore, it is more evolved.   Edit.  I am totally baffled as to why this is modded down.  It is uncontroversial.  Consider an ancestral form that enters a new niche.  In that niche that form gets split into two populations.  One population is subject to competition from another species, so is subject to strong selection pressure and rapidly changes.  The other population is not, so hardly changes at all.  The first population shows evidence of more evolution.
No kidding?  You mean the people most likely to have power and abuse it are taught to be ashamed of doing so?  While at the same time, people who have historically had less power and fewer chances to obtain it are taught not to be ashamed to strive for more? Why, I never!
I don't think we should discount what he says even if we think he's doing this for ratings on an entertainment news show. Unfortunately, many influential people believe him. But fortunately, he seems frightened that the non-white, non-christian male may be threatening his "authority."
To top it off - his father in law is a research microbiologist at the CDC's Division of Tuberculosis Elimination: http://reddit.com/info/1v4hj/comments
And he had on bitchin Corvette collection!!
&gt; And laundered donations via third parties. Bingo.  Events are a common method.  Hire a party-affiliated event-planning lobbyist to hold a $1000/plate $10000/table dinner to raise funds for Senator Bedfellows. RIAA pays the event-planner, which doesn't count as going to the Senator, and is probably a deductible business entertainment expense.  The attendees are the ones who *technically* are contributing to him.  The details connecting it all don't get tracked by current reporting requirements, but the Senator's staff had better recall them well enough when legislation comes up.
There needs to be a serious biopic made on Mr. Fred Rogers. This scene should play out just like this. And it should star Edward Norton.
Winning their hearts and minds, one person at a time.
&gt; When you really get into the nitty-gritty, as you have here, there are multiple valid definitions of "closure".  For some strange value of "valid", maybe. :-) The term "closure" has a clear meaning in computer science: a (code, environment) tuple. See cgibbard's response. But you're right, the OP should stop worrying and love the language.
Much higher, I'm sure.
Who is insane to do that. When comes to hysteria of child molestation, the government will destroy your life. Do you think that detective and prosecutors do a good job when comes to false allegations? Think again - They are in a political fight for their own lives - They will NOT listen to the facts, and they will not back up until they see you in jail for the rest of you life. You would think that they would conduct investigation to find out basis for their cases, and be responsible on what you do?  Here is my advise:  * If you are accused of false child molestation, DO NOT under any circumstances talk to the police, or detective or the prosecutor. To them, you are already GUILTY. They will only listen to you to twist your words and lie in the courtroom while they try to convict you.  * Look for an attorney that will listen to you and REALLY believe you (You will know if the attorney believes you because you will see him or her fight for you). Most of them will act as if they believe you until they get your money, and will steal your money! Most lawyers are vultures waiting for a great opportunity, and that is one.  * You will be in the toughest time of your life, not it is a time to find who your friends are and hold on to whatever you can.  * Ah, did I mention to NOT TALK TO any police officer, detective, or prosecutor? 
&gt;And don't tell me stuff about metaphors. "And don't tell me the answer."
I dont like O'Reilly, but I think this is a concern (not for the reasons O'Reilly thinks though). White male (mostly) christians are who wrote the Constitution and Bill of Rights. And I have to wonder how committed to civil liberties and limited government some minorities are.  Thats one reason Im concerned about all this immigration too. The people crossing the border may not share the "liberal values" of seperation of church and state, free expression, etc... like most white liberals do.
we all know how accurate polls in Iowa are, don't we?   
take it easy, mate!
I don't think it's productive to complain about the complexity of the GPL. If armies of Microsoft lawyers weren't being paid big bucks to pervert its legal interpretation, RMS could have left it in much plainer language.
I heard sometimes the Nazis ate bread, too. Obviously we should all stop eating bread because that's what the Nazis did and we can't be like the Nazis, right guys? Just because the Nazis did something doesn't make it automatically unacceptable for anyone else. That's fallacious.
I'm very addicted to Reddit and these sites are amazing sources of news and knowledge and fear and fun and joy...all of it.   As the web has grown so has the number of Reporters and Sources just watching the every move of mankind and broadcasting it...all of it.  And I wanna see it all. And LOLCats are part of it.  I love that picture of the monkey petting the kitten.  I need that too. I need that because I just read 20 articles about the corruption in my government, the ruin of my nature and our Bush...ugh. I need LOLcats! I need google streetview!
That's not a health exemption, it's a life exemption.  That's the original reason it was rejected by the SCOTUS -- lack of exemption for the mother's health, not just her life.  Please read my other post regarding the loss of fertility that commonly follows the alternative procedure.  I would consider that a really valid reason to use the D&amp;X even if it wasn't a life-threatening scenario.  if the fetus had to come out one way or the other, and one scenario led to an almost definitely fertile mother while the other had a high probability of rendering her infertile, I'd like to let the woman and her doctor come to that decision together. The 2 year old daughter of the woman I knew who had a D&amp;X would thank you for this, by the way.
That's just the public sector debt/obligations.  For the economy as a whole you need to include private sector too.  Add 30 Trillion to that 50 Trillion and you start approaching a million dollars per family.  We are bankrupt even by Enron standards.  I guess I could talk about 400 Trillion in derivatives contracts and what will happen when things hit the fan too.  People who think that their leveraged bets are covered on both sides are going to be in for the shock of their life.  The Fed has no choice: inflate or die.  People are so surreal about it, it's almost berserk.  Any sane person should be in panic mode right now!
Look on the bright side: Photoshop wasn't involved.
Speeding police cruisers haphazardly colliding with each other in a freak accident is not "militarization". If they had rocket launchers mounted to their roofs and were randomly firing into neighborhoods, that would be militarization.
Yes indeed. There are so many unnecessary high speed chases that end in tragedy.  I realize that the "bright side" comment was humor but we as taxpayers get the bill and usually the "serve and protect folks" get a vacation (on paid leave).
Life-sized Bonsai.
At least he's honest!
Hey, I's from Ten-uh-see. Give a feller a brake, I's juss lernin muh letters (My sister was 3 years ahead of me, and I was friends with upper- and lower-classmen. I think I went to 4 graduations over the years. I even skipped a year and it still happened; new principal that time but same speech, same reaction)
As much as I've enjoyed saying the same thing to you over and over again ad nauseum, I think at this point I'm happy to agree to disagree.
Correct. Many recruiters love to cover that subject very quickly. But, even after your 8 year contract is up, you may NEVER reveal ANY information that was above a classified security level. If the Marine in question only spoke his mind about the war, there is no way he should ever be prosecuted or in risk of losing his discharge status since he is not in violation of the UCMJ or any lawful order. HE IS however, in violation of Marine Corps Policy on uniforms. Not wearing your dress uniforms to standards OR by wearing your combat fatigues in public is subject to a warning or punishment (usually resulting in a Non Judicial Punishment or Page-11 entry - which is mostly like be written up at work). Hardly grounds for a change in discharge status on his DD 214. 
Because word-of-mouth is the only advertising available to the FOSS movement. It's also the only form of advertising that's worth something to *both parties*, but a century of one way mass-media blitz marketing has blinded people to this.
I will definitely remember that.  Thanks.
What will Willy Wonka do if he can't produce Fizzy Lifting Drink?
Reddit - More liberals than a California state university.
Yeah, I've only had it come up once, and that was when I applied for a City job.  I imagine it would matter for anything requiring clearance (working at Boeing for instance), but most jobs its irrelevant. Shit I'd probably hire the guy just because of the set of balls he's got on him.  Its hard to find people like that.   
Democrats lied? I'm shocked. So far they are 3 for 3 they lack integrity, civility and fiscal responsibility.  .   "With integrity, civility, and fiscal responsibility as our guide, Democrats intend to move forward with the agenda for change on which we were elected." ~~ Nancy Pelosi, November 14, 2006  http://www.csmonitor.com/2006/1114/p09s01-coop.html
One nice thing about [cherrypy](http://cherrypy.org) is that regular pdb works with it.
Just my luck that I found reddit because of the fallout but still agree with this comment.
it's funny how many people were influenced by that man.  he was, and is, the coolest old dude on television.  cheers mr rogers.
How can Turkey possibly justify this? Haven't they learned anything from the U.S? They should be attacking Venezuela! I mean, really, pre-emptive attack is where its at, guys! Sure, there might be direct ongoing attacks against your country from south of the border, but...
Well, duh, [giyf](http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&amp;q=rip%20youtube%20video&amp;btnG=Google+Search)
Hmmmmm..... you don't think they could hire this out?
&gt;Kyl says the Justice Department is concerned that it could force them to reveal sensitive information. Does he mean reveal the truth?
Funding our police at record levels is militarization.  Using the police to enforce the right-wing agenda of the "War on Drugs" is militarization.  We are policed as never before, and that is militarization. 
There are [many examples](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Guerrilla_warfare#Unsuccessful_campaigns) of successful military counter-insurgency. But I agree that Iraq fits the pattern of successful insurgencies. The main feature would be the foreign invader with nothing to offer to the invaded. Democracy is not a valid rallying cause. The US cannot offer it because it's not a Democracy itself, and anyway Democracy does not seem very popular in those parts of the world.
IronRuby?? c'mon, what kind of stupid name is that?
What part of his correct appraisal do you have an issue with? He does not challenge anthropogenic GW (even though its a myth without factual support) and he correctly states that no one has said that the climate the way it is now (or was in the past) is better than any other possible alternative. Frankly, GW is good for our world - just bad for a minority of its occupants in the near term. Bring it on I say. Oh - and I spent 12 years teaching skiing.
Well, historically Apple has always had trouble building relationships with its users. In general, Mac user do not really identify with the product or hold the company in any special regard. In fact, Steven Paul Jobs (CEO of Apple) is not very well known amongst Apple's customers and operates in a very behind the scenes manner. I agree that building relationships is a major issue for Apple and hopefully if they follow the strategies pioneered by Dell there may be a few people out there who one day become fans of Apple. Maybe.
Perl added an object system without having to do what? Change perl? I think trying to implement perl 5 objects in perl 4 would feel pretty clunky. Anyway... What does your comment have to do with anything? :D
my company stores files in iron mountain.  didn't know it's existence was supposed to be a secret?
Yeah. but a Cooper can barely pull the skin off a rice pudding. Hardly surprising then, that a remote controlled thing with 5 times the power to weight will waste it.
don't know why you got dug down for that.   The Gnostic texts are fascinating.
So, you'll be attacked for 50 years.  Ron Paul is right - shut all 730 odd military bases outside the USA and withdrwa all your troops from every country in the world. I think the world would be a lot safer, and America would be a lot richer.
I agree with you 100%, garyp714. I posted the following on another *"whiner"*/what's happend to our dear Reddit Threads, yesterday: "The **Power is Yours!** Change the channel.   Log Off.   Go fly a kite. (seriously, it might do you some good to get outdoors for a bit).   Seek an Archive Site and re-read your posts from the past in your insular world.   Sites *Evolve* with popularity......**Live With It!**"
OK, can we NOW admit that the "surge" isn't working and move onto a strategy that, just maybe, won't result in quite so many of our troops dying?
Interesting, but a bit misleading with respect to Iron Mountain, making it sound like a civilian NORAD.  It's actually a huge worldwide archival firm.  We use them at work for long-term storage of paper and electronic records. They have several locations just here in Kansas City; standard warehouses for the paper stuff, but the electronic data go into the local network of caves. Yes, the caves have their own fire, security and utility operations.  As their customers, we audited them and toured the caves, asking questions and examining procedures.  A fascinating, claustrophobic place.
ok, but please be a good one. Most djs suck. here are some tips: no sudden tempo changes, easy with the transition effects, easy with the tempo speed too. the mood drives the music, not yours though, that of those on  the dance floor. they're dancing for their lives..don't forget that. 
ka-ping is one seriously smart dude.
What? Our government doesn't want us to know what they are up to? I'm shocked! Georgie is usually so open and forthcoming about what he's up to.
Sex offenders should be allowed to live in a prison.
Don't worry Calark, your secret is safe with me. Signed,  Bruce W... err, Batman.
You're right.  I myself was in the Marines, got out in '97.  Even back then, long before the current political climate, it was well understood that you do not fuck around in the IRR.  They could always recall you with the stroke of a pen. I remember hearing stories about guys that talked shit to officers a few days after they entered the IRR, thinking they couldn't be touched, and it was like BAM you're recalled and now facing a courts-martial. Regardless of his political stances, he is embarrassing the Marine Corps, and that is what is pissing them off.  They are nitpicking the uniform thing as a technicality they can actually prosecute him on. Its funny how quickly a general finds time to do shit when someone in congress sends a nastygram.  
&amp; you did. So, good job : )
Sir, I have not found that beer goes with cake.
Actually, I think he meant the Federal budget (as in the whole shebang) needed to be cut, not the PB budget.
I have no problem believing it: consider how inane his blog postings often are, and the kind of readership that would attract.
in memories...
Contact info for Sen. Jon Kyl (R-AZ): WASHINGTON, D.C. OFFICE  730 Hart Senate Building  Washington, D.C. 20510  Phone: (202) 224-4521  Fax: (202) 224-2207 \t PHOENIX OFFICE  2200 East Camelback, Suite 120  Phoenix, Arizona 85016-3455  Phone: (602) 840-1891  Fax: (602) 957-6838 TUCSON OFFICE  6840 North Oracle Road, Suite 150  Tucson, Arizona 85704  Phone: (520) 575-8633  Fax: (520) 797-3232 He lists his email address as the contact form on his website:  http://kyl.senate.gov/contact.cfm  and disclaims "Due to the large volume of email messages I receive, I will only be able to respond to Arizona constituents."
note: share this site with celeste:o)
Now, should I hurry up and watch the video, or is the video itself sped up?
Bush's position in the community is so poor that defamation could not do further damage to him. he is "libel-proof," since in most jurisdictions, actual damage is an essential element for a libel claim. In addition to the above, the defamatory statement is not actually capable of being defamatory—an insulting statement that does not actually harm someone's reputation is prima facie not libelous. It did not say "jumping around" just "thumping himself on the chest three times" which hardly rises to the level of defamatory. Special rules apply in the case of statements made in the press concerning public figures.  For a public official to win a libel case, the statement must have been published knowing it to be false or with reckless disregard to its truth. I hate bush, but this just isn't that defamatory and it is only libel if it is a lie.    
Absolutely, even if you have a fill up for a 20-gallon tank, fifty cents less per gallon only saves you ten dollars, hardly worth the traveling and time, especially if there are lines.
Yes, precisely. A male just UTTERING the p-word basically brings unfavorable attention to himself.
Kyl is a great patriot. On the morning of September 11th he had breakfast with General Mahmoud Ahmad, the ISI man who wired $100,000 to Mohamed Atta. It's shocking to think that he would be an advocate of secrecy.
The flaw in your argument is that it fails to consider that patent monopolies kill collaboration forcing everybody to re-invent the wheel - causing R&amp;D to become up to 100 time more expensive than they would have otherwise.  Countries that have had weak patents experienced just the opposite of what you predicted.  Massive R&amp;D - as the market must shift to center around drug services rather than drug controls. 
Noooo they be stealin' my LOLCats!
THAT is the funniest thing I've heard all day. I'm now imagining your average red-blooded, gun-toting, darkie-hating republican donor getting, "Thank you for being talking to me, I am Sam..."
Is this a joke? Or a real ad?
GAHH. Is it just me or are definitions of anything scientific on wikipedia detailed beyond almost any comprehension?
Niagara Falls - over the top
yeah, especially okur!
Yes, yes it does. That is an awesome stat and probably the best political news I've heard all day.
Why do Americans have such different ideas about punishment than the rest of the world?
but that has nothing to do with this incident, at all. Even the most non-militarized police force will have police cars, and they will still respond to calls as fast as they can, lest the headline be "Man with gun slaughters family while police drive leasurely over to the scene". Freak accident.
You are both wrong.  First off in emergency and disaster situations - price gouging can do miracles to ensure needed supplies don't run out - and then when new supplies do arrive, that they arrive in abundance - the end result being depressed prices. Second off.  There is a false presumption behind this that patents are some kind of a free market property right.  They are anything but.  In fact they are the anti-Christ of free markets because they force the market to center around invention controls instead of invention services.
I find it improbable...
Haaaa
But if Gandhi and Mister Rogers had a kid...
&gt; How are you going to pick them up when the remainder of the carrier group is still there? It isn't going to still be there. It will have been sunk. Do you really think it's difficult to buy and launch two dozen anti-ship missiles when you've already bought half a dozen? Do you seriously think submarines are going to sink rubber boats or helicopters doing rescue operations? &gt; Each have standard ordinance that can level any area that sends missiles. That's fucking laughable. Good luck finding those places. &gt; Attacking a carrier will be considered an act of war. Yawn. Nearly everything the USA does is an act of war against someone or other. If the USA provokes someone into sinking a carrier, it will be because they are AT war. &gt; They have over 1/3 of all our cruise missiles Great for standing targets. Expensive for strategic bombing though. How many does the USA have anyways? One or two thousand? &gt; I know you are so certain about your position Not really. I'm just uninterested in this subject, and see you as completely deranged. I take whatever you tell me with enough salt to dehydrate a rhino. &gt; Try it and see. Don't see anyone in line trying. Gee, maybe it's because the only moderately well-off countries eager to make war are Israel and the USA. And that's about it.
....and sniffing magic glitter flung around by the village windmill
You've got bullet holes in all your mirrors.
You have the freedom to say what you like.  The USMC has the freedom to fuck you over for saying it.  Everybody's free!
But patents effectively kill collaboration driving up R&amp;D costs up to 100 fold as everybody must re-invent the wheel.
Yeah.  At least some current spam filters are really good.  I use Apple's Mail, and even though I get about a thousand spams a day, I typically only have to manually deal with two to five.
There I upmodded you because you made me laugh. What you posted was indeed retarded shit and there was no need for the slur. But I also don't agree when people say that if you say something that is against the dominant white majority, you are a racist as well. The fact that minorities and women are underprivileged and fucked over every single day *does* make it okay when they say that Christian white males in power are misogynist, homophobic, racist assholes. I do not believe for a minute though that a liberal white male falls into that category. It isn't *white people* who want to keep minorities and gays down. It's the right wing authoritarian fucks. Get your stereotypes straight :)
That's the one with Tinky Winky, right?
Yes, especially [The Gospel of Thomas](http://www.gnosis.org/naghamm/gosthom.html), which has some, _some_, echoes of the strange, uncomfortable stuff that Jesus said in the canonical gospels.  
Idaho´s queer community has a new editor with a new attitude taking the reigns of the LGBT newspaper, Diversity. Travis Riggs, 26, is a well-known local gay activist who is focused on creating positive change for the LGBT community by working hard to offer fresh and insightful news that will inform and inspire action.
Don't hold your breath waiting for them.  Breakneckridge is coming it way too strong by half with that assertion.  Attitudes towards public displays of affection and sexuality, as is the case with all cultural traits (except for incest taboos and music, which seem to be universal), run the gamut in terms of how they are expressed by different cultures.  That said, if there are any current or even historical cultures in which public copulation is encouraged, as a casual activity, rather than simply tolerated, I have never heard of them.
People think you're strange if you don't drink to excess over here! It's very rare for many of us to even think about leaving the pub until we are properly pissed. It's great fun but yeah it will probably be the death of us in the long run. Cheers!
I appreciate your attempt to add context...  but it is absolutely irrelevant. No one is going to care about these details. What they see is the government taking extreme action against one of its own to shut him up. Even if they technically have reason to be doing this, it is quite possibly the stupidest thing they could POSSIBLY do.  They're turning him into a martyr. And at that point, is there any reason he won't just step up his campaign against them?
Television does teach.  It teaches good habits and bad, good information, and worthless rubbish. (How many curse words did you learn from TV and movies, vs. your parents and friends)  There are plenty of worthless shows on TV, but only a few are treasures like Mr. Rogers' neighborhood.
Kyl is ultraconservative and voted with Bush's stance 97% of the time this past session of Congress.  Jim Pederson was the democratic candidate who lost even though he didn't take money from companies and financed a large part of his campaign himself.
I think the proportion must be much higher in the US--working with kids here is really putting your head in a noose. (I do admire those who go ahead anyway.)
Smoke those buggers out!
Nice comment, downmodded nonetheless to try to stem the tide vote-explanatory comment posting.
Random peoples on the intrawebs are trollings! oh noes!
Filed under "But she's so cute" by Wonkette.
I meant it bought you 1 session of sex.  It only dwindles from that point on since the woman has "secured a man" and got a rock on her finger.
What happens when the Bank has a full-blown army, a population in the Billions, and a Nuclear Arsenal?
Yeah, I have to agree. These guys are a bunch of complete idiots. The only reason they're so powerful is because they already have power and they help each other because the other has power. It's socialism for the elite, and as we all know, socialism doesn't work because it takes away the edge/hunger away from their lives, so they become stale and decrepit. Their ideas are obsolete. For example, the obsolete model of the financial system is Pavlovian conditioning. A newer means of indoctrination would be a direct tapping into the pleasure/pain area of the brain, similar to the rats who keep hitting the button that's wired to their brain that releases cocaine. LOL!!!!
Note to Republicans: You're supposed to *govern* like irresponsible drunks, not *drive* like them...
No, the problem is that it is hard to ensure backwards compatibility with traditional duck typing.  A VB preview actually had a solution to this that I liked. It was called Dynamic Interfaces. It worked like Java interfaces, except you didn't have to statically declare them in the class.  Dynamic Interface IDuck   Sub Quack   End Interface  Class Duck 'explicit interface implementation     Implements IDuck     Sub Quack   End Class  Class Dog 'dynamic interface implementation     Sub Quack   End Class  Sub DoSomething (foo as IDuck)  The result of this feature is that you have an explicit contact, but like real duck typing you can still pass any object that happens to have the right methods. 
Sounds like  1 in 8 is also reformed and the remainder are un-Australian abstainers 6 out of 8. Probably the same 6 in 8 that complain about poker machines in pubs which resulted in less 24 hour pubs. I had a long neck (a 750mL glass bottle)of beer this morn when i got up for work and am now hanging for knock off. a usual day.
I usually restrict my profanity to Digg, but Rudy is fucked. I'm guessing that the folks who are bankrolling him are pissed.
But how do they actually TREAT their wives? As you have pointed out, what they do is infinetly more important than what they believe (or at least than what they claim to believe, since what they do is, I would argue, shows what they really believe). I know that they think that wives should be submissive, but I also know that their view of submission is different than what you probably have in mind (at least, it is different than what I had in mind before I was a Christian). It is not one of servant to master, like slaves are submissive to masters or employees to bosses. Rather, submission is giving yourself completely over to the well being and needs of another person (just as husbands are indeed required to do for wives).  Actually, I can't say that this is what the average bible belt Christian feels the submission of the wife should be, but I DO know that something like it is what is espoused by most Bible Belt Christian leaders (discounting those who are Mormons). So the true question is, how do Christian husbands actually treat their wives down there? And please don't include Utah/Arizona (or at least treat them separately: I think that many there are part of a radically different minority (albeit a minority that is rapidly growing) BTW, only about 10% of this I ask to try and prove my point that Christian men do not view women as little more than slaves. Mostly I am genuinely curious: I'd love to hear your answer as someone who has lived there and is obviously not biased toward favouring Christianity: that is a perspective of the Bible Belt that I have found it very hard to find.
&gt; NATO is exactly the reason Russia will not go back after any of those Baltic states. Really?  You, sir, are very naive.  Let's just say that NATO won't be able to do much had Russia decided to.  But what would be the point?  Just think abou it: what is it there in Baltics that Russia may need?  Oil?  Rare metals?  Gas? I think that Baltics need to realise one simple (and maybe uncomfortable) truth: they won't be invaded by Russia because there is no economic sense in doing so.  Zilch.
They don't even talk about the side-effects of the drug. Tsk, tsk.
A sentence or two is not capable of capturing the complexity of foreign relations.  This is not educational.
In what was is an empty string less clear than String.Empty?
So, has there been a Fark or Worth1000 Photoshop contest to add that black guy's face into other pictures?
Better question: How did a military vet, a man developing a reputation for standing up to his party and being a renegade turn into that turd of a man in the space of a few years?
And there're also pipes going through Belarussia, hence Ukrainian ones are not so relevant.
You betcha. I don't remember what was on them, but I assume they were the songs from the shows. There might have been some spoken word as well, though.
Don't miss your last chance at one of three $12000 2007 WSOP main event seats
I wouldn't call it a freak accident. Even the police spokesman said, ""If you have two police cars speeding to the same scene, and there's no recognition that they're both approaching the same intersection, obviously something's wrong," 
Convenience? Maybe so with other items, but not diamonds. Diamonds are attractive to poor women, rich women, dumb women, intelligent women. Diamonds are not attractive or pretty to anything other than stupid and poor men.  Unfortunately, it's the rich and smart men that have to buy them, which is just the diamond industry proving that just because you might be right doesn't mean that the proper amount of marketing can't make you contradict that moral stance. Why are smart men getting married nowadays anyway?
I can actually see this happening: I might have done this. After all, it DOES have a picture of a bomb on it and it was not complete. If portions of it were obviously missing, how could you know what was missing? And even if you didn't think it was a threat but thought it conceivably could be, isn't it better safe than sorry?
Pederasts, and indeed even pedophiles are currently public boogeyman number 1 right now. Nothing provokes reactionary thought like a child molester.  I love kids, I babysit for my friends, I have a daughter, neighborhood kids come over and play on the swingset and the sandbox in my backyard.  I am terrified of one my daughters friends fathers asking her "Are you SURE he doesn't touch you!?!?!?!?!"  Ask a child enough and sooner rathr than later they will say anything to get you to be happy and shut the hell up.  This fear over pederasts is nothing more than a carefully orchestrated mass hysteria, it is an issue which no politician will touch (no pun intended) with a ten foot pole.  I too am surprised by the "1 in 10" figure.   Given that your child is far more likely to be molested by your brother than his teacher, priest or that creepy dude who lives on the corner, most of this hysteria is completely unfounded.   This is becoming a huge issue in this country. This is every mans problem, and it is one of the few issues we all, regardless of race, religion, color, creed, or sexual orientation need to get together on. Apparently it isn't enough that it is a statistically insignificant amount of men who molest children, we need to prove our innocence prior to even being charged with a crime. This is wrong.  
That's something I've really missed as a web.py user.  It steals stdout, which screws up a lot of other modules.
No, but I suspect it has a lot to do with the local frustration with the police, which is what's in the headline ;)
You would think more research would be done into this sort of thing, but the elitists are stupid, so they'd rather have a eugenics program instead. People are so stupid.
I am not in favor of affirmative action. It doesn't make sense anymore. Black people (and minorities) should be strong enough to stand on their own two feet and earn respect. They can do it, there's no need to baby them anymore. This is a meritocracy. We should look toward unity, not wide distinctions between people. If you're an American, you're an American.
I'd be surprised if there were one serious comment on this article.
Like this one. I'll rewrite this whole blog entry in the form of a comment to Wil's article: &gt; I agree.
i tell people to say stupid shit in german, that they dont understand, all the time...
I hope none of you apply your methods to Russian Roulette...
But who are clearly visible from public property. Doesn't that make the private property irrelevant. After all, I can't stand on my front yard naked, despite it being public property, because it is clearly visible from the street.
Sorry, I also enjoyed thinking that he wore sweaters to hide his tattoos acquired in the service.
Lets get over there RIGHT FUCKING NOW! I want my fucking soda.
Definitely not. But the diamond industry is the industry where when you fork over an exorbitant chunk of money, you've got nothing but a shiny rock to show for it.
I'm not convinced. Those racist quotes are from his early days, in South Africa. He was relatively ordinary then, less fully the Ghandi we know. He still wore a suit then, eg. He evolved a lot after that.  The enemas for young girls was apparently part of the direction he evolved :)
Yes, he is a public figure and libel is probably too strong of a term in this case. But it really irks me to see people making dumb comments like it was the truth and not even having the motivation to go a single step further to verify the source and its veracity.  Edit: removed apostrophe from "it's"
Darned right. Gonzales is so sensitive to truth that it causes him amnesia.
Or expose your buttocks.
I wonder what those lovely folks are planning for us next.
Support the troops.
[I don't think that means too much](http://reddit.com/info/1v1mw/comments/c1v53a).  
&gt;White people have inflicted enough fucking pain and tragedy on this world already. True, but I have to take issue with your use of a racial term inasmuch as the ethnicity of those responsible for perpetrating what you so rightly condemn, is completely ancillary and, if anything, is pretty much an accident of history and geography.  In point of fact, *homo sapiens* is by far one of the most genetically homogeneous large mammals on the planet.  As such, I would argue that concepts of "race" ought properly be consigned to the dustbin of history.
Well, the trouble is they haven't exhausted the list of things they can do to him.  They can escalate this pretty far if they want to.  I admire the guy for his willingness to stand up for what he believes in, but he is going to receive an asspounding if he keeps it up.
You should read some of my other comments in this thread.  As I'm certainly not using it as an excuse fo invasion.
"I can't hear you because I'm over here playing in my big pile of money I got from writing a crappy book" -- [Ana Marie Cox](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ana_Marie_Cox)
&gt;Really, the diamond is about HER. Fuck that noise. The diamond is about getting engaged. Getting engaged is about getting married. Getting married is about *both* of you. At the very least, just to be fair, I feel like the guy deserves something equally frivolous and equally expensive.
I'm white and I didn't have anything to do with those things.  Am I proud? It's just my skin tone, why should I be? But why should I be ashamed? Because I might possibly be the descendant of ignorant fools the same skin color as I? That's as absurd as making brown people drink at a different fountain.
The discussion is clearly about "real languages". Object is of course "code + data". But in practice, the true semantics are different for each language. Can you change/add methods at run time? What happens when you try to access an attribute that doesn't exist? Run-time error, compile-time error? What exactly is included in the environment? And I could go on for a long time. In every case, it's "code + data", but the implementation vary wildly. As I said, closures aren't that wide open. But there's still a lot of variance in both the exact nature of the "code" and the exact nature of the "environment" parts of the tuple. Are the restrictions on the code? Can code modify the vars in the environment or not? How does the call stack manifest in the "environment", that is, do you get the whole thing, the most local entry, etc.? Does it close on "values" or "slots"? (Javascript closes on "slots", so you have to be careful about creating closures in loops. I'm making up terminology since there isn't any consistent cross-language terminology.) Most variants match the definition, some stretch it, some probably really aren't it. That's why it's best just to be a bit relaxed about the whole thing. There's a lot of answers, and it's at least not immediately obvious who's "right" and "wrong", nor even what the appropriate definition of "right" or "wrong" _is_. And since your choice is most likely dictated by your choice of language, which you probably didn't choose _solely_ based on its closure characteristics (though that certainly is a _factor_ in my decisions), it's just not worth sweating that hard.
Ahhh... the truth comes out. You're the one who cherry picked (paraphrased) an almost meaningless opinion column and submitted this as news. Next time, at least get some context, and maybe, a source.   
How about giving her/him 1. a CZ, 2. two ounces of gold.
Well, pictures like that are fine. That's a genuinely interesting picture. And it's actually pretty cute too. I think the pictures in question here are the "i has a cheezburgr" type pictures. Those irritate me to no end.
Too bad. Charlie Parker's life was made for one.
Luxury items and any sort of computer or a/v cable. Don't get me started on the cable cartels! ;-)
And teaching people to be ashamed of an accident of birth is logical how? Just what problem are you solving by messing up the minds of the young, reinforcing the old idea of a race divide and sewing resentment?
"Brothers betray each other all the time". God, I wish the high schools would teach statistics.
On that we agree. I see it all the time with gossip blogs like wonkette. As if it was the evening news.
Trying to rationalize wanting a diamond, hm?
&gt; The term has picked up a lot of overtones from its applications, and some people use it colloquially to refer to functions which capture their lexically enclosing bindings (which is what closures are most commonly used to implement). I hate to rehash this, but this is the [common definition](http://programming.reddit.com/info/1oooq/comments/c1pa23), not a colloquialism.
Well, they DO serve to pleasure the president. or something
Oh yes, a male friend of mine who works with children keeps the door open constantly, and never obstructs view (and fought for extra "observation" windows), so that they are never actually "alone" with the children.
War on Pedophiles has been won.
As long as people do listen to what he says, it behooves anyone concerned about hate-mongers to listen to what he says as well. Know the enemy.
Oh, don't get me started on wonkette.
The USA is a disgrace to mankind.
Oh, it would be awesome. Russia actually respecting all these countries which have chosen a new path - Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Georgia, Ukraine - as sovreign, independent countries and equal partners. Just letting us all live in peace and try to establish normal relations with Russia. I agree, it would be mutually beneficial and the best solution for everyone. So why does Russia keep stirring up shit, leveraging the Russian minorities in these countries for their ambitions to bend them over (even not backing down from outright attemts of overthrowing democratically elected governments), waging propaganda wars and basically doing everything to grab them back under the influence of the "motherland". I'll quote Putin again: "Collapse of the USSR was the greatest geopolitical disaster of the 20th century". My great hope is that Russia's ruling clique will see the wisdom in the words of people like you, and well, cut the crap. edit: And a question. Why did Russia fight so fiercely against admitting the Baltic states into NATO? If they didn't give a damn anyway, what was the point? I'm just wondering.
Very cool!
Headshot please.
Only a little over one in ten?
Fake. Everyone knows he would say "I are the President!"
only in Canada maybe
What else can they do?
Your rich what? *Edit* typo (ironic)
&gt;Based on public appearances like these, you'd think the man lacks a central nervous system. Nope. He's just politically savvy. He pretends to be a moderate but there is no way he's going to offend the racist right wing Republican base.
&gt;With television and the press now pretty much under the government's thumb, how will anyone be able to call the next election free and fair?  No mention in the Economist or any other major international commercial news media of any government control of Venezuela's press (as different from television).  No mention either that cable and satellite TV broadcast from other countries is widely available and popular. Also no mention of how in any non-Venezuelan country whose television and press are pretty much under the capitalists' thumb, how anyone will be able to call the next election free and fair.
Pauline Gevaña, 10 years old, has to undergo chemotherapy this June and would appreciate any help, financial or otherwise. This is her story.
You're right.  Should be *painfully.*
Holy crap, you started way down at $4000?  Lucky bastard.
&gt; CL:RETURN in loop Hmm? RETURN isn't an anaphor defined by LOOP; LOOP just defines a nil block, which is what RETURN implicitly targets. Did I misunderstand what you were trying to say?
fuck cake.
I'd like a word with whoever introduced you to Reddit.
Not a chance...all their normal cronies like Halliburton are completely overextended.
But then why the bipolar choice on election day friend? You are given a choice between two candidates who have the same interests to serve, the same agenda for their foreign and domestic policies, they just have different means to the same ends. Here check out this link that happens to be on the top of reddit right now.. http://www.historyisaweapon.com/defcon2/world.html  these incidents worldwide have been provoked by Republican and Democratic Administrations throughout history. The 'establishment' has different philosophies but the same ends sir, and unfortunately you and i are left out of the debate. I personally believe our opinion should carry as much weight as anyone elses. With the technology available to us today this is not even so unreasonable!
This is a retarded interpretation of the events in Venezuela. Chavez has *always* said that he intends to end democracy in Venezuela in favor of a purely Socialist regime. No one should be surprised by this.
The [broad based organizing](http://www.raisethehammer.org/article/362/) model developed by the Industrial Areas Foundation turns this upside down. They define power as "the ability to act". The IDF: &gt; has a radical belief in the potential of the vast majority of people to grow and develop as leaders, to be full members of the body politic, to speak and act with others on their own behalf. And IAF does indeed use a radical tactic: the face-to-face, one-to-one individual meeting whose purpose is to initiate a public relationship and to re-knit the frayed social fabric. In other words, power based on class, ethnicity and religious affiliation is a Bad Thing, whereas power with openness and accountability based on public relationships is a Good Thing.
first of all stop giving photographer idiots so much creidt, they just lucked into this shot they didn't "try to show" jack shit ...  secondly you are the one missing the point, we all she she is wearing a damn burka, his point is the one that mattered, that if the couple on the left was fuckign you ight find it vulgar while italians would not... its all fucking relative.
dQ/dt = - k A dT/dx That's hot! [I know, I know.  ODE]
Figures. That bastard plans to pave over Texas as the first leg of a highway to Canada. Watch out Nunavut, you're next!
Hmm, why did you remove the kid with a broken hip from the car? Unlike in movies, cars don't explode or catch fire, as long as you remember to shut down the engine and are not very unlucky. So by dragging someone who is injured from a car that is not burning you cause more harm than good.
Isn't that kind of like, oh I don't know...prostitution?
*"Your call may be recorded for democracy control purposes."*
Man, some of the comments on that page... 
world of celebrity is pretty much all fake
Let me get this straight. Checking out the sources for historical claims means you're Karl Rove? Suggesting that Noam Chomsky may not be a reliable source means you're Karl Rove?  Very few serious historians -- including those who are liberals or even lefties -- consider Chomsky a reputable source on anything relating to history or politics. I wouldn't trust his analyis on anything, and I wouldn't even take any of his "facts" on faith without doublechecking.  EDIT: and Ward Churchill is even worse.
Just in case you missed the description ... &gt;Governor Rick Perry has been instrumental in facilitating the Trans-Texas Corridor and related toll roads, which many argue is an essential part of infrastructure for a North American Union (or community, if you like)-- that would integrate the economies, borders, police/military and even the currency (the Amero) of the United States, Mexico and Canada-- as laid out by the Council on Foreign Relations' Robert Pastor, as well as the Security and Prosperity Partnership of North America-- a treaty that President Bush signed with the heads of Mexico and Canada in 2005. In addition to general support and proposal of the plan, Perry publicly lobbied that foreign corporations developing the project be allowed to keep the plans secret.  Rick Perry also helped to facilitate the buyout of TxU (Texas Utilities), including the issuance of an executive order for fast track approval of certain parts of the deal. TxU was the largest buyout ever-- at $45 billion dollars, purchased by private equity firm Kohlberg, Kravis &amp; Roberts (KKR) and Goldman Sachs, a global investment firm.  Both firms are well represented at the Bilderberg group.  Additionally, Credit Suisse First Boston, an investment banking group who is also well represented at the Bilderberg gruop, is named in a scandal indicting the head of Faysal Bank in Pakistan. Ajaz Rahim is charged with conspiracy and securities fraud based on insider trading information in the TxU buyout he received from Credit Suisse, who advised on the TxU deal.  Governor Perry has also been cosy, meeting in 2005 with then President of Mexico Vicente Fox, who awarded local police for giving sanctuary to illegal immigrants while the two heads discussed other business and cooperation. Fox was a signing member of the Spring 2005 SPP.gov (Security and Prosperity Partnership of North America) document.  Typically, the agenda of Bilderberg is kept secret, though this year has garnered unprecedented coverage for the bashful consortium of international elites.  
&gt;The first lesson of economics is scarcity: There is never enough of anything to satisfy all those who want it. &gt;The first lesson of politics is to disregard the first lesson of economics. Great man, wish we had a poll of how many redditors saw 'Thomas Sowell' and said 'huh, wheres my wiki'. Great post!
Look at the tree. It's beautiful! Sure you could plant a tiny sapling and wait 100 years, but by then those buildings will be underwater due to rising sea levels.
What went wrong with john chow's site. Did he bombed Google?
  Sheehan's finally renounced the Democratic Party. Maybe she'll vote for Ron Paul (if we can get him to win the primaries). How do primaries work again?
It takes decades to grow a tree that big. Someone probably wanted it in their yard, but didn't want to wait half their life for it to grow.
Agreed.  I don't care for either of them, there's plenty of truth to criticize these guys about without disingenuous emphasis.
&gt; For returning from the current function without using RETURN-FROM, I'd use an explicit (block nil ...). That doesn't quite work when the point from which you want to return is enclosed by an additional nil block. Like in a LOOP. I definitely think a RETURN-FROM-DEFUN-style form would be a nice touch. Anyway, this seems to be purely a cosmetic issue, so it probably doesn't fit your criteria of something which you cannot do without.
Downmod anything referencing PDEs
so you have kids as a favor to him?  and he should compensate you?
You're right. Only cynical and depressing shots shall be posted. Quick, someone get a shot of a couple of bulimic supermodels snorting lines off a dirty bathroom floor, and let's all critique the fallacy of superficial modern notions of beauty! Or just enjoy a well-made shot, and move on. The front page will roll over by tomorrow, and you can help this move on by downmodding, if you so choose.
I understand Consumerist's intentions, but this is a little off base. $2,000, as everyone else has pointed out, is very little money. Campaign finance rules cap this as the maximum amount you can donate to a congressional campaign. Politicians get around this by taking money from political action committees or certain types of non-profits -- you can donate way more to a PAC. There is no way a politician would let his vote be influenced by a $2,000. To really get at the bottom of the connection between the RIAA and the hill, it would be best to see which PACs the RIAA contributes to, and where the money gets funneled from there.
Nah, it's not some existential struggle which would hinder everyday life or be a serious threat to Estonian, Latvian or Lithuanian independence. Russians themselves have an expression "let the dogs bark, the caravan will still move on". Yes, the dogs are barking; we are living next to an incrasingly hostile neighbour; but since breaking free of the occupation in 1991 we are doing good. Economy is booming, unemployment is at an all time low, and the Baltic states have made an incredible transition from brutally occupied periphery of the USSR to rather decent European countries based on democracy and a free market in just 16 years. Visit Tallinn or Riga sometime, explore the countries further if you have time, it'll be worth it.
Bastered? As in beer bastered fish fry? 
You're a tool if you actually think that verses 29 and 30 are meant to be taken *literally*.
His no.1 position was just a fluke.
Dare you to cite reliable quote of Chavez ever saying that he intends to end democracy in Venezuela.  Certainly and openly he intends to favor socialism over capitalism.
There's just no point to the picture is all I'm saying. It's like Hollywood and celebrities. Totally useless.
It's in Kowloon, just opposite Hong Kong.  I was there a month a go and they had a few trees in those massive "pots".  Apparently they are creating a hotel and wanted to save the trees which, as others have said, are very impressive.
Chomsky is nearly as bad.
Seems this is the second car wreck this kid has been in this month, plus a DUI. This kid and his friends should have their licenses stripped if they aren't already. Take the bus kid.  Teens, and probably particularly skaters, think they're immortal until they hit their late teens/twenties and one or more of their aquantainces dies from something stupid like this.
Dangerous/courageous...such a fine line :)
I got 20 on that
There is no such thing as objectivity. A single account can never be the definitive word on history of any complexity. A variety of accounts with wildly different points of view can all be illuminating, and the best education can come from looking at as many as possible. A willingness to read someone's opinion is not equivalent to agreeing with it or accepting it uncritically.  The only way an account can discredit itself is by making inaccurate claims of fact. The most helpful way to respond to this is to clarify these inaccuracies specifically and with detail. If the claimant was well intentioned they will respond by avoiding those mistakes in future claims.
I will just write:   if(now-last_spawn &lt; 3) { ... } Yep, writing `3s` will be great but writing `3 /*s*/` or `seconds(3)` are not in my taste. I think that a good programmer could write short names and they will be much more readable then this sentense-long names. In context where they appear. Choosing names which could be understood by sale manager even out of context are not make sence for me. Sure, this is IMHO, IMHO, IMHO.  Yes, i am a moore/forth fan. :) 
The other nine men said they'd rather stick forks in their eyes.
Joke -----------------&gt;    Whisper     O     \|/     |    / \
Downmod any math-phobic comments. Besides, the poster, John Derbyshire, [knows](http://www.amazon.com/Prime-Obsession-Bernhard-Greatest-Mathematics/dp/0452285259/ref=pd_bbs_sr_2/002-0689776-5347217?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1180670699&amp;sr=1-2) his [math.](http://www.amazon.com/Quantity-Real-Imaginary-History-Algebra/dp/0452288533/ref=pd_bbs_sr_1/002-0689776-5347217?ie=UTF8&amp;s=books&amp;qid=1180670699&amp;sr=1-1)
Yet another example of why I fucking hate everybody who says "support the troops," or in any other way idolizes soldiers. I just am not going to concede that somehow being in the military makes a person a hero, a peacekeeper, a patriot, or even a good person.  Since we started the aerial bombing of Afghanistan and started moving troops into the middle east in response to September 11, 2001, I've seen countless videos (or letters about) soldiers killing animals for fun (saw a video of soldiers shooting a dog over and over, more shit like that), making fun of middle eastern children, laughing as they kill, listening to the soundtrack of Grand Theft Auto as they blow up civilians in their tanks, bragging about the day's battle, blatant and constant racism, reports of our female soldiers dodging rape on a daily basis, and more. And they sign a contract to follow the orders of an arbitrary authority: the president of the united states.  Even though they're taught, at some small point, they're supposed to disobey and report orders that violate human rights and/or the Geneva Convention, soldiers just seem to fucking love raping, killing, and torturing every time they're left alone. If this is what it means to be in the united states army and be a passionate patriot and spreader of "democracy," then I think we should be saying "fuck the troops," not "support the troops." Fuck all the troops that act like this.  The troops that know better, that know we should be pulling out, and have the intestinal fortitude to say so, *they* are the heroes.  Fuck the rest, but bring them **all** back within our borders.
&gt; EVERY one of our Customers LOVES us Did you know that was inappropriate behavior in a professional setting? Also, did you know that inappropriate use of CAPITALIZATION every TWO Words is ANNOYING?
This title is completely inaccurate.  The submitter was no doubt confused about the meaning of "honorably discharged". The Marine in question is still under contract, per the article, he is **in the inactive ready reserve**. His "discharge" means nothing more than he is no longer on active duty.  This is **not** the case of the Marine Corps trying to restrict the actions of someone whose contract has expired.
Hah, the last comment was slightly ironic. Maybe I'm the only one who got the joke.  But yes, maybe I should be compensated. The birth canal is kinda fragile after all. You break it, you buy it.
It's been bad for a very long time. In high school ten years ago, I couldn't be alone in the same room as my female teacher. Because when a 17-year-old male and a 40-year-old woman are alone in a room, sex is the first thing that happens, right?
I need some supporting evidence to back up that title. Given the picture alone he could be doing anything.   For example, he could be working out, leaving his home, forgot his keys, running away from a dog around the corner, could be insane and think he is a monkey, cleaning, etc... Edit: format
well with gasoline POURING out of the tank, would you want to be left in there? im not gonna wait for the gas to get heated enough to go and have somebody die, because i walked away thinking it was for the best. secondly, i wasn't driving, this stupid ass english kid was, adn third, dont tell me anything about skateboarders, what the hell would you know about it?
Perhaps the question was "why *not* build around it?".
&gt; He'd maintain whatever moral high-ground he had left, This is where you are confused.  He doesn't have *any* left.
since some scientists differ on the exact sequence of human evolution, this means the entire concept of evolution is false. after all, its just a theory.
I don't get it.
It's an wonderful place to go. If you've experienced other online communities you'll love the change that Zantarni offers. --  Eidorian
car cost money and yet people buy car.  wow! you are either really stupid or ignorance.
Exactly - I can't believe they are uncertain if they should be charged with a crime. Anyone else and they would have been up for manslaughter... police shouldn't be given special rights if they commit a crime due to gross incompetence.
Weird how she just calls it an "abandoned mine" and not an "abandoned salt mine". Probably doesn't know the difference. Hope they never get a flood there! 
I don't see any show-stoppers there.  Some of those statements are not gaffes at all.
Actually, 11 groups.  There's also the group that is knowledgeable about a certain number system, but just doesn't know the details of The Beatles very well.
Especially given how much of Jesus' teaching was done with analogy and parables.
I was going to upvote you if it hadn't been for your bullshit atheist comment.
I don't think anyone's claiming it's high art, but you have to admit that it's got fairly decent composition and even beyond cuteness, the two species at play together will strike a positive chord with a lot of people. Reddit's great and all, but I don't come here expecting Pulitzer-caliber work. Something of this quality that I can enjoy briefly and then move on from, I'm ok with. But maybe that's just me. I do wish there was an Image subreddit, though. As a segment of submissions, they're prevalent enough to warrant it.
How about this: Do something. Change what happens in our world (the Internet) and make a difference. That's the spirit of Reddit, isn't it? Users make the site. Users affect what it includes. We can have a site that is useful, debates serious issues, and offers a serious commentary on political and world events.  Or we can have LOLcats.  The two are somewhat incompatible.  But we can just make a pictures and video subreddit (I already voted for those in the requests section) and that would help a bit.  A comedy subreddit would be even better, of course. LOLcats go there. I love LOLcats, don't get me wrong. But there are websites DEVOTED to that! Go there!  And as for the cat/monkey thing....I don't see how that's interesting. It's a cat. And a monkey. The monkey is touching the cat. Here's another scenario:  There's a Gitmo detainee. There's a US interrogator. The interrogator "touches" the detainee. A lot. Hard.  There are better things we could be focusing on is all I'm saying.
There's a famous video titled "Powers of Ten" that zooms away into the universe, situating itself on a couple having a picnic in a city park. It's probably on YouTube.
Moding you down = people not caring what you think. And insults and racial slurs don't get you very far. It wont change people's minds about the topic.  It will however make people defensive and make your point seem stupid, which I don't feel is wrong.
What is binge drinking, again?  Have they ever put numbers on what excessive drinking is.  I am assuming moderate is a glass of beer or wine a day or couple times a week.  I am assuming "binge" is 6 a day, more? (for an average weight person?)
i taught computers to 4th and 5th graders at a montessori school for a year and a half, and the biggest stress came from always fearing I was going to make/take some action that would be misinterpreted as a paedophile move.  All the other teachers were women, and I don't think they ever felt that fear.  I didn't feel I could bring up this concern, because they might take it as a hint of paedophile tendencies.  When I finally quit, it was a great relief - I felt I was out of jeapordy. To their credit, none of the teachers or parents ever mentioned the subject to me.  Maybe my fears were unfounded.  but the fear was real to me, and I wouldn't do it again.   
Sorry, but this sounds a lot like typical Russian demagoguery. First you say: &gt;&gt;Russia contorling (and periodically shutting down) most of the energy supply lines to Europe &gt;Russia has not done it once. They did shut down lines going to Ukraine, but last I checked it is not a part of EU and then, basically admitting that Russia *did* try to pressure Europe with its display of shutting down energy exports: &gt;And there're also pipes going through Belarussia, hence Ukrainian ones are not so relevant.
The streetview ones are also getting out of hand. Maybe there should be a subreddit for "stupid Google products that, while they may be very cool, don't deserve the top page on the main Reddit."
*you can*
and what would you propose i had done? pulled the emergency brake and spun us off into the woods anyways? around here only one person drives, so i wasn't really able to do much
I'm not sure that Math is figuring into this equation.
No, the US just prods *you* into doing it.
http://reddit.com/info/1v4g7/comments Centralized thread on this. Enjoy...
You haven't lived until you've gotten to a point where you have nothing left to lose.
&gt; Unfortunately, if you tell this to some women they'll think you're just being a cheapskate. Don't get engaged with those women.
It's a reference to the powers of 10 vid.
actually, I just found a _different_ powers of 10 thing. same premise, different starting point: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wKU73gxTdlk&amp;mode=related&amp;search= EDIT: something's scwewy with that one. instead of going in to the negative powers, where expected... it just starts over.
I know, but I still either must not be getting "it," or the idea is so far removed from the supposed source that it doesn't make any sense to me.
seems to be an awful lot of traffic for a break-in.  maybe he's bangin' the milkman's wife and it was a slow day for deliveries.
Put your head back in the sand, it's just aconspiracy theory.
CNN reports: firefighters sleeping on the floor cause crew trip over and being late to a 9/11 site, causing thousands to die in fire.
That comic could not possibly suck any worse.
EXTRA! EXTRA! ALLIES PLANNING TO LAND IN NORMANDY! EXTRA!  EXTRA!
I love it when people claim to be revealing THE TRUTH about something that's allegedly NOT IN THE HISTORY BOOKS.  The fact is, most college-level US foreign policy texts cover many of these events, some in considerable detail; they're rarely whitewashed.  Do a google search for US foreign policy syllabuses; you'll find that even intro level courses cover the darker side of the US' adventures abroad in detail. Anyone insterested in the subject would do far better to look into some of the readings listed in these syllabuses than to trust the tendentious analyses of Noam Chomsky and Ward Churchill.  
-Sam Brownback is an idiot from Kansas.
"Boys and girls, the word for today is PAIN!" Yeah, I think that's the one I remember most clearly.
Thanks, Tran. I knew it had to be out there somewhere.
It means that if something in your life is causing you to sin - let's say, internet pornography - it's better to do away with whatever is causing you to sin than to continue having/using it and end up being condemned for it.  For example: you stop using the computer or cancel your internet connection, or get a filter - instead of continuing to commit adultery by watching the internet porn. There's the intarweb tidbit for the day, what I would suggest is you google it and actually learn for yourself why those verses are there.  There are hundreds if not thousands of websites and sermons that explain those verses, the context, and the derived meanings. Wow.  So what, were you wondering this whole time why all the Christians still had eyes and hands, or did you think something else was up?
I can't believe how good you guys have it. It's about $8 in most of Europe, and nobody behaves like this!
Link bombing could be the issue
If we figure math into the equation, the terrorists have already won.
well.. 1^n = 1. So each step would change... nothing.
If not higher, then maybe its cause people have strong second thoughts, but do it anyway. I know I would be in that camp (and I hate it) - I have a daughter, and its always in the back of my mind if I help out at her kindy.
All right - this is creeping me out. "How are you, GI Joe? It seems to me that most of you are poorly informed about the going of the war, to say nothing about a correct explanation of your presence over here. Nothing is more confused than to be ordered into a war to die or to be maimed for life without the faintest idea of what's going on. (Hanoi Hannah, 16 June 1967)"
its bloody tragic. It actually depresses me (but then I bash those neurons with beer so they hurt less as I know there is nothing I can do about it - after all, I am a father myself).
Off the top of my head: Recall him, give him a direct order to stop, then courts-martial him if he refuses?  The fact that they can recall him pretty much subjects him to the entire UCMJ which is extremely capricious by civilian standards.
[I wondered](http://reddit.com/info/1uepj/comments/c1ueqj) when people were going to realize this.
Hope it will stay that way! Good to know about some of the things they are trying to sneak in but I doubt the culture will support it. Redd.
talk about brainwashing
I don't get what you're so worried about. Looking at the front page right now, I see only 3 (PIC) posts: [The one that started this thread](http://flickr.com/photos/kazzielah/50733910/in/set-518005/) that I look at as striking a cutesy but not irrelevant chord in many people when viewing two disparate species sharing a moment. [A rather pointed display of a distinct cultural divide](http://www.aqoul.com/images/DifferenceofLove.jpg) that is certainly timely. and [Something to appeal to the engineering geek in all of us](http://www.flickr.com/photos/8607227@N02/523884658/). So really, what is there to get all riled up over? I'd like an image subreddit just for organization's sake, personally, but that's about as far as I'd go with it.
I, for one, find this rather surprising. My experience with the ruby community has been that they tend to be very agile-minded and interested in TDD.  That said, I've seen the MRI code, and it frightens me.
That's because the people that pay the media run our elections.  I think this means that we don't actually live in a democracy. We need a new term for a republic in which the democratic representation is limited to the candidates chosen by those with money, so that we can reject this type of system with the magnanimity that comes with the rejection of a single word.
It's fun to be the 800th upvoter.
Its not just government - I know what my own opinion of p-files are, and having kids of my own, how I may react if they were put in any perceived danger whatsoever by them. What I would do frightens me, ergo, I am frightened of what anyone would do (I think in that case the governments reaction is a proxy for the parents) - any due process would go completely out the window. 
I had wondered myself, It seems insane that a topic that actually sounds pretty juicy "Republicans trying to take away your vote, How to Stop it at 11" gets no coverage. Oh well guess reporters report, none of that digging stuff journalists do.  What is interesting is if it is registered mail (as opposed to certified with delivery) you are talking 9.50 + cost of mailing a letter assuming 0 insurance value. Which is an insane amount of money to be sending out thousands of. If you figure a 50% success rate (depending on how well their database is co-ordinated, though that co-ordination is expensive) that is $20 a vote, and considering that only ~90% of blacks vote Democrat (meaning 10% is working against interests), and voter participation rates are at best ~60% (and the targetted members are least likely to vote anyways), well that is a value of probably $40-50 or more a vote.  That is several times what I thought the market value of a vote was.
It takes two to have a race.
Assuming PRC did as what i had outline initially in here... that action is not an 'act of war' per se. It would be more likely considered as an 'economic aggressions.' The most that USA can do initially is to investigate the anomalous movement of is US currency in the world market, then file a serious complaint at WTO... utmost, retaliate with an economic or diplomatic 'sanction' of its own. The next step in escalation is a serious 'recall' of it's ambassador-in-residence. Worst case scenario by America is breaking diplomatic relations with subsequent economic retaliations... still upon approval of WTO. In diplomatic parlance, this is called reciprocity. Act of War is well defined within Geneva Convention, and if i'm not wrong... assuming that PRC really did such malicious debt instrument 'dumping', it does not necessitate a call for arms, thereby launching a "war". So, how can an actual 'shooting' or war happen? 
If Turkey invades, everything will retroactively be Tukey's fault.
1. Hydrogen economy is much more realistic. It is a new true renewable source. Not only that but we will be capable of producing hydrogen ourselves in our garage through sunlight or natural gas.  2. We can refuel anytime and it currently in its developing stage has much much longer range than electric cars. Currently they have 350 mile range versus the electric with 100-200 miles at most. This 200 mile range is the predicted range in a few years, not today.  3. We are talking about a entire economy switching from oil to another fuel source. How can you power an entire economy on the electric grid? You can't, America's and the rest of the world's power grid cannot handle it and it is absolutely insane to think that. Even if electric cars become more efficient its not a true replacement for oil. Hydrogen is, its truely zero emissions. 4. If we switch over to complete electric a majority of America still runs on coal for power. We may use energy more efficiently but current cars are about 15% efficiency and batteries are a mere 30%. Hydrogen fuel cells run at 80% efficiency. Electric cars are not spared from the problems of infrastructure, we will need to outfit our homes and gas stations with electrical plug-ins.    Hydrogen is just simply superior, which is why the entire world is supporting it.
Well, if the population grows, so does the bottom fifth.
After spending some more time with Mahalo I started to take a look at a few of the Guides. Who are these people? Jason is pretty well known for hiring the right people (and they must like him because they jump from company to company with him) so who did he choice for this project?
this is me two years ago... http://www.jasonfrinchaboy.com/accident/wreck.jpg not a scratch! hit by a drunk driver.
I am a cat and I resent your bigotry.
Republicans *talk* about resisting power concentration, but in practice they've been power concentrators all the way back to Lincoln.
Wyld Stallyns couldn't hold Bill back.
I've been married for 13 years - spent maybe a total of $1,000 in diamonds over that time.  My wedding was on the beach for a total cost of $150 (the judge took the photo).  My wife knows about the diamond scam and didn't feel good about diamonds to begin with.  Now that she's seen Blood Diamonds, she doesn't want any more and the only ones she wears are the (very small) ones in her wedding set (total cost $600 non-inflation adjusted)
Sociopaths don't hang their heads in shame, although they may pretend to if it gets them out of trouble.
Is it possible that those who advocate the 9/11 conspiracy theory are really GOP moles trying to make everyone who has a genuine question look like an idiot by association?
but if there is a possibility for him not to crash, rather than pulling the e-brake and spinning the car out, I had to make that choice. May have been the wrong choice, but maybe something worse could have happened, who knows?
I hope George doesn't get any ideas from this!
Oh, powers of --one--.   (***headdesk***) Now I *really* feel like an idiot.
You underestimate yourself. Surely with your skills you could find a way to enhance its suckage factor.
Or Google changed its algorithm?
The aim of the concept is wide usage of alternative and experimental materials for the interior and exterior design. The body of the prototype is made of fiber silicon so it can not be deformed in cas
That's ridiculous.  Oh yeah, we don't have enthusiasm because we're overwhelmed with all the possibilities.  RiGHT. I think the issue with Microsoft and enthusiasm is that they have been inadvertently, yet systematically, alienating many of the 'alpha' geeks. Bill Gates says he has to outsource to India because there's not enough home grown skill to work at Microsoft - he's right - most of the home grown skill doesn't want to. Anyway, the Martin Fowler post/essay/thingy linked by this backs this view quite well.
Oh man, car's totaled.  *Dad, oh yea, about the car, well it turned out that the DD sign stood out for Demolition Derby and not the cup size.*   
Gates should be admired as much for his philanthropy as for his business success.  I'll let you decide which is in the direction of good.
&gt;So, faced with the prospect of needing to modernize its equipment to be able to maintain some contact with its unhappy grassroots base, or just abandoning the base altogether, guess what the RNC chose? I have a sneaking suspicion that this is more than a little sensational. Do phone bank works do anything other than dial-for-dollars? I can't really see them lending an ear to an pissed of 80 year old's opinions on social security and the new Medicare plan.
What are you, 11?
Or have a crap ton of oil so that you don't have to fight idiot wars in far off lands.
Proposals to execute pedophiles make headway in US &gt; http://www.bakutoday.net/view.php?d=37442   
You're right, let's have everything! Starting tomorrow, we need pictures of babies. Hundreds of pretty little babies. Hey everybody, show us a pic of your baby smiling and make reddit such a happy happy little world. Oh, and for manly fun, be sure to submit lots of hot pics of chicks. Any chick, every chick, and if she shows her tits, wow, even better. And if you are having fun drinking lots of beer with your buddies, be sure to make a video of you guys chugging that beer and send it to reddit. And - lol - beer burps. We all have fun listening to beer burps. Wao! I love this new reddit. I never knew reddit could be so  much fun :-)))))) ... and we get to vote on it, so be sure to tell all your friends to vote to make your smiling baby, your hot chick, your beer belch the Front Page winner.
They're not taught to be ashamed of having it.  They're taught to be ashamed of abusing it.  Tell me an example of where kids are taught to be ashamed of their own identity. I'm a teacher. I can listen all day.  Tell me.
[This](http://reddit.com/info/1v4g7/comments/c1v5bq) is about all I've got left to say on the issue. Gnite...gotta go to work tomorrow for some reason.
Hahahahahaha. Riiiiiight. The military-industrial-complex is all about anti-competition. It's *very* American.
I'm with redditcensoredme, I'm interested in your opinion of whether synthetic diamonds will drastically change the market. I mean, when more people start hearing about how synthetics are more perfect than mined diamonds, what do you anticipate the response to be?
That's the point.  This procedure is banned even when the fetus could not possibly be viable.  there isn't another 2 year old. I believe that people should be able to make decisions with their doctor about their health.  I'm shocked that DOCTOR Ron Paul doesn't believe this.
Right, but can you imagine the uproar if they actually continued to do that to him? It would single-handedly destroy what few recuiting drives might still be successful.
I have no comment. I felt like I should post it.
Puts all the fuss about 'Khartoum Karl' in perspective, dunnit?
Why is it so hard to believe he wouldn't want to out his friend? Do you really think that no soldiers (and especially mercenaries) kill people for fun? I know a friend who knows a police officer who claims to beat people up for fun. What do you suggest I do about it?
&gt;Right... it must be tied to CO2. That has to be the most moronic comeback I've ever seen.  I said that productivity has increased dramatically, which means that workers produce more wealth now than they did before, so it's natural to expect to earn more, and you come back with the worst strawman argument ever. &gt;Why should I make more than my father, adjusted for inflation? Why, on average, should we all? Where would the extra real earning power come from? You should make more than your father because you produce more than your father.  The extra real earning power comes from the extra value you add relative to your father, who was less productive than you are. &gt;But please, continue to eat it up with both fists and think whatever they tell you. No, I just know what "productivity" means and I can do 6th grade math. 
Come on.....it's *free*.
lucky bitches we don't do stake-burnings no more... reckon we best gitmo the brownshi_t...uh, back...
&gt;(But you guys can keep downvoting me, for the same reason you upvoted this article -- to prove how incredibly smart you are by making everyone else out to be an idiot.) Be rational. They're downmodding because they don't agree with you. It's what you're supposed to downmod for, and you shouldn't take offense. Argue your point, and worry about if it's well-defended or not, not about what point score you get on it.
&gt;The diamond is about getting engaged. Getting engaged is about getting married. Getting married is about both of you. Then why argue about getting one?! &gt;At the very least, just to be fair, I feel like the guy deserves something equally frivolous and equally expensive. So it's just the money? Well, if  the issue is simply that ya'lls budget can't accommodate it, I understand and she should agree to a smaller ring. If it's just because you don't feel like paying for one *just cuz it  ain't fair*/ you'd rather buy a (insert wish item for yourself) you may want to reconsider buying one at all for now. Plus, we have to carry the baby for 9 freaking months and all that crap. Deal: if you end up childless, then you can choose the frivolous/expensive gift of your choice. 
Wow. And I've been bitching about the ivy roots I had to dig out of my yard last weekend.
Ack. I misinterpreted your remark, my apologies. I'll leave my original comment up for posterity, cause it always bugs me when people delete their mistakes, but yea, I was wrong.
whold writes: &gt; I suspect a big part of it is that people who work in these bureaucracies have their livelihoods on the line. They have an incentive to preserve the bureaucracy, and can spend more time and effort doing so than anybody trying to counter them. This is really sad. There are a lot of people being defendent of bad things just because it happens to be their work. I would say a person, like an examiner of software patents at USPTO, who can realize that what they do is not good from any point, would be *cynical* if they continue to defend such a bad thing as software patents, but it can also be that they refuse to understand, because it's their work. I've kind of met this attitude when speaking with people at PRV, the patent office here in Sweden, as well as when speaking with people from EPO (the European Patent Office). They live on patents and software patents means more business for them. It is scary to realize that we also here in Sweden have software patents now, I've seen software patents granted as early as 2002, despite it is written in the Swedish patent law that software can not be patented. One of the strong defendents of software patents use to be lawyers, of course not because they believe that software patents do anything good for the society, but because they get fat on things that harm other businesses and people. Lawyers are not really the type of people I would like to have involved in my programs as that really doesn't help my programming, and if they need to get involved they cost a fortune which I couldn't afford anyway. However, companies that have built their empire without software patents, like Microsoft which has earlier spoken against software patents like Bill Gates did 1989, are now defending this bad system because they have deep pockets and can afford trials, something a small company or programmer can not.
That word is certainly appropriate, but we still need a word that truly encapsulates the idea that the people are being tricked in this way to think they live in a democracy.   
pedophile is the new axe murderer
OK, I'll bite: The "mainline" Protestant denominations are generally considered to include Methodists, Lutherans, Episcopalians (sorry, I'm probably leaving someone out).  They're "mainline" because they were the more powerful and mainstream denominations in America up until about 1960's. The Evangelicals include denominations like Baptists, Nazarene, Assembly of God, and Foursquare as well as various "non-denominational" churches.  The Evangelicals have certain distinctive doctrines which tend to separate them from the mainline folks: a pre-millennial eschatology (they believe the true believers will be raptured prior to a very tough time called The Tribulation which will be followed by a Utopian Millennium), focus on Evangelism (that's why they're called Evangelicals) and Biblical literalism. Interestingly enough, the Evangelicals were on the outside of American political life up until about the 70's.  Prior to that they tended to be suspicious of politics and considered it too worldly to engage in.  The Mainline denominations tended to be the more politically active of the two.  The Mainliners also tended to be the "country club" folks which ran things - they also tended to look down on the Evangelicals as uneducated bumpkins.   In the 60's the Mainline denominations started to stagnate: they stopped growing.  While at the same time the Evangelical churches began to grow rapidly.  By the time Roe v. Wade came out, the Evangelicals decided that they had better get involved in politics... which led to the Moral Majority, Christian Coalition, and an alignment with the Republican party.
what an ignorant and naive statement.
better yet, instead of talking about Ireland, live there. you are a moron
well that is a stupid moron
I recently heard stuff about titanium rings.. I can't find it right now, but there was some site that was advertising diamond coated black titanium rings.. Set a synthetic diamond in there and you have a small feat of human engineering on your finger. Edit: You could choose a tension ring as well..
I guess it's more like you going about your normal day, then when you get home, or to a party, or whatever, you drink until you are absolutely maggotted. There is no "couple of drinks with mates" for some. A binge is a session of excessive consumption...often followed by a technicolor purge :)  I guess binges can very in size too. Anything longer than a week I'd call a bender.
Well that's not what you said. I think it's *understandable* too. It didn't *need* to happen, though. It could have played out differently, and better for all concerned. EDIT&gt; War, rape, and murder are understandable too. Whether we can understand why something happened is not usually the criterion for criticising it. Actually, it should be a prerequisite to criticism.
LOL Japanese men are being replaced with pillows. How sad is that hahaha. No wonder Japan has the highest suicide rate on that side of the world.
1)Many history books don't neglect these facts.   2)The info is limited and much is missing, at least concerning the ME. (No reference was made - for example- on supporting tyrannical regimes like Saudi Arabia, Jordan,...etc.)
Mr Rogers reminds me a lot of Ron Paul.
That's all good stuff.  It is important to not hate people because hate leads to bad things like animosity and aggression.  It is important to not look at someone (not your spouse) with lust because it is degrading (very few girls like it when guys stare at their chests) and leads to actions which hinder rather than help the relationship between you and your spouse. As for the hand and eye business, Jesus cannot mean to have this be literal considering that he never ordered or advised his disciples to cut off their hands and eyes even though they are recorded as sinning many times.  Peter didn't have to cut his tongue out after he denied Christ.  It probably means to give up certain practices like being an alcoholic or watching pornography.  Fortunately, we have assurance that reliance on Christ's sacrifice is enough to gain admittance to heaven despite possible patterns of evil in our lives. It seems clear that it was God's intent that people only have one sexual partner in their lives.  Trouble arose in Abraham's and Jacob's families because of competition among the wives.  However, Isaac had only one wife and would have experienced no serious domestic problems except he showed favoritism between his kids.  God makes it clear that people should marry only once, but people are not perfect and make mistakes.  It is a very good thing that God is willing to forgive these mistakes.  I think if people in general took relationships and marriages more seriously, there would be no need for divorce.  However, life is a learning process. Those parts of the sermon on the mount deal with personal aspects, but the most exciting parts for me anyway have to do with loving one's enemies, being humble, and giving to others.  Think about if all Christians followed Christ's teachings and gave to the poor.  There would be no more welfare in the U.S.  Unfortunately, like what was mentioned earlier, far too few Christians understand that Christianity is about returning love to our neighbors because Christ first loved us.  It is not about bashing homosexuals, abolishing abortion, or fighting holy wars against Muslims.  Indeed it has nothing to do with politics but everything to do with love.
Nope, don't have to rationalize it. I actually have a non-traditional ring. But he asked what I wanted and was happy to oblige, either way.  I don't think there is anything wrong with wanting one, and I don't think there is anything wrong with not wanting one, or wanting something unconventional. To each her own. I just think that the person wearing it should get to choose what she likes best. Honestly, the people that balk over it just sound cheap. And if the issue is not money, then why *not* get her what she wants?
Yeah, if you're not a handsome man then working with children is considered weird.
This ad sucks. I like Wired, though. (I'm referring to the "numbers" one)
Freedom of speech is a load of crap. Nobody has freedom of speech anywhere anytime. Soldiers belong to the government, they do not have freedom. Even retired soldiers do not have freedom, I imagine that they have to sign documents pledging to never speak out against the party line. Witness John Kerry, who had the balls to come out after serving in Viet Nam against the war. Other soldiers want to do what is right for the people in this country and speak out too. Unfortunately we have a government that does not serve the people, it serves itself and it's rich friends. Fuck the government.
"OK, I appeased the fundies. Now it's time to start equivocating and backpedaling so I don't appear totally batshit crazy to the thinkers out there."
I'm sorry, exactly what part of their question isn't genuine? It's a fact that [Giuliani told Peter Jennings](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tTSinAhJgVE) that he was given warning about the impending collapse of the WTC. The real idiots are the people who criticize citizens for exercising their constitutional rights.
Nobody behaves like this because gas is $8 in Europe? What the shit are you trying to say? That people in Europe don't get excited over high gas prices?
My diesel is $2.99 in San Diego. Sucks to be NorCal.
Considering your average Nuclear plant is only a few hundred acres and the wind park is about 50 square miles I could see how a plant is less obstructive.  I still think the wind farm should be build but you shouldn’t just play dumb that the wind farm is going to be all sun and roses.
You may not cry immediately. The sick thing about killing people is that it's ridiculously easy to kill people. Often the full emotional reaction only sets in later. The reason I mentioned the crying thing is I could see the cops immediate reaction determining the outcome of this tense situation. I'd imagine the crowd would treat a cop who's sitting in the  car bawling differently from one who gets out, and yells for  everyone to get back.
これも有名税ですかねえ。 ご本人のFAQ http://slashdot.jp/comments.pl?sid=363430&amp;cid=1166411
"The Metal Lubricant"  I'd guess real.   I like it! 
Most myopic post ever so far.
Err....wow.
You're quite right! Ok, I'll try... Natural = produce grown *mostly* from land, sun and rain. I understand that it's expensive without some fertilizers, or industrial food for animals, or without insecticides, but some price balance is possible to get better taste and ingredients *and* protect your produce. But, in the end, I have no clear line for "natural". I don't believe there should be one, either. Example: in the supermarkets, you buy tomatoes that have *never* seen dirt. This shit grows in water alleys supplied with minerals, attached to wooden sticks so it doesn't fall. Even the light is artificial. There is *no way* those aren't watery. (I have no direct proof, I only know how they are grown and where they end up, so it's a good guess I've ate them; so I may be full of shit here, but it's a slim chance). OTOH, my aunt's tomatoes, are full-blooded. For these I say "natural".
Yes, an industrial giant might, but the VAST majority of jewelery stores are small business. We employ at my company 12 people TOTAL, including myself and my father.  We have 4 full time employees, including myself and my father, and we're no where near atypical. So we have to have a higher profit because we're smaller and the DOLLAR amount of our profit isn't enough for us to pay everyone if we don't make enough.  Diamonds are really bad in the profit margin arena, seriously. As for Neoncow and your last question: The problem is that if the synthetics are going to be perfect, like say a 1 carat perfect and colorless (which actually is less desirable according to market research, but still worth more, go figure) and the synthetics discount 15% then you're still paying upwards of 50,000 dollars EASY for that stone. Most people I know don't pay 50,000 dollars for their engagement rings, HELL, I work in the industry and get the business discount and got a perfect cut (not clarity or color though, I'm still young) and spent 6,000, which is a TON for most of my friends, but I used the lay away program at my own store. I think people will be somewhat positive about it, and it is definitely a clean way, although the Communist Russians were the ones that basically discovered the HTHP process (Gemisis's lead scientist is a Russian and their founder is a former American Military guy who found out about the machines they use when he was over in Russia for something a few years back). It's hard to say if this is a Betamax or iPod technology.  The guys at Gemisis and Apollo are trying for the 'cultured' moniker for their diamonds but it's really going to end up being the scientists at GIA, AGS, and EGL who'll probably decided what to call them, and so far it's been Synthetic. Synthetic Emeralds and Synthetic Garnets, topazs, etc have been around for a long time (Chatham Created Emeralds) but they're still labeled Synthetics and not Cultured even though the process is very similar. I hope there is a break through in production, that Apollo busts up the Intel AND the DeBeers monopolies (Intel has a HUGE share of the Silicon market) and we're showered in diamonds, we have thirty space elevators and Neal Stephenson's book comes true, I just don't see it happening until we're old. It's an engineering problem I think, and a tricky one at that. At the other end it's a marketing problem, and we'll see how the public reacts.  Personally I think it's going to be a Meh. like it was with Moissanite.  Moissanite is still not diamond even if it is five times cheaper and hard to tell to the untrained eye from ten feet away.  Moissanite sales have peaked and flattened out for years.  We have in our store maybe two or three, at best, pieces sold a year, like the right hand ring bs.  ;~)
Or a mustard seed, or anything else for that matter.  Simplistic analogies and metaphors, Jesus wasn't preaching to Pharisees, he was preaching to laymen.
What kind of bullshit are you trying to sell? &gt; Because the empty string may be just a literal value that is empty just because of the needs of the particular task at hand, but not necessarily empty for the algorithm in general. Oh, maybe it is a riddle.  When is an string string that is defined to be empty not necessarily empty? Hard. Lets do some substitution to try to figure out what the commenter means. &gt; Because the [String.Empty] may be just a literal value that is empty just because of the needs of the particular task at hand, but not necessarily empty for the algorithm in general. No help there. String.Empty is necessarily empty. &gt; Because the [""] may be just a literal value that is empty just because of the needs of the particular task at hand, but not necessarily empty for the algorithm in general. Strike 2. "" is necessarily empty as well. Maybe there is a a clue in the next section. &gt; In the future, if the task, say of parsing some file, needs to be modified slightly, the programmer modifying this code may have no damn idea if this block is for empty strings [1] or if it's for strings that match a certain literal value that happened to be the empty string [2] for the exact constraints for which this code was originally written. Well shoot. I can't tell if String.Empty is suppose to refer to empty string #1 or empty string #2. I give up. Tell me IHaveAnIdea, when is an string string that is defined to be empty not necessarily empty? 
mediacracy
OF course.  I do.  IT tends TO drive PEOPLE nuts.  ;) Our tag line is: 'Your Personal Jeweler.' We have three generations of customers because we're there for them whenever they need superb customer service, superb prices, and exactly what they want to buy, not what we want to sell to them.
&gt; My understanding is that the term "closure" describes a more general concept, that can be used to implement "lambda", "statically nested scoping (lexical scoping)", "Resource-Release Support", "Coroutines", and more. I wish to get a better grasp of general "closures", as Lisp/Scheme hackers understand them. There's not a more general concept involved:  "closure" is essentially synonymous with "lexically scoped first-class function".  In other words, it refers to the first two things you list, and not context managers, coroutines, or anything else. &gt; Python implements "lexical scoping" by chaining the namespaces referenced. Actually, it uses shared cells, not chaining.  (The semantics are the same, however.) &gt; 3) Python question: What form of "closure" is Python lacking, currently that cannot be cleanly implemented in other ways? Python (since 2.1/2.2) does not lack closures, it lacks a syntax for rebinding in (non-global) outer scopes.  (The latter has been implemented in the form of [PEP 3104](http://www.python.org/dev/peps/pep-3104/)'s `nonlocal` keyword, though.) &gt; 4) Ruby question: How do Ruby "blocks" relate to closures? Basically, Ruby's `Proc`s are closures, and blocks are a sort of implicit syntax for them.  See [here](http://eli.thegreenplace.net/2006/04/18/understanding-ruby-blocks-procs-and-methods) and [here](http://innig.net/software/ruby/closures-in-ruby.rb) for more detail. &gt; 5) Ruby question: How do you implement "Resource-Release Support", "Coroutines" in Ruby? * Coroutines:  using first-class continuations.  ([implementations](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Coroutine#Implementations_for_Ruby))  * "Resource-Release Support":  using blocks.  (This is a very common Ruby idiom).  Don't be mislead by the fact that both Python and Ruby use the `yield` keyword:  they use it to mean two different things.  Ruby's block-based and Python's generator-based context managers basically approach the same functionality from two opposite directions.
you have some strong feelings on this...has it happened to you or someone you know?
Oh yes, but unlike the US (excepting Nevada), prostitution isn't illegal everywhere.  SHOCKER!
Now actual pedophiles of course have no such concern and will gladly volunteer for such positions. This irrational fear is actually putting more kids at risk in my opinion by tilting the balance of *who* exactly is volunteering/taking these kinds of positions.
The problem is all the time we hear about abusive police - I hoped the mop had killed them. Now they are just get a free vacation. They should have been charged with murder.
Ok, the repetition of the capitalization is kinda annoying. But can we give this guy a brake? Obviously he is passionate about what he does and has a clear sense of business ethics. Diamonds can be mined and sold ethically, and we should enocourage jewelers who abide by such standards even if you don't care much for shiny baubles.
If a girl's friends are that absurdly shallow, she should get some new friends, stat.
As long as he doesn't have a girlfriend already employed at the World Bank, what's the big deal?
Die Nazi Fuck.
&gt;Think of the number of Americans who get their news from the TV and still think WMD were found in Iraq. People who get their news from websites are far more likely to have discovered the truth by now. OK...case in point: where did you get the information about "the number of Americans who get their news from TV, etc.?" Got a source? No, wait. Good journalists cite two independent sources before stating something as a fact. Great journalists can produce more sources. So do you have two solid sources for your statement about "the number of Americans who get their news from TV, blah, blah, blah?" Well........ Do yah?
Not that I'm saying it's a good thing, but the vector is well established.  One woman has sex with twenty men, one of the early men has AIDS and the last, say fifteen get it from the one woman.  All these men go back to their wives, because they're married like good Christians, and have sex with their wives and then their entire family is infected, even the children born afterwards, if possible.  Also the men that live in the villages still might just get it from one of the many wives that stray. Just like the numerous truck drivers in South Africa.  There are MANY problems in Africa, AIDS being one of the Big ones, and the US's BULLSHIT policy of Abstinence Only Programs for Africa is about as bad as you can get.   The mines in various countries range from good to bad depending on who owns the mines and the laws of the specific country. www.diamondfacts.org
&gt; Ever hear of satellites and AWACS? What the USA had during its great SCUD hunt which accomplished jack? I think I'm done with you.
Well, presumably there's some (non-inertial, I expect) reference frame in which 11 years would be the amount of subjective time between the event of my birth and the event of me typing this. But that's not important now.
Some friends of mine got married last year, and she bought her diamond and ring at an antique store and had it set.  This is another option—herilooms and antiques aren't supporting conglomerates (technically they've already been supported, but not by you), and you can get them for free or cheaper.
What people see is whatever media reports (to use the term loosely) like this tell them. When the truth is stretched and the story sensationalized to make it more interesting, people aren't seeing the true facts behind it. A lot of the time, those facts are pretty important.  The comments system built into reddit is extremely powerful because it allows people to post relevant information that might otherwise have been missed. Maybe those who don't care to dig any deeper than the Wonkette piece won't know that there's more to it, but at least reddit readers hopefully will. That being said, they will prosecute him and the court will decide the outcome based on regulations. Depending on what the court decides, he may become a sort of a martyr--not because of the Marine Corps or because he violated regulations he knew were in place, but because people will exaggerate and ignorantly devour information that isn't true.
oh, you mean you thought it said in the comic 10 instead of 1? Eh, I've done worse.
Yeah but just because you replace Christian whites with Jewish Black guys doesn't mean it will be better, it comes down to the individuals in charge, not their race.
I'M IN UR REDDIT PATTING YR LOLCATS
Nobody queues madly just before price hikes. The article isn't really about people getting excited over high gas prices, is it.
Don't look now, but there's a huge non-inertial L on your forehead.
Depends on who you ask, I think.
That is the thing though.  It could be 4-5. 4-5 will get you pretty good (depending on what you are doing) and then there are those times of infinite drinks like you mentioned.  I am saying 8-10-infinity (you are just constantly ramming drinks down your mouth, till dawn) maybe where you are crawling the floor screaming for mommy. On another note, I dont get anything from one drink, so have to have at least 2-3.  I assume people drink to unwind a little bit and hopefully not for the taste?
Anyone know what kind of a tree that is? I'm curious as to what tree of that size has such a tiny root system... Seems a bit odd.
Don't feel bad.  You were probably expecting it to be funny.
"Lisp/Scheme/Ruby hackers".  No Perl hackers in there?  It's a little odd to see Perl missing from a list like that.  In case folks don't know it already, I'd like to note that Perl has first class functions / closures, as well.  (Of course, so does Javascript, and so do countless other languages... but the particular list of languages in question, Python, Ruby, Lisp/Scheme, seems to beg for a mention of Perl.) I hate to admit it, but sometimes I feel a little bit defensive when I hear talk about how great Ruby is for having procs and blocks, with no mention of the fact that Perl has them (and has had them for a long time).  I suppose it's mostly just that Ruby has much more attention at the moment. As an aside, python's crippled lambda plays an interesting role in the whole debate about python's use of indentation to represent blocks.  Namely, it is considerably hard to imagine how one could construct a good textual representation of anonymous functions (full anonymous functions, not just anonymous expressions, such as python's lambda) in python's syntax, without adding some form of bracket.
that's true, I doubt they'd throw rocks at a crying man
What the fuck is with all the America == Nazi Germany idiocy!? You might well argue that America is fascist or has fascist tendencies. Arguing that it's somehow as bad as Nazi Germany is just silly. Fascist != Nazi.
From day one I've found those "support our troops" stickers offensive but I did, for a while, maintain some sympathy for the troops. No longer; Fuck 'em. Too many are murderers, rapists, torturers, etc. and though there may be a few who are honorable (if honor still exists in the American psyche) they don't speak out, so fuck them too. Did you catch Cheney last week with the cadets -- Go forth and torture. There were many atrocities in Viet Nam but there were also many times when an officer crossed the line the "troops" fragged him. Our current military too closely resembles the German War Criminals. Since you got on a rant I will too. In the aftermath of Katrina the motherfucking "troops" disarmed my fellow citizens while the Blackwater thugs patrolled downtown. So much for the founding fathers' aversion to standing armies and mercenaries.
I've seen cars mangled way worse than that one and the occupants walked away without a scratch.  I've also seen people killed in wrecks @ less than 30 mph.  Car wrecks are strange.
&gt; On the bright side the remaining family members probably never have to work again. Really?  The article says *Mayor Ed Pawlowski apologized to the family, took responsibility for the crash and said the city would pay the family's **funeral expenses**.*
Coming from a self-proclaimed "bitch", I'm sure this is completely unbiased and accurate.
Thank You.  =)  We try.  Jewelry is one of the oldest professions in the world.  Jewelers joke that we're the thirds oldest profession.  Our job was created to make things for the priest to sell to the whore to curry favor with her. ;-) However, in all seriousness, it's been around a long time and it seems that each new generation has to throw off the old trappings of the previous and move forward in a better way, and we're trying to do that.  The more ethical jewelers there are the better it is for the industry and the world as a whole, and to give up on it just because there are bad things happening is worse than actually doing the bad things, because if I'm not in business who do you go to? Jewelry is beautiful art that we wear that like tattoos express something about who we are as people.  Jewelry is important, because without personalized art what are we?  Sorry, I just find art important, and I find jewelry the most exquisite and meaningful. In the big scheme of things diamonds aren't really important, but to toss them away because you have misconceptions is a lot like throwing the baby out with the bathwater.  Diamonds do a lot of good for the people of Africa and the rest of the world too.  Yes, there is bad, but if we work at fixing that then all we're left with is good, it's silly to give up on an entire industry because of a few problems.  Like throwing out a pair of new sneakers because the laces broke.
who is ka-ping?
To clarify what I mean by the Boolean Fallacy, I quote from the "Handbook of Logical Fallacies," from David King's Guide to Ojbectivism. &gt;BOOLEAN &gt;Choosing to view a continuum as represented by only its extremities. It consists in dividing a range of options exhaustively into the two extremes and then insisting that a choice be made between one or the other extreme, without regard to any of the intervening alternatives. An example would be to insist that if a man does not behave like a genius he must therefore be a moron. A more subtly dangerous example is the attitude of a person who has an aversion to the necessity of defining one’s terms. She may attempt to avoid this necessity by maintaining that "defining every single term used in a discussion would result in such a tedious and turgid presentation that communication would be impossible." What she ignores is the intervening alternative of defining only the terms that are SIGNIFICANT to the discussion. &gt;In fact, some phenomena are Boolean by nature and some are Gaussian. Human intelligence is Gaussian, the Law of Identity is Boolean. The **Excluded middle** is another name for what I call the Boolean Fallacy.   What we may be able to expect in states where death penalties for child rapists are passed, is for defense lawyers to argue that since they're client isn't so bad as to be deserving of death penalty, it follows that he's not *really* a rapist at all, and thus shift the burden of responsibility for the crimes upon the victims.  They will attempt to establish precedents exploiting this artificial divide and make it so that the hill victims have to climb to obtain justice becomes exponentially greater a challenge.
This is high school for fuck's sake. I know of university graduations that I've been to that were louder than my high school's. None of those alternative situations you offered are along the same lines as a high school graduation. These are teenagers that are truthfully not in a serious ceremony. Graduation, la dee da... let them be kids. If Student A's family is being jerks and cheering for 3 minutes, that's one thing, but if they gave out a "Yeah, Rob! Whoo!" and everyone laughed, that takes at most 10 seconds, which the announcer can pause, and then just continue. Student B can wait a few seconds.
My husband and I stopped wearing our wedding rings  a long time ago. We don't need pieces of metal around our fingers to know that we are soul mates.We've been married 20 years. Rings are like tiny dog collars that indicate ownership. Diamonds just indicate that you will buy whatever society tells you to buy. My mother had a friend who was upset because her hairdresser had bigger diamond earrings than she, the owner of a supermarket chain, had-- the nerve!
I'm seeing a pumped-up muscle-bound android, Ahnuld-Terminator style, bursting into O'Reilly's TV set and spraying the compere, guests and audience with machine gun bullets.  When the last body twitches to a juddering halt and the echoes finally fade, he turns to the camera and says, "O'Reilly?  Downvoted." (This scene from *Reddinator III: Rise Of The Commenters* is brought to you by your friendly neighbourhood link aggregation community.)
&gt;I just don't see the point in labelling things "artificial" and "natural", like it means something as it doesn't have any meaning except for the false "natural=good" "artificial=bad" implication. I think you should. Chemistry just isn't there yet to beat "natural". There is more inside it. It's the richness of life there, man ;-). Don't lose it! I'd guess it's possible, but just too expensive to get to the bottom of natural processes and get the *exact* same thing in the lab. That's why I said "try, then decide". If "artificial" works for you, hey, why not? If the price is right, why not? Etc. Also, please note, I am not arguing for "healthy". To that, I say, screw it! "Healthy" stuff also usually tastes like crap. No fat on the roast? Yuck! (etc.) Instead, I say, moderate your intake, exercise to keep *your* juices flowing and your body will do ok with "natural", even if "unhealthy".
No tell me. Does String.Empty refer to "empty strings" or "a certain literal value that happened to be the empty string"? I'm dieing to know.
But she said 19th Century. And you thought she was talking about Roe vs Wade. That was a poor first guess.
OTOH, would the movie production company make this mistake?
On a similar note.  As a single, male adult I dont really interact with kids at all.  On those rare occasions when I do, it does feel a little weird.  Even at christmas and thanksgiving, who are all these little people.   
All I can think about is Futurama... disturbing.
Finally, some honesty.  Respect is *earned* on a person-by person basis, over time, by merit of evidence and principle; it is not deserved, granted, rewarded or awarded.  You're my new friend.
I have three kids but would still be concerned about the same thing if I needed to work with kids. Sad state of society today.
Is that where they film the outside shot of Stargate SG-1?
It's hilarious that in a country that so enshrines freedom of speech and press the media should turn out to be so weak, servile and frankly incurious. No wait, not hilarious... what's the opposite of hilarious... sad. Yes, very sad.
What!?  If you were an African black person proud of your heritage I'd think you'd want to know the truth and do everything you could to improve the situation in Africa. This article is far from accurate and maybe if you checked out http://www.diamondfacts.org and other websites you'd have a clearer picture.  It might make you want to BUY diamonds from say Botswana and help some school children go to school for free. I may not be black, but if I was I'd think that Nelson Mandela supporting the diamond industry would be something I'd find important.  Hell, I still do. 
It's 2007: we responded on our [blog](http://www.historyisaweapon.org/hiawblog.html").
Politicians that will take money from anyone: all of them.
sblinn writes:  &gt; Yet I would not say this particular patent is invalid due to obviousness, rather I would guess the best attack would be on prior art, as certainly at least some of these techniques would have been used prior to 1994...) I lost you on this part (I was going to upmod you..), but I don't see how we can attack a bad system with prior art. OK, for a particular patent we can do this, but to take down the system is harder I think. Although, in a way this is what we intend to do with the business model our company is developing now. Each new invention which will be created, will add to future prior art, that is we intend to disclose everything generated as early as possible so it can't be patented. In this way we could probably (even though we have not been looking into this yet) generate a lot prior art in advance by disclosing all incremental innovations as well, which can be generated from earlier innovations. Observe that this is not about software patents only, it is about all kind of new innovations that can be created incrementally from earlier innovations. These should not be patentable from our point of view. Only real innovations (which I assume was one of the original purposes with the patent system, but that purpose is lost long ago...)
might be some confusion, the 'kid' is 18 years old, i just regard people that stupid as children.
If my software falls out of copyright, it does not require me to release its source code.  Stallman's proposal would.  That is indeed a radical proposal.
Growing up in Utah and in the Mormon faith, but leaving it, and since then having spent some time in the bible belt region, I can tell you with certainty that your #5 point is way off.  The LDS faith does hold that belief, to a degree, but saying that evangelicals are lukewarm by comparison is just crazy.  It's not Mormons standing outside Abortion clinics with signs screaming murder and damnation.  Perhaps if your idea of Mormons is Big Love (The HBO show on polygamy, which is no longer promoted by the LDS faith) than you would have a point, but that isn't the case anymore.
Move to the city with the Liberals. If they're brainwashed, one article on DeBeers tends to solve it. None of the girls I've dated seriously would have wanted a diamond ring.
[citation needed]
Re closures and coroutines... Closures and coroutines are not directly related.  Coroutines concern the control flow of your program, while closures encapsulate code and state.  For example, when compiling Lisp to C, you'd use some kind of table to store the free variables of your closures, whereas you'd use setjmp/longjmp or setcontext(2) to implement the stack manipulation required for coroutines. http://pauillac.inria.fr/~xleroy/talks/compilation-agay.pdf  (some bits about closures in O'Caml)
Thank you. I found this conversation pretty insightful. Something that just occured to me now is that there is no bulk process for the creation and refinement of diamond. With silicon you can essentially take a ton of coal and turn it into diamond by selectively heating it. All in one go. This confers a great cost advantage to silicon and I wonder if that might not be enough to keep diamond away.
What a weapon of withering wit one wields!
Whatever.
Weak.
The quality of the videos is horrible. It's not point to watch these videos if one can't make out any of the presentations slides.
[An alternative](http://portableapps.com/apps/development/xampp) that can run off of a memorystick and which include:  * Apache   * MySQL   * PHP + PEAR   * MiniPerl   * OpenSSL   * phpMyAdmin   * XAMPP Control Panel   * Webalizer   * Mercury Mail Transport System   * FileZilla FTP Server   * SQLite   * ADODB   * Zend Optimizer   * XAMPP Security and optionally  * perl   * Tomcat Installation reduces to unpacking and starting the services you want via the xamp-control panel. 
 &gt; &gt; 3) Python question: What form of "closure" is Python lacking, currently that cannot be cleanly implemented in other ways? &gt; Python (since 2.1/2.2) does not lack closures, it lacks a syntax for rebinding in (non-global) outer scopes. (The latter has been implemented in the form of PEP 3104's nonlocal keyword, though.) It also lacks a syntax for creating anonymous closures on non-trivial functions.  It has two methods for creating closures, lambda and nested functions, but each method only provides half of the functionality of closures in many other languages (such as Ruby, lisps, Perl, and Javascript). Lambda creates a statically lexically scoped anonymous function, but the function's body can be nothing more than a single expression.  Nested functions can create closures on full, non-trivial functions, but there is no way to do so anonymously, within a larger expression (for instance, as an argument to another function, or as part of a larger data structure).
